Chapter 2 Installing and Upgrading MySQL

   This chapter describes how to obtain and install MySQL. A
   summary of the procedure follows and later sections provide
   the details. If you plan to upgrade an existing version of
   MySQL to a newer version rather than install MySQL for the
   first time, see Section 2.11.1, "Upgrading MySQL," for
   information about upgrade procedures and about issues that
   you should consider before upgrading.

   If you are interested in migrating to MySQL from another
   database system, you may wish to read Section A.8, "MySQL 5.6
   FAQ: Migration," which contains answers to some common
   questions concerning migration issues.

   Installation of MySQL generally follows the steps outlined
   here:

    1. Determine whether MySQL runs and is supported on your
       platform.
       Please note that not all platforms are equally suitable
       for running MySQL, and that not all platforms on which
       MySQL is known to run are officially supported by Oracle
       Corporation:

    2. Choose which distribution to install.
       Several versions of MySQL are available, and most are
       available in several distribution formats. You can choose
       from pre-packaged distributions containing binary
       (precompiled) programs or source code. When in doubt, use
       a binary distribution. We also provide public access to
       our current source tree for those who want to see our
       most recent developments and help us test new code. To
       determine which version and type of distribution you
       should use, see Section 2.1.1, "Which MySQL Version and
       Distribution to Install."

    3. Download the distribution that you want to install.
       For instructions, see Section 2.1.2, "How to Get MySQL."
       To verify the integrity of the distribution, use the
       instructions in Section 2.1.3, "Verifying Package
       Integrity Using MD5 Checksums or GnuPG."

    4. Install the distribution.
       To install MySQL from a binary distribution, use the
       instructions in Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on
       Unix/Linux Using Generic Binaries."
       To install MySQL from a source distribution or from the
       current development source tree, use the instructions in
       Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL from Source."

    5. Perform any necessary postinstallation setup.
       After installing MySQL, see Section 2.10,
       "Postinstallation Setup and Testing" for information
       about making sure the MySQL server is working properly.
       Also refer to the information provided in Section 2.10.4,
       "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts." This section
       describes how to secure the initial MySQL user accounts,
       which have no passwords until you assign passwords. The
       section applies whether you install MySQL using a binary
       or source distribution.

    6. If you want to run the MySQL benchmark scripts, Perl
       support for MySQL must be available. See Section 2.13,
       "Perl Installation Notes."

   Instructions for installing MySQL on different platforms and
   environments is available on a platform by platform basis:

     * Unix, Linux, FreeBSD
       For instructions on installing MySQL on most Linux and
       Unix platforms using a generic binary (for example, a
       .tar.gz package), see Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on
       Unix/Linux Using Generic Binaries."
       For information on building MySQL entirely from the
       source code distributions or the source code
       repositories, see Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL from
       Source"
       For specific platform help on installation,
       configuration, and building from source see the
       corresponding platform section:

          + Linux, including notes on distribution specific
            methods, see Section 2.5, "Installing MySQL on
            Linux."

          + Solaris and OpenSolaris, including PKG and IPS
            formats, see Section 2.7, "Installing MySQL on
            Solaris and OpenSolaris."

          + IBM AIX, see Section 2.7, "Installing MySQL on
            Solaris and OpenSolaris."

          + FreeBSD, see Section 2.8, "Installing MySQL on
            FreeBSD."

     * Microsoft Windows
       For instructions on installing MySQL on Microsoft
       Windows, using either the MySQL Installer or Zipped
       binary, see Section 2.3, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft
       Windows."
       For information about managing MySQL instances, see
       Section 2.3.4, "MySQL Notifier."
       For details and instructions on building MySQL from
       source code using Microsoft Visual Studio, see Section
       2.9, "Installing MySQL from Source."

     * OS X
       For installation on OS X, including using both the binary
       package and native PKG formats, see Section 2.4,
       "Installing MySQL on OS X."
       For information on making use of an OS X Launch Daemon to
       automatically start and stop MySQL, see Section 2.4.3,
       "Installing a MySQL Launch Daemon."
       For information on the MySQL Preference Pane, see Section
       2.4.5, "Installing and Using the MySQL Preference Pane."

2.1 General Installation Guidance

   The immediately following sections contain the information
   necessary to choose, download, and verify your distribution.
   The instructions in later sections of the chapter describe
   how to install the distribution that you choose. For binary
   distributions, see the instructions at Section 2.2,
   "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic Binaries" or
   the corresponding section for your platform if available. To
   build MySQL from source, use the instructions in Section 2.9,
   "Installing MySQL from Source."

2.1.1 Which MySQL Version and Distribution to Install

   MySQL is available on a number of operating systems and
   platforms. For information about those platforms that are
   officially supported, see
   http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms/database.html
   on the MySQL Web site.

   When preparing to install MySQL, you should decide which
   version to use, and which distribution format (binary or
   source) to use for the installation.

   First, decide if you want to install a development release or
   a GA release. Development releases have the newest features,
   but are not recommended for production use. GA (General
   Availability) releases, also called production or stable
   releases, are meant for production use. We recommend to use
   the most recent GA release.

   The naming scheme in MySQL 5.6 uses release names that
   consist of three numbers and a suffix; for example,
   mysql-5.6.1-m1. The numbers within the release name are
   interpreted as follows:

     * The first number (5) is the major version and describes
       the file format. All MySQL 5 releases have the same file
       format.

     * The second number (6) is the release level. Taken
       together, the major version and release level constitute
       the release series number.

     * The third number (1) is the version number within the
       release series. This is incremented for each new release.
       Usually you want the latest version for the series you
       have chosen.

   For each minor update, the last number in the version string
   is incremented. When there are major new features or minor
   incompatibilities with previous versions, the second number
   in the version string is incremented. When the file format
   changes, the first number is increased.

   Release names can also include a suffix that indicates the
   stability level of the release. Releases within a series
   progress through a set of suffixes to indicate how the
   stability level improves. The possible suffixes are:

     * If there is no suffix, it indicates that the release is a
       General Availability (GA) or Production release. GA
       releases are stable, having successfully passed through
       all earlier release stages and are believed to be
       reliable, free of serious bugs, and suitable for use in
       production systems. Only critical bugfixes are applied to
       the release.

     * mN (for example, m1, m2, m3, ...) indicate a milestone
       number. MySQL development uses a milestone model, in
       which each milestone proceeds through a small number of
       versions with a tight focus on a small subset of
       thoroughly tested features. Following the releases for
       one milestone, development proceeds with another small
       number of releases that focuses on the next small set of
       features, also thoroughly tested. Features within
       milestone releases may be considered to be of
       pre-production quality.

     * rc indicates a Release Candidate. Release candidates are
       believed to be stable, having passed all of MySQL's
       internal testing, and with all known fatal runtime bugs
       fixed. However, the release has not been in widespread
       use long enough to know for sure that all bugs have been
       identified. Only minor fixes are added.

   Once you've chosen which MySQL version to install, you need
   to decide which distribution to install for your operating
   system. For most use cases, a binary distribution is the
   right choice. Binary distributions are available in native
   format for many platforms, such as RPM packages for Linux, or
   DMG packages for OS X. Distributions are also available in
   more generic formats such as Zip archives or compressed tar
   files. On Windows, you can use the MySQL Installer to install
   a binary distribution.

   Under some circumstances, you may be better off installing
   MySQL from a source distribution:

     * You want to install MySQL at some explicit location. The
       standard binary distributions are ready to run at any
       installation location, but you might require even more
       flexibility to place MySQL components where you want.

     * You want to configure mysqld to ensure that features are
       available that might not be included in the standard
       binary distributions. Here is a list of the most common
       extra options that you may want to use to ensure feature
       availability:

          + -DWITH_LIBWRAP=1 for TCP wrappers support.

          + -DWITH_ZLIB={system|bundled} for features that
            depend on compression

          + -DWITH_DEBUG=1 for debugging support
       For additional information, see Section 2.9.4, "MySQL
       Source-Configuration Options."

     * You want to configure mysqld without some features that
       are included in the standard binary distributions. For
       example, distributions normally are compiled with support
       for all character sets. If you want a smaller MySQL
       server, you can recompile it with support for only the
       character sets you need.

     * You want to use the latest sources from one of the Git
       repositories to have access to all current bugfixes. For
       example, if you have found a bug and reported it to the
       MySQL development team, the bugfix is committed to the
       source repository and you can access it there. The bugfix
       does not appear in a release until a release actually is
       issued.

     * You want to read (or modify) the C and C++ code that
       makes up MySQL. For this purpose, you should get a source
       distribution.

     * Source distributions contain more tests and examples than
       binary distributions.

2.1.2 How to Get MySQL

   Check our downloads page at http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/
   for information about the current version of MySQL and for
   downloading instructions. For a complete up-to-date list of
   MySQL download mirror sites, see
   http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/mirrors.html. You can also
   find information there about becoming a MySQL mirror site and
   how to report a bad or out-of-date mirror.

   For RPM-based Linux platforms that use Yum as their package
   management system, MySQL can be installed using the MySQL Yum
   Repository (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/yum/). See
   Section 2.5.1, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL Yum
   Repository" for details.

   For a number of Debian-based Linux platforms, such as Ubuntu,
   MySQL can be installed using the MySQL APT Repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/apt/). See Section
   2.5.3, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL APT
   Repository" for details.

   For SUSE Linux Enterprise Server (SLES) platforms, MySQL can
   be installed using the MySQL SLES Repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/suse/). See Section
   2.5.4, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL SLES
   Repository" for details.

   To obtain the latest development source, see Section 2.9.3,
   "Installing MySQL Using a Development Source Tree."

2.1.3 Verifying Package Integrity Using MD5 Checksums or GnuPG

   After you have downloaded the MySQL package that suits your
   needs and before you attempt to install it, you should make
   sure that it is intact and has not been tampered with. There
   are three means of integrity checking:

     * MD5 checksums

     * Cryptographic signatures using GnuPG, the GNU Privacy
       Guard

     * For RPM packages, the built-in RPM integrity verification
       mechanism

   The following sections describe how to use these methods.

   If you notice that the MD5 checksum or GPG signatures do not
   match, first try to download the respective package one more
   time, perhaps from another mirror site.

2.1.3.1 Verifying the MD5 Checksum

   After you have downloaded a MySQL package, you should make
   sure that its MD5 checksum matches the one provided on the
   MySQL download pages. Each package has an individual checksum
   that you can verify against the package that you downloaded.
   The correct MD5 checksum is listed on the downloads page for
   each MySQL product, and you will compare it against the MD5
   checksum of the file (product) that you download.

   Each operating system and setup offers its own version of
   tools for checking the MD5 checksum. Typically the command is
   named md5sum, or it may be named md5, and some operating
   systems do not ship it at all. On Linux, it is part of the
   GNU Text Utilities package, which is available for a wide
   range of platforms. You can also download the source code
   from http://www.gnu.org/software/textutils/. If you have
   OpenSSL installed, you can use the command openssl md5
   package_name instead. A Windows implementation of the md5
   command line utility is available from
   http://www.fourmilab.ch/md5/. winMd5Sum is a graphical MD5
   checking tool that can be obtained from
   http://www.nullriver.com/index/products/winmd5sum. Our
   Microsoft Windows examples will assume the name md5.exe.

   Linux and Microsoft Windows examples:
shell> md5sum mysql-standard-5.6.25-linux-i686.tar.gz
aaab65abbec64d5e907dcd41b8699945  mysql-standard-5.6.25-linux-i686.tar
.gz

shell> md5.exe mysql-installer-community-5.6.25.msi
aaab65abbec64d5e907dcd41b8699945  mysql-installer-community-5.6.25.msi

   You should verify that the resulting checksum (the string of
   hexadecimal digits) matches the one displayed on the download
   page immediately below the respective package.
   Note

   Make sure to verify the checksum of the archive file (for
   example, the .zip, .tar.gz, or .msi file) and not of the
   files that are contained inside of the archive. In other
   words, verify the file before extracting its contents.

2.1.3.2 Signature Checking Using GnuPG

   Another method of verifying the integrity and authenticity of
   a package is to use cryptographic signatures. This is more
   reliable than using MD5 checksums, but requires more work.

   We sign MySQL downloadable packages with GnuPG (GNU Privacy
   Guard). GnuPG is an Open Source alternative to the well-known
   Pretty Good Privacy (PGP) by Phil Zimmermann. See
   http://www.gnupg.org/ for more information about GnuPG and
   how to obtain and install it on your system. Most Linux
   distributions ship with GnuPG installed by default. For more
   information about GnuPG, see http://www.openpgp.org/.

   To verify the signature for a specific package, you first
   need to obtain a copy of our public GPG build key, which you
   can download from http://pgp.mit.edu/. The key that you want
   to obtain is named mysql-build@oss.oracle.com. Alternatively,
   you can cut and paste the key directly from the following
   text:
-----BEGIN PGP PUBLIC KEY BLOCK-----
Version: GnuPG v1.4.9 (SunOS)
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=443I
-----END PGP PUBLIC KEY BLOCK-----

   To import the build key into your personal public GPG
   keyring, use gpg --import. For example, if you have saved the
   key in a file named mysql_pubkey.asc, the import command
   looks like this:
shell> gpg --import mysql_pubkey.asc
gpg: key 5072E1F5: public key "MySQL Release Engineering
<mysql-build@oss.oracle.com>" imported
gpg: Total number processed: 1
gpg:               imported: 1
gpg: no ultimately trusted keys found

   You can also download the key from the public keyserver using
   the public key id, 5072E1F5:
shell> gpg --recv-keys 5072E1F5
gpg: requesting key 5072E1F5 from hkp server keys.gnupg.net
gpg: key 5072E1F5: "MySQL Release Engineering <mysql-build@oss.oracle.
com>"
1 new user ID
gpg: key 5072E1F5: "MySQL Release Engineering <mysql-build@oss.oracle.
com>"
53 new signatures
gpg: no ultimately trusted keys found
gpg: Total number processed: 1
gpg:           new user IDs: 1
gpg:         new signatures: 53

   If you want to import the key into your RPM configuration to
   validate RPM install packages, you should be able to import
   the key directly:
shell> rpm --import mysql_pubkey.asc

   If you experience problems or require RPM specific
   information, see Section 2.1.3.4, "Signature Checking Using
   RPM."

   After you have downloaded and imported the public build key,
   download your desired MySQL package and the corresponding
   signature, which also is available from the download page.
   The signature file has the same name as the distribution file
   with an .asc extension, as shown by the examples in the
   following table.

   Table 2.1 MySQL Package and Signature Files for Source files
       File Type                      File Name
   Distribution file mysql-standard-5.6.25-linux-i686.tar.gz
   Signature file    mysql-standard-5.6.25-linux-i686.tar.gz.asc

   Make sure that both files are stored in the same directory
   and then run the following command to verify the signature
   for the distribution file:
shell> gpg --verify package_name.asc

   If the downloaded package is valid, you will see a "Good
   signature" similar to:
shell> gpg --verify mysql-standard-5.6.25-linux-i686.tar.gz.asc
gpg: Signature made Tue 01 Feb 2011 02:38:30 AM CST using DSA key ID 5
072E1F5
gpg: Good signature from "MySQL Release Engineering <mysql-build@oss.o
racle.com>"

   The Good signature message indicates that the file signature
   is valid, when compared to the signature listed on our site.
   But you might also see warnings, like so:
shell> gpg --verify mysql-standard-5.6.25-linux-i686.tar.gz.asc
gpg: Signature made Wed 23 Jan 2013 02:25:45 AM PST using DSA key ID 5
072E1F5
gpg: checking the trustdb
gpg: no ultimately trusted keys found
gpg: Good signature from "MySQL Release Engineering <mysql-build@oss.o
racle.com>"
gpg: WARNING: This key is not certified with a trusted signature!
gpg:          There is no indication that the signature belongs to the
 owner.
Primary key fingerprint: A4A9 4068 76FC BD3C 4567  70C8 8C71 8D3B 5072
 E1F5

   That is normal, as they depend on your setup and
   configuration. Here are explanations for these warnings:

     * gpg: no ultimately trusted keys found: This means that
       the specific key is not "ultimately trusted" by you or
       your web of trust, which is okay for the purposes of
       verifying file signatures.

     * This key is not certified with a trusted signature! There
       is no indication that the signature belongs to the
       owner.: This refers to your level of trust in your belief
       that you possess our real public key. This is a personal
       decision. Ideally, a MySQL developer would hand you the
       key in person, but more commonly, you downloaded it. Was
       the download tampered with? Probably not, but this
       decision is up to you. Setting up a web of trust is one
       method for trusting them.

   See the GPG documentation for more information on how to work
   with public keys.

2.1.3.3 Signature Checking Using Gpg4win for Windows

   The Section 2.1.3.2, "Signature Checking Using GnuPG" section
   describes how to verify MySQL downloads using GPG. That guide
   also applies to Microsoft Windows, but another option is to
   use a GUI tool like Gpg4win (http://www.gpg4win.org/). You
   may use a different tool but our examples are based on
   Gpg4win, and utilize its bundled Kleopatra GUI.

   Download and install Gpg4win, and then load Kleopatra. The
   dialog should look similar to:

   Figure 2.1 Initial screen after loading Kleopatra
   Initial screen after loading Kleopatra

   Next, add the MySQL Release Engineering certificate. Do this
   by clicking File, Lookup Certificates on Server. Type "Mysql
   Release Engineering" into the search box and press Search.

   Figure 2.2 Finding the MySQL Release Engineering certificate
   Finding the MySQL Release Engineering certificate

   Select the "MySQL Release Engineering" certificate. The
   Fingerprint and Key-ID must be "5072E1F5", or choose
   Details... to confirm the certificate is valid. Now, import
   it by clicking Import. An import dialog will be displayed,
   choose Okay, and this certificate will now be listed under
   the Imported Certificates tab.

   Next, configure the trust level for our certificate. Select
   our certificate, then from the main menu select Certificates,
   Change Owner Trust.... We suggest choosing I believe checks
   are very accurate for our certificate, as otherwise you might
   not be able to verify our signature. Select I believe checks
   are very accurate and then press OK.

   Figure 2.3 Changing the Trust level
   Changing the Trust level

   Next, verify the downloaded MySQL package file. This requires
   files for both the packaged file, and the signature. The
   signature file must have the same name as the packaged file
   but with an appended .asc extension, as shown by the example
   in the following table. The signature is linked to on the
   downloads page for each MySQL product. You must create the
   .asc file with this signature.

   Table 2.2 MySQL Package and Signature Files for MySQL
   Installer for Microsoft Windows
       File Type                    File Name
   Distribution file mysql-installer-community-5.6.25.msi
   Signature file    mysql-installer-community-5.6.25.msi.asc

   Make sure that both files are stored in the same directory
   and then run the following command to verify the signature
   for the distribution file. Either drag and drop the signature
   (.asc) file into Kleopatra, or load the dialog from File,
   Decrypt/Verify Files..., and then choose either the .msi or
   .asc file.

   Figure 2.4 The Decrypt/Verify Files dialog
   The Decrypt/Verify Files dialog

   Click Decrypt/Verify to check the file. The two most common
   results will look like the following, and although the yellow
   warning looks problematic, the following means that the file
   check passed with success. You may now run this installer.

   Figure 2.5 The Decrypt/Verify Results: Good
   The Decrypt/Verify Results: Good

   Seeing a red "The signature is bad" error means the file is
   invalid. Do not execute the MSI file if you see this error.

   Figure 2.6 The Decrypt/Verify Results: Bad
   The Decrypt/Verify Results: Bad

   The Section 2.1.3.2, "Signature Checking Using GnuPG" section
   explains why you probably don't see a green Good signature
   result.

2.1.3.4 Signature Checking Using RPM

   For RPM packages, there is no separate signature. RPM
   packages have a built-in GPG signature and MD5 checksum. You
   can verify a package by running the following command:
shell> rpm --checksig package_name.rpm

   Example:
shell> rpm --checksig MySQL-server-5.6.25-0.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
MySQL-server-5.6.25-0.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm: md5 gpg OK

   Note

   If you are using RPM 4.1 and it complains about (GPG) NOT OK
   (MISSING KEYS: GPG#5072e1f5), even though you have imported
   the MySQL public build key into your own GPG keyring, you
   need to import the key into the RPM keyring first. RPM 4.1 no
   longer uses your personal GPG keyring (or GPG itself).
   Rather, RPM maintains a separate keyring because it is a
   system-wide application and a user's GPG public keyring is a
   user-specific file. To import the MySQL public key into the
   RPM keyring, first obtain the key, then use rpm --import to
   import the key. For example:
shell> gpg --export -a 5072e1f5 > 5072e1f5.asc
shell> rpm --import 5072e1f5.asc

   Alternatively, rpm also supports loading the key directly
   from a URL, and you can use this manual page:
shell> rpm --import doc/refman/5.6/en/checking-gpg-signature.html

   If you need to obtain the MySQL public key, see Section
   2.1.3.2, "Signature Checking Using GnuPG."

2.1.4 Installation Layouts

   The installation layout differs for different installation
   types (for example, native packages, binary tarballs, and
   source tarballs), which can lead to confusion when managing
   different systems or using different installation sources.
   The individual layouts are given in the corresponding
   installation type or platform chapter, as described
   following. Note that the layout of installations from vendors
   other than Oracle may differ from these layouts.

     * Section 2.3.1, "MySQL Installation Layout on Microsoft
       Windows"

     * Section 2.9.1, "MySQL Layout for Source Installation"

     * Section 2.2, "MySQL Installation Layout for Generic
       Unix/Linux Binary Package"

     * Section 2.5.5, "MySQL Installation Layout for Linux RPM
       Packages from the MySQL Developer Zone"

     * Section 2.4.2, "MySQL Installation Layout on OS X"

2.1.5 Compiler-Specific Build Characteristics

   In some cases, the compiler used to build MySQL affects the
   features available for use. The notes in this section apply
   for binary distributions provided by Oracle Corporation or
   that you compile yourself from source.

   icc (Intel C++ Compiler) Builds

   A server built with icc has these characteristics:

     * SSL support is not included.

2.2 Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic Binaries

   Oracle provides a set of binary distributions of MySQL. These
   include generic binary distributions in the form of
   compressed tar files (files with a .tar.gz extension) for a
   number of platforms, and binaries in platform-specific
   package formats for selected platforms.

   This section covers the installation of MySQL from a
   compressed tar file binary distribution. For other
   platform-specific package formats, see the other
   platform-specific sections. For example, for Windows
   distributions, see Section 2.3, "Installing MySQL on
   Microsoft Windows."

   To obtain MySQL, see Section 2.1.2, "How to Get MySQL."

   MySQL compressed tar file binary distributions have names of
   the form mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz, where VERSION is a number
   (for example, 5.6.25), and OS indicates the type of operating
   system for which the distribution is intended (for example,
   pc-linux-i686 or winx64).
   Warning

   If you have previously installed MySQL using your operating
   system native package management system, such as yum or
   apt-get, you may experience problems installing using a
   native binary. Make sure your previous MySQL installation has
   been removed entirely (using your package management system),
   and that any additional files, such as old versions of your
   data files, have also been removed. You should also check for
   configuration files such as /etc/my.cnf or the /etc/mysql
   directory and delete them.

   For information about replacing third-party packages with
   official MySQL packages, see the related Apt guide
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-apt-repo-quick-guide/en/) or
   Yum guide.
   Warning

   MySQL has a dependency on the libaio library. The
   mysql_install_db and subsequent mysqld_safe steps will fail
   if this library is not installed locally. If necessary,
   install it using the appropriate package manager. For
   example, on Yum-based systems:
shell> yum search libaio  # search for info
shell> yum install libaio # install library

   Or, on APT-based systems:
shell> apt-cache search libaio # search for info
shell> apt-get install libaio1 # install library

   If you run into problems and need to file a bug report,
   please use the instructions in Section 1.7, "How to Report
   Bugs or Problems."

   On Unix, to install a compressed tar file binary
   distribution, unpack it at the installation location you
   choose (typically /usr/local/mysql). This creates the
   directories shown in the following table.

   Table 2.3 MySQL Installation Layout for Generic Unix/Linux
   Binary Package
   Directory Contents of Directory
   bin, scripts mysqld server, client and utility programs
   data Log files, databases
   docs MySQL manual in Info format
   man Unix manual pages
   include Include (header) files
   lib Libraries
   share Miscellaneous support files, including error messages,
   sample configuration files, SQL for database installation
   sql-bench Benchmarks

   Debug versions of the mysqld binary are available as
   mysqld-debug. To compile your own debug version of MySQL from
   a source distribution, use the appropriate configuration
   options to enable debugging support. See Section 2.9,
   "Installing MySQL from Source."

   To install and use a MySQL binary distribution, the command
   sequence looks like this:
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -r -g mysql mysql
shell> cd /usr/local
shell> tar zxvf /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz
shell> ln -s full-path-to-mysql-VERSION-OS mysql
shell> cd mysql
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql data
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &
# Next command is optional
shell> cp support-files/mysql.server /etc/init.d/mysql.server

   Note

   This procedure assumes that you have root (administrator)
   access to your system. Alternatively, you can prefix each
   command using the sudo (Linux) or pfexec (OpenSolaris)
   command.
   Note

   The procedure does not assign passwords to MySQL accounts. To
   do so, use the instructions in Section 2.10.4, "Securing the
   Initial MySQL Accounts."

   As of MySQL 5.6.8, mysql_install_db creates a default option
   file named my.cnf in the base installation directory. This
   file is created from a template included in the distribution
   package named my-default.cnf. For more information, see
   Section 5.1.2.2, "Using a Sample Default Server Configuration
   File."

   A more detailed version of the preceding description for
   installing a binary distribution follows.

Create a mysql User and Group

   If your system does not already have a user and group to use
   for running mysqld, you may need to create one. The following
   commands add the mysql group and the mysql user. You might
   want to call the user and group something else instead of
   mysql. If so, substitute the appropriate name in the
   following instructions. The syntax for useradd and groupadd
   may differ slightly on different versions of Unix, or they
   may have different names such as adduser and addgroup.
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -r -g mysql mysql

   Note

   Because the user is required only for ownership purposes, not
   login purposes, the useradd command uses the -r option to
   create a user that does not have login permissions to your
   server host. Omit this option to permit logins for the user,
   or if your useradd does not support the option.

Obtain and Unpack the Distribution

   Pick the directory under which you want to unpack the
   distribution and change location into it. The example here
   unpacks the distribution under /usr/local. The instructions,
   therefore, assume that you have permission to create files
   and directories in /usr/local. If that directory is
   protected, you must perform the installation as root.
shell> cd /usr/local

   Obtain a distribution file using the instructions in Section
   2.1.2, "How to Get MySQL." For a given release, binary
   distributions for all platforms are built from the same MySQL
   source distribution.

   Unpack the distribution, which creates the installation
   directory. Then create a symbolic link to that directory. tar
   can uncompress and unpack the distribution if it has z option
   support:
shell> tar zxvf /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz
shell> ln -s full-path-to-mysql-VERSION-OS mysql

   The tar command creates a directory named mysql-VERSION-OS.
   The ln command makes a symbolic link to that directory. This
   enables you to refer more easily to the installation
   directory as /usr/local/mysql.

   To install MySQL from a compressed tar file binary
   distribution, your system must have GNU gunzip to uncompress
   the distribution and a reasonable tar to unpack it. If your
   tar program supports the z option, it can both uncompress and
   unpack the file.

   GNU tar is known to work. The standard tar provided with some
   operating systems is not able to unpack the long file names
   in the MySQL distribution. You should download and install
   GNU tar, or if available, use a preinstalled version of GNU
   tar. Usually this is available as gnutar, gtar, or as tar
   within a GNU or Free Software directory, such as /usr/sfw/bin
   or /usr/local/bin. GNU tar is available from
   http://www.gnu.org/software/tar/.

   If your tar does not have z option support, use gunzip to
   unpack the distribution and tar to unpack it. Replace the
   preceding tar command with the following alternative command
   to uncompress and extract the distribution:
shell> gunzip < /path/to/mysql-VERSION-OS.tar.gz | tar xvf -

Perform Postinstallation Setup

   The remainder of the installation process involves setting
   distribution ownership and access permissions, initializing
   the data directory, starting the MySQL server, and setting up
   the configuration file. For instructions, see Section 2.10,
   "Postinstallation Setup and Testing."

2.3 Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows

   There are several different methods to install MySQL on
   Microsoft Windows.

Simple Installation Method

   The simplest and recommended method is to download MySQL
   Installer (for Windows) and let it install and configure all
   of the MySQL products on your system. Here is how:

     * Download MySQL Installer from
       http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/installer/ and execute it.
       Note
       Unlike the standard MySQL Installer, the smaller
       "web-community" version does not bundle any MySQL
       applications but it will download the MySQL products you
       choose to install.

     * Choose the appropriate Setup Type for your system.
       Typically you will choose Developer Default to install
       MySQL server and other MySQL tools related to MySQL
       development, helpful tools like MySQL Workbench. Or,
       choose the Custom setup type to manually select your
       desired MySQL products.
       Note
       Multiple versions of MySQL server can exist on a single
       system. You can choose one or multiple versions.

     * Complete the installation process by following the MySQL
       Installation wizard's instructions. This will install
       several MySQL products and start the MySQL server.

     * MySQL is now installed. You probably configured MySQL as
       a service that will automatically start MySQL server
       every time you restart your system.

   Note

   You probably also installed other helpful MySQL products like
   MySQL Workbench and MySQL Notifier on your system. Consider
   loading Chapter 26, "MySQL Workbench" to check your new MySQL
   server connection, and Section 2.3.4, "MySQL Notifier" to
   view the connection's status. By default, these two programs
   automatically start after installing MySQL.

   This process also installs the MySQL Installer application on
   your system, and later you can use MySQL Installer to upgrade
   or reconfigure your MySQL products.

Additional Installation Information

   MySQL is available for Microsoft Windows, for both 32-bit and
   64-bit versions. For supported Windows platform information,
   see
   http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms/database.html
   .

   It is possible to run MySQL as a standard application or as a
   Windows service. By using a service, you can monitor and
   control the operation of the server through the standard
   Windows service management tools. For more information, see
   Section 2.3.5.7, "Starting MySQL as a Windows Service."

   Generally, you should install MySQL on Windows using an
   account that has administrator rights. Otherwise, you may
   encounter problems with certain operations such as editing
   the PATH environment variable or accessing the Service
   Control Manager. Once installed, MySQL does not need to be
   executed using a user with Administrator privileges.

   For a list of limitations on the use of MySQL on the Windows
   platform, see Section D.10.6, "Windows Platform Limitations."

   In addition to the MySQL Server package, you may need or want
   additional components to use MySQL with your application or
   development environment. These include, but are not limited
   to:

     * To connect to the MySQL server using ODBC, you must have
       a Connector/ODBC driver. For more information, including
       installation and configuration instructions, see MySQL
       Connector/ODBC Developer Guide
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/connector-odbc/en/index.html).
       Note
       MySQL Installer will install and configure Connector/ODBC
       for you.

     * To use MySQL server with .NET applications, you must have
       the Connector/Net driver. For more information, including
       installation and configuration instructions, see MySQL
       Connector/Net Developer Guide
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/connector-net/en/index.html).
       Note
       MySQL Installer will install and configure Connector/NET
       for you.

   MySQL distributions for Windows can be downloaded from
   http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/. See Section 2.1.2, "How to
   Get MySQL."

   MySQL for Windows is available in several distribution
   formats, detailed here. Generally speaking, you should use
   MySQL Installer. It contains more features and MySQL products
   than the older MSI, is simpler to use than the Zip file, and
   you need no additional tools to get MySQL up and running.
   MySQL Installer automatically installs MySQL Server and
   additional MySQL products, creates an options file, starts
   the server, and enables you to create default user accounts.
   For more information on choosing a package, see Section
   2.3.2, "Choosing An Installation Package."

     * A MySQL Installer distribution includes MySQL Server and
       additional MySQL products including MySQL Workbench,
       MySQL Notifier, and MySQL for Excel. MySQL Installer can
       also be used to upgrade these products in the future.
       For instructions on installing MySQL using MySQL
       Installer, see Section 2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on
       Microsoft Windows Using MySQL Installer."

     * The standard binary distribution (packaged as a Zip file)
       contains all of the necessary files that you unpack into
       your chosen location. This package contains all of the
       files in the full Windows MSI Installer package, but does
       not include an installation program.
       For instructions on installing MySQL using the Zip file,
       see Section 2.3.5, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows
       Using a noinstall Zip Archive."

     * The source distribution format contains all the code and
       support files for building the executables using the
       Visual Studio compiler system.
       For instructions on building MySQL from source on
       Windows, see Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL from Source."

   MySQL on Windows considerations:

     * Large Table Support
       If you need tables with a size larger than 4GB, install
       MySQL on an NTFS or newer file system. Do not forget to
       use MAX_ROWS and AVG_ROW_LENGTH when you create tables.
       See Section 13.1.17, "CREATE TABLE Syntax."

     * MySQL and Virus Checking Software
       Virus-scanning software such as Norton/Symantec
       Anti-Virus on directories containing MySQL data and
       temporary tables can cause issues, both in terms of the
       performance of MySQL and the virus-scanning software
       misidentifying the contents of the files as containing
       spam. This is due to the fingerprinting mechanism used by
       the virus-scanning software, and the way in which MySQL
       rapidly updates different files, which may be identified
       as a potential security risk.
       After installing MySQL Server, it is recommended that you
       disable virus scanning on the main directory (datadir)
       used to store your MySQL table data. There is usually a
       system built into the virus-scanning software to enable
       specific directories to be ignored.
       In addition, by default, MySQL creates temporary files in
       the standard Windows temporary directory. To prevent the
       temporary files also being scanned, configure a separate
       temporary directory for MySQL temporary files and add
       this directory to the virus scanning exclusion list. To
       do this, add a configuration option for the tmpdir
       parameter to your my.ini configuration file. For more
       information, see Section 2.3.5.2, "Creating an Option
       File."

2.3.1 MySQL Installation Layout on Microsoft Windows

   For MySQL 5.6 on Windows, the default installation directory
   is C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6. Some Windows
   users prefer to install in C:\mysql, the directory that
   formerly was used as the default. However, the layout of the
   subdirectories remains the same.

   All of the files are located within this parent directory,
   using the structure shown in the following table.

   Table 2.4 Default MySQL Installation Layout for Microsoft
   Windows
   Directory Contents of Directory Notes
   bin, scripts mysqld server, client and utility programs
   %ALLUSERSPROFILE%\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\ Log files,
   databases (Windows XP, Windows Server 2003) The Windows
   system variable %ALLUSERSPROFILE% defaults to C:\Documents
   and Settings\All Users\Application Data
   %PROGRAMDATA%\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\ Log files, databases
   (Vista, Windows 7, Windows Server 2008, and newer) The
   Windows system variable %PROGRAMDATA% defaults to
   C:\ProgramData
   examples Example programs and scripts
   include Include (header) files
   lib Libraries
   share Miscellaneous support files, including error messages,
   character set files, sample configuration files, SQL for
   database installation

   If you install MySQL using the MySQL Installer, this package
   creates and sets up the data directory that the installed
   server will use, and also creates a pristine "template" data
   directory named data under the installation directory. After
   an installation has been performed using this package, the
   template data directory can be copied to set up additional
   MySQL instances. See Section 5.3, "Running Multiple MySQL
   Instances on One Machine."

2.3.2 Choosing An Installation Package

   For MySQL 5.6, there are installation package formats to
   choose from when installing MySQL on Windows:

     * MySQL Installer: This package has a file name similar to
       mysql-installer-community-5.6.25.0.msi or
       mysql-installer-commercial-5.6.25.0.msi, and utilizes
       MSIs to automatically install MySQL server and other
       products. It will download and apply updates to itself,
       and for each of the installed products. It also
       configures the additional non-server products.
       The installed products are configurable, and this
       includes: documentation with samples and examples,
       connectors (such as C, C++, J, NET, and ODBC), MySQL
       Workbench, MySQL Notifier, MySQL for Excel, and the MySQL
       Server with its components.
       MySQL Installer will run on all Windows platforms that
       are supported by MySQL (see
       http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms/database.
       html).
       Note
       Because MySQL Installer is not a native component of
       Microsoft Windows and depends on .NET, it will not work
       on minimal installation options like the "Server Core"
       version of Windows Server 2008.
       For instructions on installing MySQL using MySQL
       Installer, see Section 2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on
       Microsoft Windows Using MySQL Installer."

     * The Noinstall Archive: This package has a file name
       similar to mysql-5.6.25-win32.zip or
       mysql-5.6.25-winx64.zip, and contains all the files found
       in the Complete install package, with the exception of
       the GUI. This package does not include an automated
       installer, and must be manually installed and configured.

   MySQL Installer is recommended for most users.

   Your choice of install package affects the installation
   process you must follow. If you choose to use MySQL
   Installer, see Section 2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft
   Windows Using MySQL Installer." If you choose to install a
   Noinstall archive, see Section 2.3.5, "Installing MySQL on
   Microsoft Windows Using a noinstall Zip Archive."

2.3.3 Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows Using MySQL Installer

   MySQL Installer simplifies the installation and updating
   process for your MySQL products on Microsoft Windows. From
   this central application, you can view, remove, update, and
   reconfigure the existing MySQL products on your system. MySQL
   Installer can also install plugins, documentation, tutorials,
   and example databases. The MySQL Installer is only available
   for Microsoft Windows, and includes both GUI and command-line
   interfaces.

   The supported products include:

     * MySQL server (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/) (one or multiple
       versions)

     * MySQL Workbench

     * MySQL Connectors
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/index-connectors.html) (.Net /
       Python / ODBC / Java / C / C++)

     * MySQL Notifier

     * MySQL for Excel
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-for-excel/en/index.html)

     * MySQL for Visual Studio
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/connector-net/en/connector-net-
       visual-studio.html)

     * MySQL Utilities and MySQL Fabric
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/index-utils-fabric.html)

     * MySQL Samples and Examples

     * MySQL Documentation

     * MySQL Installer is also installed and remains on the
       system as its own application

Installer package types


     * Full: Bundles all of the MySQL products (including the
       MySQL server). The file' size is over 200MB, and its name
       has the form mysql-installer-community-VERSION.N.msi
       where VERSION is the MySQL Server version number such as
       5.6 and N is the package number, which begins at 0.

     * Web: Only contains the Installer and configuration files,
       and it only downloads the MySQL products you choose to
       install. The size of this file is about 2MB; the name of
       the file has the form
       mysql-installer-community-web-VERSION.N.msi where VERSION
       is the MySQL Server version number such as 5.6 and N is
       the package number, which begins at 0.

Installer editions


     * Community edition: Downloadable at
       http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/installer/. It installs
       the community edition of all MySQL products.

     * Commercial edition: Downloadable at either My Oracle
       Support (https://support.oracle.com/) (MOS) or
       https://edelivery.oracle.com/. It installs the commercial
       version of all MySQL products, including Workbench SE/EE.
       It also integrates with your MOS account.
       Note
       Entering your MOS credentials is optional when installing
       bundled MySQL products, but your credentials are required
       when choosing non-bundled MySQL products that MySQL
       Installer must download.

   For notes detailing the changes in each release of MySQL
   Installer, see MySQL Installer Release Notes
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/relnotes/mysql-installer/en/).

   MySQL Installer is compatible with pre-existing
   installations, and adds them to its list of installed
   components. While the standard MySQL Installer is bundled
   with a specific version of MySQL Server, a single MySQL
   Installer instance can install and manage multiple MySQL
   Server versions. For example, a single MySQL Installer
   instance can install (and update) versions 5.5, 5.6, and 5.7
   on the host.
   Note

   A single host can not have both community and commercial
   editions of MySQL Server installed. For example, if you want
   both MySQL Server 5.5 and 5.6 installed on a single host,
   then both must be the same edition.

   MySQL Installer handles the initial configuration and set up
   of the applications. For example:

    1. It creates initial MySQL Server connections in MySQL
       Workbench.

    2. It creates the configuration file (my.ini) that is used
       to configure the MySQL Server. The values written to this
       file are influenced by choices you make during the
       installation process.

    3. It can optionally import example databases.

    4. It can optionally create MySQL Server user accounts with
       configurable permissions based on general roles, such as
       DB Administrator, DB Designer, and Backup Admin. It
       optionally creates a Windows user named MysqlSys with
       limited privileges, which would then run the MySQL
       Server.
       User accounts may also be added and configured in MySQL
       Workbench.

    5. If the "Advanced Configuration" option is checked, then
       the Logging Options are also configured. This includes
       defining file paths for the error log, general log, slow
       query log (including the configuration of seconds it
       requires to execute a query), and the binary log.

   MySQL Installer can optionally check for updated components
   and download them for you.

2.3.3.1 MySQL Installer GUI

   Installing MySQL Installer adds a link to the Start menu
   under the MySQL group. Click Start, All Programs MySQL, MySQL
   Installer to reload the MySQL Installer GUI.
   Note

   Files that are generated by MySQL Installer grant full
   permissions to the user that executes MySQL Installer,
   including my.ini. This does not apply to files and
   directories for specific products such as the MySQL Server
   data directory in %ProgramData% that is owned by SYSTEM.

   The initial execution of MySQL Installer requires you to
   accept the license agreement before installing MySQL
   products.

   Figure 2.7 MySQL Installer - License Agreement
   MySQL Installer - License Agreement

Installing New Packages

   Choose the appropriate Setup Type for your system. The
   selected type determines which MySQL products are installed
   on your system, or select Custom to manually choose
   individual products.

     * Developer: Install all products needed to develop
       applications with MySQL. This is the default option.

     * Server only: Only install the MySQL server.

     * Client only: Only install the MySQL client products,
       which does not include the MySQL server.

     * Full: Install all MySQL products.

     * Custom: Manually select the MySQL products to install.
       Note
       After the initial installation, you may use MySQL
       Installer to manually select MySQL products to install or
       remove. In other words, MySQL Installer becomes a MySQL
       product management system.

   Figure 2.8 MySQL Installer - Choosing a Setup Type
   MySQL Installer - Choosing a Setup Type

   After you select a setup type, the MySQL Installer will check
   your system for the necessary external requirements for each
   of the selected MySQL products. MySQL Installer will either
   download and install the missing components onto your system,
   or point you to the download location and set Status to
   "Manual".

   The next window lists the MySQL products that are scheduled
   to be installed:

   Figure 2.9 MySQL Installer - Installation Progress
   MySQL Installer - Installation Progress

   As components are installed, their Status changes from a
   progress percentage to "Complete".

   After all components are installed, the next step configures
   some of the recently installed MySQL products. The
   Configuration Overview window displays the progress and then
   loads a configuration window, if required. Our example
   configures MySQL Server 5.6.x.

Configuring MySQL Server

   Configuring the MySQL server begins with defining several
   Type and Networking options.

   Figure 2.10 MySQL Installer - Configuration Overview
   MySQL Installer - Configuration Overview

   Server Configuration Type

   Choose the MySQL server configuration type that describes
   your setup. This setting defines the amount of system
   resources that will be assigned to your MySQL server
   instance.

     * Developer: A machine that will host many other
       applications, and typically this is your personal
       workstation. This option configures MySQL to use the
       least amount of memory.

     * Server: Several other applications will be running on
       this machine, such as a web server. This option
       configures MySQL to use a medium amount of memory.

     * Dedicated: A machine that is dedicated to running the
       MySQL server. Because no other major applications are
       running on the server, such as web servers, this option
       configures MySQL to use all available memory.

   Connectivity

   Connectivity options control how you will connect to MySQL.
   Options include:

     * TCP/IP: You may enable TCP/IP Networking here as
       otherwise only localhost connections are allowed. Also
       define the Port Number and whether to open the firewall
       port for network access.

     * Named Pipe: Enable and define the pipe name, similar to
       using the --enable-named-pipe option.

     * Shared Memory: Enable and then define the memory name,
       similar to using the --shared-memory option.

   Advanced Configuration

   Checking the "Advanced Configuration" option provides
   additional Logging Options to configure. This includes
   defining file paths for the error log, general log, slow
   query log (including the configuration of seconds it requires
   to execute a query), and the binary log.

   Figure 2.11 MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration:
   Type and Networking
   MySQL Installer- MySQL Server Configuration: Type and
   Networking

Accounts and Roles

   Next, define your MySQL account information. Assigning a root
   password is required.

   Optionally, you can add additional MySQL user accounts with
   predefined user roles. Each predefined role, such as "DB
   Admin", are configured with their own set of privileges. For
   example, the "DB Admin" role has more privileges than the "DB
   Designer" role. Click the Role dropdown for a list of role
   descriptions.
   Note

   If the MySQL Server is already installed, then you must also
   enter the Current Root Password.

   Figure 2.12 MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration:
   User Accounts and Roles
   MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration: User Accounts
   and Roles

   Figure 2.13 MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration:
   User Accounts and Roles: Adding a User
   MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration: User Accounts
   and Roles: Adding a User

Windows Service

   Next, configure the Windows Service details. This includes
   the service name, whether the MySQL Server should be loaded
   at startup, and how the Windows Service for MySQL Server is
   executed.

   Figure 2.14 MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration:
   Windows Service
   MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration: Windows Service
   Note

   When configuring Run Windows Services as ... using a Custom
   User, the custom user must have privileges to log on to
   Microsoft Windows as a service. And the Next button will be
   disabled until this user is configured with these user
   rights.

   On Microsoft Windows 7, this is configured by loading the
   Start Menu, Control Panel, Administrative Tools, Local
   Security Policy, Local Policies, User Rights Assignment, then
   Log On As A Service. Choose Add User or Group here to add the
   custom user, and then OK, OK to save.

Advanced Options

   The next configuration step is available if the Advanced
   Configuration option was checked. This section includes
   options that are related to the MySQL log files:

   Figure 2.15 MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration:
   Logging Options
   MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration: Logging Options

   Click Next to continue on to the final page before all of the
   requested changes are applied. This Apply Server
   Configuration page details the configuration steps that will
   be performed.

   Figure 2.16 MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration:
   Apply Server Configuration
   MySQL Installer - MySQL Server Configuration: Apply Server
   Configuration

   Click Execute to execute the configuration steps. The icon
   for each step toggles from white to green on success, or the
   process stops on failure. Click the Log tab to view the log.

   After the MySQL Installer configuration process is finished,
   MySQL Installer reloads the opening page where you can
   execute other installation and configuration related actions.

   MySQL Installer is added to the Microsoft Windows Start menu
   under the MySQL group. Opening MySQL Installer loads its
   dashboard where installed MySQL products are listed, and
   other MySQL Installer actions are available:

   Figure 2.17 MySQL Installer - Main Dashboard
   MySQL Installer - Main Dashboard

Adding MySQL Products

   Click Add to add new products. This loads the Select Products
   and Features page:

   Figure 2.18 MySQL Installer - Select Products and Features
   MySQL Installer - Select Products and Features

   From here, choose the MySQL products you want to install from
   the left Available Products pane, and then click the green
   right arrow to queue products for installation.

   Optionally, click Edit to open the product and features
   search filter:

   Figure 2.19 MySQL Installer - Select Products and Features
   Filter
   MySQL Installer - Select Products and Features Filter

   For example, you might choose to include Pre-Release products
   in your selections, such as a Beta product that has not yet
   reached GA status.
   Note

   The ability to install Pre-Release versions of MySQL products
   was added in MySQL Installer 1.4.0.

   Select all of the MySQL products you want to install, then
   click Next to continue, and then Execute to execute the
   installation process to install all of the selected products.

2.3.3.1.1 MySQL Product Catalog

   MySQL Installer stores a MySQL product catalog. The catalog
   can be updated either manually or automatically, and the
   catalog change history is also available.
   Note

   The MySQL product catalog was added in MySQL Installer 1.4.0.

   Manual updates

   You can update the MySQL product catalog at any time by
   clicking Catalog on the Installer dashboard.

   Figure 2.20 MySQL Installer - Open the MySQL Product Catalog
   MySQL Installer - Open the MySQL Product Catalog

   From there, click Execute to update the product catalog.

   Automatic updates

   You can configure MySQL Installer to automatically update the
   MySQL product catalog once per day. To enable this feature
   and set the update time, click the wrench icon on the
   Installer dashboard.

   The next window configures the Automatic Catalog Update.
   Enable or disable this feature, and also set the hour.

   Figure 2.21 MySQL Installer - Configure the Catalog Scheduler
   MySQL Installer - Configure the Catalog Scheduler

   This option uses the Windows Task Scheduler to schedule a
   task named "ManifestUpdate".

   Change History

   MySQL Installer tracks the change history for all of the
   MySQL products. Click Catalog from the dashboard, optionally
   update the catalog (or, toggle the Do not update at this time
   checkbox), click Next/Execute, and then view the change
   history.

   Figure 2.22 MySQL Installer - Catalog Change History
   MySQL Installer - Catalog Change History

2.3.3.1.2 Remove MySQL Products

   MySQL Installer can also remove MySQL products from your
   system. To remove a MySQL product, click Remove from the
   Installer dashboard. This opens a window with a list of
   installed MySQL products. Select the MySQL products you want
   to remove (uninstall), and then click Execute to begin the
   removal process.
   Note

   To select all MySQL products, click the [ ] checkbox to the
   left of the Product label.

   Figure 2.23 MySQL Installer - Removing Products: Select
   MySQL Installer - Removing Products: Select

   Figure 2.24 MySQL Installer - Removing Products: Executed
   MySQL Installer - Removing Products: Executed

2.3.3.1.3 Alter MySQL Products

   Use MySQL Installer to modify, configure, or upgrade your
   MySQL product installations.

Upgrade

   Upgradable MySQL products are listed on the main dashboard
   with an arrow icon ( [wb-icon-upgrade-arrow.png] ) next to
   their version number.

   Figure 2.25 MySQL Installer - Upgrade a MySQL Product
   MySQL Installer - Upgrade a MySQL Product
   Note

   The "upgrade" functionality requires a current product
   catalog. This catalog is updated either manually or
   automatically (daily) by enabling the Automatic Catalog
   Update feature. For additional information, see Section
   2.3.3.1.1, "MySQL Product Catalog."

   Click Upgrade to upgrade the available products. Our example
   indicates that MySQL Workbench 6.2.4 can be upgraded version
   6.3.1 or 6.2.5, and MySQL server from 5.5.41 to 5.5.42.

   Figure 2.26 MySQL Installer - Select Products To Upgrade
   MySQL Installer - Select Products To Upgrade

   If multiple upgrade versions are available (such as our MySQL
   Workbench example above), select the desired version for the
   upgrade in the Available Upgrades area.
   Note

   Optionally, click the Changes link to view the version's
   release notes.

   After selecting (checking) the products and versions to
   upgrade, click Next to begin the upgrade process.

   Figure 2.27 MySQL Installer - Apply Updates
   MySQL Installer - Apply Updates

   A MySQL server upgrade will also check and upgrade the
   server's database. Although optional, this step is
   recommended.

   Figure 2.28 MySQL Installer - Check and Upgrade Database
   MySQL Installer - Check and Upgrade Database

   Upon completion, your upgraded products will be upgraded and
   available to use. A MySQL server upgrade also restarts the
   MySQL server.

Reconfigure

   Some MySQL products, such as the MySQL server, include a
   Reconfigure option. It opens the same configuration options
   that were set when the MySQL product was installed, and is
   pre-populated with the current values.

   To execute, click the Reconfigure link under the Quick Action
   column on the main dashboard for the MySQL product that you
   want to reconfigure.

   Figure 2.29 MySQL Installer - Reconfigure a MySQL Product
   MySQL Installer - Reconfigure a MySQL Product

   In the case of the MySQL server, this opens the familiar
   configuration wizard.

   Figure 2.30 MySQL Installer - Reconfiguration Wizard
   MySQL Installer - Reconfiguration Wizard

Modify

   Many MySQL products contain feature components that can be
   added or removed. For example, Debug binaries and Client
   Programs are subcomponents of the MySQL server.

   The modify the features of a product, click Modify on the
   main dashboard.

   Figure 2.31 MySQL Installer - Modify Product Features
   MySQL Installer - Modify Product Features

   Click Execute to execute the modification request.

2.3.3.2 MySQL Installer Console

   MySQLInstallerConsole provides functionality similar to the
   GUI version of MySQL Installer, but from the command-line. It
   is installed when MySQL Installer is initially executed, and
   then available within the MySQL Installer directory.
   Typically that is in C:\Program Files (x86)\MySQL\MySQL
   Installer\, and the console must be executed with
   administrative privileges.

   To use, invoke the Command Prompt with administrative
   privileges by choosing Start, Accessories, then right-click
   on Command Prompt and choose Run as administrator. And from
   the command-line, optionally change the directory to where
   MySQLInstallerConsole is located:
C:\> cd "C:\Program Files (x86)\MySQL\MySQL Installer"
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole.exe help

C:\Program Files (x86)\MySQL\MySQL Installer for Windows>MySQLInstalle
rConsole.exe help

The following commands are available:

Configure - Configures one or more of your installed programs.
Help      - Provides list of available commands.
Install   - Install and configure one or more available MySQL programs
.
List      - Provides an interactive way to list all products available
.
Modify    - Modifies the features of installed products.
Remove    - Removes one or more products from your system.
Status    - Shows the status of all installed products.
Update    - Update the current product catalog.
Upgrade   - Upgrades one or more of your installed programs.

   MySQLInstallerConsole supports the following options, which
   are specified on the command line:

     * configure [product1]:[setting]=[value];
       [product2]:[setting]=[value]; [...]
       Configure one or more MySQL products on your system.
       Switches include:

          + -showsettings : Displays the available options for
            the selected product, by passing in the product name
            after -showsettings.

          + -silent : Disable confirmation prompts.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole configure -showsettings server
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole configure server:port=3307


     * help [command]
       Displays a help message with usage examples, and then
       exits. Pass in an additional command to receive help
       specific to that command.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole help
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole help install


     * install [product]:[features]:[config block]:[config
       block]:[config block]; [...]
       Install one or more MySQL products on your system.
       Switches and syntax options include:

          + -type=[SetupType] : Installs a predefined set of
            software. The "SetupType" can be one of the
            following:
            Note
            Non-custom setup types can only be chosen if no
            other MySQL products are installed.
               o Developer: Installs a complete development
                 environment.
               o Server: Installs a single MySQL server
               o Client: Installs client programs and libraries
               o Full: Installs everything
               o Custom: Installs user selected products. This
                 is the default option.

          + -showsettings : Displays the available options for
            the selected product, by passing in the product name
            after -showsettings.

          + -silent : Disable confirmation prompts.

          + [config block]: One or more configuration blocks can
            be specified. Each configuration block is a
            semicolon separated list of key value pairs. A block
            can include either a "config" or "user" type key,
            where "config" is the default type if one is not
            defined.
            Only one "config" type block can be defined per
            product. A "user" block should be defined for each
            user that should be created during the product's
            installation.
            Note
            Adding users is not supported when a product is
            being reconfigured.

          + [feature]: The feature block is a semicolon
            separated list of features, or '*' to select all
            features.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole install server;5.6.22:*:port=3307;serverid=
2:type=user;username=foo;password=bar;role=DBManager
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole install server;5.6.22;x64 -silent


     * list
       Lists an interactive console where all of the available
       MySQL products can be searched. Execute
       MySQLInstallerConsole list to launch the console, and
       enter in a substring to search.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole list


     * modify [product1:-removelist|+addlist]
       [product2:-removelist|+addlist] [...]
       Modifies or displays features of a previously installed
       MySQL product.

          + -silent : Disable confirmation prompts.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole modify server
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole modify server:+documentation
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole modify server:-debug


     * remove [product1] [product2] [...]
       Removes one ore more products from your system.

          + * : Pass in * to remove all of the MySQL products.

          + -continue : Continue the operation even if an error
            occurs.

          + -silent : Disable confirmation prompts.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole remove *
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole remove server


     * status
       Provides a quick overview of the MySQL products that are
       installed on the system. Information includes product
       name and version, architecture, date installed, and
       install location.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole status


     * upgrade [product1:version] [product2:version], [...]
       Upgrades one or more products on your system. Syntax
       options include:

          + * : Pass in * to upgrade all products to the latest
            version, or pass in specific products.

          + ! : Pass in ! as a version number to upgrade the
            MySQL product to its latest version.

          + -silent : Disable confirmation prompts.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole upgrade *
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole upgrade workbench:6.2.2
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole upgrade workbench:!
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole upgrade workbench:6.2.2 excel:1.3.2


     * update
       Downloads the latest MySQL product catalog to your
       system. On success, the download catalog will be applied
       the next time either MySQLInstaller or
       MySQLInstallerConsole is executed.
C:\> MySQLInstallerConsole update

       Note
       The Automatic Catalog Update GUI option executes this
       command from the Windows Task Scheduler.

2.3.4 MySQL Notifier

   The MySQL Notifier is a tool that enables you to monitor and
   adjust the status of your local and remote MySQL Server
   instances through an indicator that resides in the system
   tray. The MySQL Notifier also gives quick access to several
   MySQL GUI tools (such as MySQL Workbench) through its context
   menu.

   The MySQL Notifier is installed by MySQL Installer, and (by
   default) will start-up when Microsoft Windows is started.
   Note

   To install, download and execute the MySQL Installer
   (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/installer/), be sure the
   MySQL Notifier product is selected, then proceed with the
   installation. See the MySQL Installer manual for additional
   details.

   For notes detailing the changes in each release of MySQL
   Notifier, see the MySQL Notifier Release Notes
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/relnotes/mysql-notifier/en/).

   Visit the MySQL Notifier forum
   (http://forums.mysql.com/list.php?173) for additional MySQL
   Notifier help and support.

   Features include:

     * Start, Stop, and Restart instances of the MySQL Server.

     * Automatically detects (and adds) new MySQL Server
       services. These are listed under Manage Monitored Items,
       and may also be configured.

     * The Tray icon changes, depending on the status. It's
       green if all monitored MySQL Server instances are
       running, or red if at least one service is stopped. The
       Update MySQL Notifier tray icon based on service status
       option, which dictates this behavior, is enabled by
       default for each service.

     * Links to other applications like MySQL Workbench, MySQL
       Installer, and the MySQL Utilities. For example, choosing
       Configure Instance will load the MySQL Workbench Server
       Administration window for that particular instance.

     * If MySQL Workbench is also installed, then the Configure
       Instance and SQL Editor options are available for local
       (but not remote) MySQL instances.

     * Monitoring of both local and remote MySQL instances.

   Note

   Remote monitoring is available since MySQL Notifier 1.1.0.

   The MySQL Notifier resides in the system tray and provides
   visual status information for your MySQL Server instances. A
   green icon is displayed at the top left corner of the tray
   icon if the current MySQL Server is running, or a red icon if
   the service is stopped.

   The MySQL Notifier automatically adds discovered MySQL
   Services on the local machine, and each service is saved and
   configurable. By default, the Automatically add new services
   whose name contains option is enabled and set to mysql.
   Related Notifications Options include being notified when new
   services are either discovered or experience status changes,
   and are also enabled by default. And uninstalling a service
   will also remove the service from the MySQL Notifier.
   Note

   The Automatically add new services whose name contains option
   default changed from ".*mysqld.*" to "mysql" in Notifier
   1.1.0.

   Clicking the system tray icon will reveal several options, as
   seen in the screenshots below:

   The Service Instance menu is the main MySQL Notifier window,
   and enables you to Stop, Start, and Restart the MySQL Server.

   Figure 2.32 MySQL Notifier Service Instance menu
   MySQL Notifier Service Instance menu

   The Actions menu includes several links to external
   applications (if they are installed), and a Refresh Status
   option to manually refresh the status of all monitored
   services (in both local and remote computers) and MySQL
   instances.
   Note

   The main menu will not show the Actions menu when there are
   no services being monitored by MySQL Notifier.
   Note

   The Refresh Status feature is available since MySQL Notifier
   1.1.0.

   Figure 2.33 MySQL Notifier Actions menu
   MySQL Notifier Actions menu

   The Actions, Options menu configures MySQL Notifier and
   includes options to:

     * Use colorful status icons: Enables a colorful style of
       icons for the tray of the MySQL Notifier.

     * Run at Windows Startup: Allows the application to be
       loaded when Microsoft Windows starts.

     * Automatically Check For Updates Every # Weeks: Checks for
       a new version of MySQL Notifier, and runs this check
       every # weeks.

     * Automatically add new services whose name contains: The
       text used to filter services and add them automatically
       to the monitored list of the local computer running MySQL
       Notifier, and on remote computers already monitoring
       Windows services. monitored services, and also filters
       the list of the Microsoft Windows services for the Add
       New Service dialog.
       Prior to version 1.1.0, this option was named
       "Automatically add new services that match this pattern."

     * Notify me when a service is automatically added: Will
       display a balloon notification from the taskbar when a
       newly discovered service is added to the monitored
       services list.

     * Notify me when a service changes status: Will display a
       balloon notification from the taskbar when a monitored
       service changes its status.

   Figure 2.34 MySQL Notifier Options menu
   MySQL Notifier Options menu

   The Actions, Manage Monitored Items menu enables you to
   configure the monitored services and MySQL instances. First,
   with the Services tab open:

   Figure 2.35 MySQL Notifier Manage Services menu
   MySQL Notifier Manage Services menu

   The Instances tab is similar:

   Figure 2.36 MySQL Notifier Manage Instances menu
   MySQL Notifier Manage Instances menu

   Adding a service or instance (after clicking Add in the
   Manage Monitored Items window) enables you to select a
   running Microsoft Windows service or instance connection, and
   configure MySQL Notifier to monitor it. Add a new service or
   instance by clicking service name from the list, then OK to
   accept. Multiple services and instances may be selected.

   Figure 2.37 MySQL Notifier Adding new services
   MySQL Notifier Adding new services

   And instances:

   Figure 2.38 MySQL Notifier Adding new instances
   MySQL Notifier Adding new instances
   Note

   The Instances tab available since MySQL Notifier 1.1.0.

2.3.4.1 Remote monitoring set up and installation instructions

   The MySQL Notifier uses Windows Management Instrumentation
   (WMI) to manage and monitor services in remote computers
   running Windows XP or later. This guide explains how it
   works, and how to set up your system to monitor remote MySQL
   instances.
   Note

   Remote monitoring is available since MySQL Notifier 1.1.0.

   In order to configure WMI, it is important to understand that
   the underlying Distributed Component Object Model (DCOM)
   architecture is doing the WMI work. Specifically, MySQL
   Notifier is using asynchronous notification queries on remote
   Microsoft Windows hosts as .NET events. These events send an
   asynchronous callback to the computer running the MySQL
   Notifier so it knows when a service status has changed on the
   remote computer. Asynchronous notifications offer the best
   performance compared to semisynchronous notifications or
   synchronous notifications that use timers.

   Asynchronous notifications requires the remote computer to
   send a callback to the client computer (thus opening a
   reverse connection), so the Windows Firewall and DCOM
   settings must be properly configured for the communication to
   function properly.

   Figure 2.39 MySQL Notifier Distributed Component Object Model
   (DCOM)
   MySQL Notifier Distributed Component Object Model (DCOM)

   Most of the common errors thrown by asynchronous WMI
   notifications are related to Windows Firewall blocking the
   communication, or to DCOM / WMI settings not being set up
   properly. For a list of common errors with solutions, see
   Section 2.3.4.1, "."

   The following steps are required to make WMI function. These
   steps are divided between two machines. A single host
   computer that runs MySQL Notifier (Computer A), and multiple
   remote machines that are being monitored (Computer B).

Computer running MySQL Notifier (Computer A)


    1. Allow for remote administration by either editing the
       Group Policy Editor, or using NETSH:
       Using the Group Policy Editor:
         a. Click Start, click Run, type GPEDIT.MSC, and then
            click OK.
         b. Under the Local Computer Policy heading,
            double-click Computer Configuration.
         c. Double-click Administrative Templates, then Network,
            Network Connections, and then Windows Firewall.
         d. If the computer is in the domain, then double-click
            Domain Profile; otherwise, double-click Standard
            Profile.
         e. Click Windows Firewall: Allow inbound remote
            administration exception.
         f. On the Action menu either select Edit, or
            double-click the selection from the previous step.
         g. Check the Enabled radio button, and then click OK.
       Using the NETSH command:
         a. Open a command prompt window with Administrative
            rights (you can right-click the Command Prompt icon
            and click Run as Administrator).
         b. Execute the following command:
NETSH firewall set service RemoteAdmin enable


    2. Open the DCOM port TCP 135:
         a. Open a command prompt window with Administrative
            rights (you can right-click the Command Prompt icon
            and click Run as Administrator) .
         b. Execute the following command:
NETSH firewall add portopening protocol=tcp port=135 name=DCOM_TCP135


    3. Add the client application which contains the sink for
       the callback (MySqlNotifier.exe) to the Windows Firewall
       Exceptions List (use either the Windows Firewall
       configuration or NETSH):
       Using the Windows Firewall configuration:
         a. In the Control Panel, double-click Windows Firewall.
         b. In the Windows Firewall window's left panel, click
            Allow a program or feature through Windows Firewall.
         c. In the Allowed Programs window, click Change
            Settings.
         d. If MySqlNotifier.exe is in the Allowed programs and
            features list, make sure it is checked for the type
            of networks the computer connects to (Private,
            Public or both).
         e. If MySqlNotifier.exe is not in the list, click Allow
            another program....
         f. In the Add a Program window, select the
            MySqlNotifier.exe if it exists in the Programs list,
            otherwise click Browse... and go to the directory
            where MySqlNotifier.exe was installed to select it,
            then click Add.
         g. Make sure MySqlNotifier.exe is checked for the type
            of networks the computer connects to (Private,
            Public or both).
       Using the NETSH command:
         a. Open a command prompt window with Administrative
            rights (you can right-click the Command Prompt icon
            and click Run as Administrator).
         b. Execute the following command, where you change
            "[YOUR_INSTALL_DIRECTORY]":
NETSH firewall add allowedprogram program=[YOUR_INSTALL_DIRECTORY]\MyS
qlNotifier.exe name=MySqlNotifier


    4. If Computer B is either a member of WORKGROUP or is in a
       different domain that is untrusted by Computer A, then
       the callback connection (Connection 2) is created as an
       Anonymous connection. To grant Anonymous connections DCOM
       Remote Access permissions:
         a. Click Start, click Run, type DCOMCNFG, and then
            click OK.
         b. In the Component Services dialog box, expand
            Component Services, expand Computers, and then
            right-click My Computer and click Properties.
         c. In the My Computer Properties dialog box, click the
            COM Security tab.
         d. Under Access Permissions, click Edit Limits.
         e. In the Access Permission dialog box, select
            ANONYMOUS LOGON name in the Group or user names box.
            In the Allow column under Permissions for User,
            select Remote Access, and then click OK.

Monitored Remote Computer (Computer B)

   If the user account that is logged into the computer running
   the MySQL Notifier (Computer A) is a local administrator on
   the remote computer (Computer B), such that the same account
   is an administrator on Computer B, you can skip to the "Allow
   for remote administration" step.

   Setting DCOM security to allow a non-administrator user to
   access a computer remotely:

    1. Grant "DCOM remote launch" and activation permissions for
       a user or group:
         a. Click Start, click Run, type DCOMCNFG, and then
            click OK.
         b. In the Component Services dialog box, expand
            Component Services, expand Computers, and then
            right-click My Computer and click Properties.
         c. In the My Computer Properties dialog box, click the
            COM Security tab.
         d. Under Access Permissions, click Edit Limits.
         e. In the Launch Permission dialog box, follow these
            steps if your name or your group does not appear in
            the Groups or user names list:
              i. In the Launch Permission dialog box, click Add.
             ii. In the Select Users, Computers, or Groups
                 dialog box, add your name and the group in the
                 "Enter the object names to select" box, and
                 then click OK.
         f. In the Launch Permission dialog box, select your
            user and group in the Group or user names box. In
            the Allow column under Permissions for User, select
            Remote Launch, select Remote Activation, and then
            click OK.
       Grant DCOM remote access permissions:
         a. Click Start, click Run, type DCOMCNFG, and then
            click OK.
         b. In the Component Services dialog box, expand
            Component Services, expand Computers, and then
            right-click My Computer and click Properties.
         c. In the My Computer Properties dialog box, click the
            COM Security tab.
         d. Under Access Permissions, click Edit Limits.
         e. In the Access Permission dialog box, select
            ANONYMOUS LOGON name in the Group or user names box.
            In the Allow column under Permissions for User,
            select Remote Access, and then click OK.

    2. Allowing non-administrator users access to a specific WMI
       namespace:
         a. In the Control Panel, double-click Administrative
            Tools.
         b. In the Administrative Tools window, double-click
            Computer Management.
         c. In the Computer Management window, expand the
            Services and Applications tree and double-click the
            WMI Control.
         d. Right-click the WMI Control icon and select
            Properties.
         e. In the WMI Control Properties window, click the
            Security tab.
         f. In the Security tab, select the namespace and click
            Security.
         g. Locate the appropriate account and check Remote
            Enable in the Permissions list.

    3. Allow for remote administration by either editing the
       Group Policy Editor or using NETSH:
       Using the Group Policy Editor:
         a. Click Start, click Run, type GPEDIT.MSC, and then
            click OK.
         b. Under the Local Computer Policy heading,
            double-click Computer Configuration.
         c. Double-click Administrative Templates, then Network,
            Network Connections, and then Windows Firewall.
         d. If the computer is in the domain, then double-click
            Domain Profile; otherwise, double-click Standard
            Profile.
         e. Click Windows Firewall: Allow inbound remote
            administration exception.
         f. On the Action menu either select Edit, or
            double-click the selection from the previous step.
         g. Check the Enabled radio button, and then click OK.
       Using the NETSH command:
         a. Open a command prompt window with Administrative
            rights (you can right-click the Command Prompt icon
            and click Run as Administrator).
         b. Execute the following command:
NETSH firewall set service RemoteAdmin enable


    4. Now, be sure the user you are logging in with uses the
       Name value and not the Full Name value:
         a. In the Control Panel, double-click Administrative
            Tools.
         b. In the Administrative Tools window, double-click
            Computer Management.
         c. In the Computer Management window, expand the System
            Tools then Local Users and Groups.
         d. Click the Users node, and on the right side panel
            locate your user and make sure it uses the Name
            value to connect, and not the Full Name value.

    5. If the remote computer is running on Windows XP
       Professional, make sure that remote logins are not being
       forcefully changed to the guest account user (also known
       as ForceGuest), which is enabled by default on computers
       that are not attached to a domain.
         a. Click Start, click Run, type SECPOL.MSC, and then
            click OK.
         b. Under the Local Policies node, double-click Security
            Options.
         c. Select Network Access: Sharing and security model
            for local accounts and save.

Common Errors


     * 0x80070005

          + DCOM Security was not configured properly (see
            Computer B, the Setting DCOM security... step).

          + The remote computer (Computer B) is a member of
            WORKGROUP or is in a domain that is untrusted by the
            client computer (Computer A) (see Computer A, the
            Grant Anonymous connections DCOM Remote Access
            permissions step).

     * 0x8007000E

          + The remote computer (Computer B) is a member of
            WORKGROUP or is in a domain that is untrusted by the
            client computer (Computer A) (see Computer A, the
            Grant Anonymous connections DCOM Remote Access
            permissions step).

     * 0x80041003

          + Access to the remote WMI namespace was not
            configured properly (see Computer B, the Allowing
            non-administrator users access to a specific WMI
            namespace step).

     * 0x800706BA

          + The DCOM port is not open on the client computers
            (Computer A) firewall. See the Open the DCOM port
            TCP 135 step for Computer A.

          + The remote computer (Computer B) is inaccessible
            because its network location is set to Public. Make
            sure you can access it through the Windows Explorer.

2.3.5 Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows Using a noinstall Zip
Archive

   Users who are installing from the noinstall package can use
   the instructions in this section to manually install MySQL.
   The process for installing MySQL from a Zip archive is as
   follows:

    1. Extract the archive to the desired install directory

    2. Create an option file

    3. Choose a MySQL server type

    4. Start the MySQL server

    5. Secure the default user accounts

   This process is described in the sections that follow.

2.3.5.1 Extracting the Install Archive

   To install MySQL manually, do the following:

    1. If you are upgrading from a previous version please refer
       to Section 2.3.8, "Upgrading MySQL on Windows," before
       beginning the upgrade process.

    2. Make sure that you are logged in as a user with
       administrator privileges.

    3. Choose an installation location. Traditionally, the MySQL
       server is installed in C:\mysql. The MySQL Installation
       Wizard installs MySQL under C:\Program Files\MySQL. If
       you do not install MySQL at C:\mysql, you must specify
       the path to the install directory during startup or in an
       option file. See Section 2.3.5.2, "Creating an Option
       File."
       Note
       The MySQL Installer installs MySQL under C:\Program
       Files\MySQL.

    4. Extract the install archive to the chosen installation
       location using your preferred Zip archive tool. Some
       tools may extract the archive to a folder within your
       chosen installation location. If this occurs, you can
       move the contents of the subfolder into the chosen
       installation location.

2.3.5.2 Creating an Option File

   If you need to specify startup options when you run the
   server, you can indicate them on the command line or place
   them in an option file. For options that are used every time
   the server starts, you may find it most convenient to use an
   option file to specify your MySQL configuration. This is
   particularly true under the following circumstances:

     * The installation or data directory locations are
       different from the default locations (C:\Program
       Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6 and C:\Program
       Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data).

     * You need to tune the server settings, such as memory,
       cache, or InnoDB configuration information.

   When the MySQL server starts on Windows, it looks for option
   files in several locations, such as the Windows directory,
   C:\, and the MySQL installation directory (for the full list
   of locations, see Section 4.2.6, "Using Option Files"). The
   Windows directory typically is named something like
   C:\WINDOWS. You can determine its exact location from the
   value of the WINDIR environment variable using the following
   command:
C:\> echo %WINDIR%

   MySQL looks for options in each location first in the my.ini
   file, and then in the my.cnf file. However, to avoid
   confusion, it is best if you use only one file. If your PC
   uses a boot loader where C: is not the boot drive, your only
   option is to use the my.ini file. Whichever option file you
   use, it must be a plain text file.
   Note

   When using the MySQL Installer to install MySQL Server, it
   will create the my.ini at the default location. And as of
   MySQL Server 5.5.27, the user running MySQL Installer is
   granted full permissions to this new my.ini.

   In other words, be sure that the MySQL Server user has
   permission to read the my.ini file.

   You can also make use of the example option files included
   with your MySQL distribution; see Section 5.1.2, "Server
   Configuration Defaults."

   An option file can be created and modified with any text
   editor, such as Notepad. For example, if MySQL is installed
   in E:\mysql and the data directory is in E:\mydata\data, you
   can create an option file containing a [mysqld] section to
   specify values for the basedir and datadir options:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=E:/mysql
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=E:/mydata/data

   Microsoft Windows path names are specified in option files
   using (forward) slashes rather than backslashes. If you do
   use backslashes, double them:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=E:\\mysql
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=E:\\mydata\\data

   The rules for use of backslash in option file values are
   given in Section 4.2.6, "Using Option Files."

   The data directory is located within the AppData directory
   for the user running MySQL.

   If you would like to use a data directory in a different
   location, you should copy the entire contents of the data
   directory to the new location. For example, if you want to
   use E:\mydata as the data directory instead, you must do two
   things:

    1. Move the entire data directory and all of its contents
       from the default location (for example C:\Program
       Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data) to E:\mydata.

    2. Use a --datadir option to specify the new data directory
       location each time you start the server.

2.3.5.3 Selecting a MySQL Server Type

   The following table shows the available servers for Windows
   in MySQL 5.6.
   Binary Description
   mysqld Optimized binary with named-pipe support
   mysqld-debug Like mysqld, but compiled with full debugging
   and automatic memory allocation checking

   All of the preceding binaries are optimized for modern Intel
   processors, but should work on any Intel i386-class or higher
   processor.

   Each of the servers in a distribution support the same set of
   storage engines. The SHOW ENGINES statement displays which
   engines a given server supports.

   All Windows MySQL 5.6 servers have support for symbolic
   linking of database directories.

   MySQL supports TCP/IP on all Windows platforms. MySQL servers
   on Windows also support named pipes, if you start the server
   with the --enable-named-pipe option. It is necessary to use
   this option explicitly because some users have experienced
   problems with shutting down the MySQL server when named pipes
   were used. The default is to use TCP/IP regardless of
   platform because named pipes are slower than TCP/IP in many
   Windows configurations.

2.3.5.4 Starting the Server for the First Time

   This section gives a general overview of starting the MySQL
   server. The following sections provide more specific
   information for starting the MySQL server from the command
   line or as a Windows service.

   The information here applies primarily if you installed MySQL
   using the Noinstall version, or if you wish to configure and
   test MySQL manually rather than with the GUI tools.
   Note

   The MySQL server will automatically start after using the
   MySQL Installer, and the MySQL Notifier GUI can be used to
   start/stop/restart at any time.

   The examples in these sections assume that MySQL is installed
   under the default location of C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL
   Server 5.6. Adjust the path names shown in the examples if
   you have MySQL installed in a different location.

   Clients have two options. They can use TCP/IP, or they can
   use a named pipe if the server supports named-pipe
   connections.

   MySQL for Windows also supports shared-memory connections if
   the server is started with the --shared-memory option.
   Clients can connect through shared memory by using the
   --protocol=MEMORY option.

   For information about which server binary to run, see Section
   2.3.5.3, "Selecting a MySQL Server Type."

   Testing is best done from a command prompt in a console
   window (or "DOS window"). In this way you can have the server
   display status messages in the window where they are easy to
   see. If something is wrong with your configuration, these
   messages make it easier for you to identify and fix any
   problems.

   To start the server, enter this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqld" --console

   For a server that includes InnoDB support, you should see the
   messages similar to those following as it starts (the path
   names and sizes may differ):
InnoDB: The first specified datafile c:\ibdata\ibdata1 did not exist:
InnoDB: a new database to be created!
InnoDB: Setting file c:\ibdata\ibdata1 size to 209715200
InnoDB: Database physically writes the file full: wait...
InnoDB: Log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile0 did not exist: new to be create
d
InnoDB: Setting log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile0 size to 31457280
InnoDB: Log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile1 did not exist: new to be create
d
InnoDB: Setting log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile1 size to 31457280
InnoDB: Log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile2 did not exist: new to be create
d
InnoDB: Setting log file c:\iblogs\ib_logfile2 size to 31457280
InnoDB: Doublewrite buffer not found: creating new
InnoDB: Doublewrite buffer created
InnoDB: creating foreign key constraint system tables
InnoDB: foreign key constraint system tables created
011024 10:58:25  InnoDB: Started

   When the server finishes its startup sequence, you should see
   something like this, which indicates that the server is ready
   to service client connections:
mysqld: ready for connections
Version: '5.6.25'  socket: ''  port: 3306

   The server continues to write to the console any further
   diagnostic output it produces. You can open a new console
   window in which to run client programs.

   If you omit the --console option, the server writes
   diagnostic output to the error log in the data directory
   (C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data by default).
   The error log is the file with the .err extension, and may be
   set using the --log-error option.
   Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables
   initially have no passwords. After starting the server, you
   should set up passwords for them using the instructions in
   Section 2.10.4, "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."

2.3.5.5 Starting MySQL from the Windows Command Line

   The MySQL server can be started manually from the command
   line. This can be done on any version of Windows.
   Note

   The MySQL Notifier GUI can also be used to start/stop/restart
   the MySQL server.

   To start the mysqld server from the command line, you should
   start a console window (or "DOS window") and enter this
   command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqld"

   The path to mysqld may vary depending on the install location
   of MySQL on your system.

   You can stop the MySQL server by executing this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqladmin" -u root
shutdown

   Note

   If the MySQL root user account has a password, you need to
   invoke mysqladmin with the -p option and supply the password
   when prompted.

   This command invokes the MySQL administrative utility
   mysqladmin to connect to the server and tell it to shut down.
   The command connects as the MySQL root user, which is the
   default administrative account in the MySQL grant system.
   Note

   Users in the MySQL grant system are wholly independent from
   any login users under Microsoft Windows.

   If mysqld doesn't start, check the error log to see whether
   the server wrote any messages there to indicate the cause of
   the problem. By default, the error log is located in the
   C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data directory. It is
   the file with a suffix of .err, or may be specified by
   passing in the --log-error option. Alternatively, you can try
   to start the server with the --console option; in this case,
   the server may display some useful information on the screen
   that will help solve the problem.

   The last option is to start mysqld with the --standalone and
   --debug options. In this case, mysqld writes a log file
   C:\mysqld.trace that should contain the reason why mysqld
   doesn't start. See Section 24.4.3, "The DBUG Package."

   Use mysqld --verbose --help to display all the options that
   mysqld supports.

2.3.5.6 Customizing the PATH for MySQL Tools

   To make it easier to invoke MySQL programs, you can add the
   path name of the MySQL bin directory to your Windows system
   PATH environment variable:

     * On the Windows desktop, right-click the My Computer icon,
       and select Properties.

     * Next select the Advanced tab from the System Properties
       menu that appears, and click the Environment Variables
       button.

     * Under System Variables, select Path, and then click the
       Edit button. The Edit System Variable dialogue should
       appear.

     * Place your cursor at the end of the text appearing in the
       space marked Variable Value. (Use the End key to ensure
       that your cursor is positioned at the very end of the
       text in this space.) Then enter the complete path name of
       your MySQL bin directory (for example, C:\Program
       Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin)
       Note
       There must be a semicolon separating this path from any
       values present in this field.
       Dismiss this dialogue, and each dialogue in turn, by
       clicking OK until all of the dialogues that were opened
       have been dismissed. You should now be able to invoke any
       MySQL executable program by typing its name at the DOS
       prompt from any directory on the system, without having
       to supply the path. This includes the servers, the mysql
       client, and all MySQL command-line utilities such as
       mysqladmin and mysqldump.
       You should not add the MySQL bin directory to your
       Windows PATH if you are running multiple MySQL servers on
       the same machine.

   Warning

   You must exercise great care when editing your system PATH by
   hand; accidental deletion or modification of any portion of
   the existing PATH value can leave you with a malfunctioning
   or even unusable system.

2.3.5.7 Starting MySQL as a Windows Service

   On Windows, the recommended way to run MySQL is to install it
   as a Windows service, so that MySQL starts and stops
   automatically when Windows starts and stops. A MySQL server
   installed as a service can also be controlled from the
   command line using NET commands, or with the graphical
   Services utility. Generally, to install MySQL as a Windows
   service you should be logged in using an account that has
   administrator rights.
   Note

   The MySQL Notifier GUI can also be used to monitor the status
   of the MySQL service.

   The Services utility (the Windows Service Control Manager)
   can be found in the Windows Control Panel (under
   Administrative Tools on Windows 2000, XP, Vista, and Server
   2003). To avoid conflicts, it is advisable to close the
   Services utility while performing server installation or
   removal operations from the command line.

Installing the service

   Before installing MySQL as a Windows service, you should
   first stop the current server if it is running by using the
   following command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqladmin"
          -u root shutdown

   Note

   If the MySQL root user account has a password, you need to
   invoke mysqladmin with the -p option and supply the password
   when prompted.

   This command invokes the MySQL administrative utility
   mysqladmin to connect to the server and tell it to shut down.
   The command connects as the MySQL root user, which is the
   default administrative account in the MySQL grant system.
   Note

   Users in the MySQL grant system are wholly independent from
   any login users under Windows.

   Install the server as a service using this command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqld" --install

   The service-installation command does not start the server.
   Instructions for that are given later in this section.

   To make it easier to invoke MySQL programs, you can add the
   path name of the MySQL bin directory to your Windows system
   PATH environment variable:

     * On the Windows desktop, right-click the My Computer icon,
       and select Properties.

     * Next select the Advanced tab from the System Properties
       menu that appears, and click the Environment Variables
       button.

     * Under System Variables, select Path, and then click the
       Edit button. The Edit System Variable dialogue should
       appear.

     * Place your cursor at the end of the text appearing in the
       space marked Variable Value. (Use the End key to ensure
       that your cursor is positioned at the very end of the
       text in this space.) Then enter the complete path name of
       your MySQL bin directory (for example, C:\Program
       Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin), and there should be a
       semicolon separating this path from any values present in
       this field. Dismiss this dialogue, and each dialogue in
       turn, by clicking OK until all of the dialogues that were
       opened have been dismissed. You should now be able to
       invoke any MySQL executable program by typing its name at
       the DOS prompt from any directory on the system, without
       having to supply the path. This includes the servers, the
       mysql client, and all MySQL command-line utilities such
       as mysqladmin and mysqldump.
       You should not add the MySQL bin directory to your
       Windows PATH if you are running multiple MySQL servers on
       the same machine.

   Warning

   You must exercise great care when editing your system PATH by
   hand; accidental deletion or modification of any portion of
   the existing PATH value can leave you with a malfunctioning
   or even unusable system.

   The following additional arguments can be used when
   installing the service:

     * You can specify a service name immediately following the
       --install option. The default service name is MySQL.

     * If a service name is given, it can be followed by a
       single option. By convention, this should be
       --defaults-file=file_name to specify the name of an
       option file from which the server should read options
       when it starts.
       The use of a single option other than --defaults-file is
       possible but discouraged. --defaults-file is more
       flexible because it enables you to specify multiple
       startup options for the server by placing them in the
       named option file.

     * You can also specify a --local-service option following
       the service name. This causes the server to run using the
       LocalService Windows account that has limited system
       privileges. This account is available only for Windows XP
       or newer. If both --defaults-file and --local-service are
       given following the service name, they can be in any
       order.

   For a MySQL server that is installed as a Windows service,
   the following rules determine the service name and option
   files that the server uses:

     * If the service-installation command specifies no service
       name or the default service name (MySQL) following the
       --install option, the server uses the a service name of
       MySQL and reads options from the [mysqld] group in the
       standard option files.

     * If the service-installation command specifies a service
       name other than MySQL following the --install option, the
       server uses that service name. It reads options from the
       [mysqld] group and the group that has the same name as
       the service in the standard option files. This enables
       you to use the [mysqld] group for options that should be
       used by all MySQL services, and an option group with the
       service name for use by the server installed with that
       service name.

     * If the service-installation command specifies a
       --defaults-file option after the service name, the server
       reads options the same way as described in the previous
       item, except that it reads options only from the named
       file and ignores the standard option files.

   As a more complex example, consider the following command:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqld"
          --install MySQL --defaults-file=C:\my-opts.cnf

   Here, the default service name (MySQL) is given after the
   --install option. If no --defaults-file option had been
   given, this command would have the effect of causing the
   server to read the [mysqld] group from the standard option
   files. However, because the --defaults-file option is
   present, the server reads options from the [mysqld] option
   group, and only from the named file.
   Note

   On Windows, if the server is started with the --defaults-file
   and --install options, --install must be first. Otherwise,
   mysqld.exe will attempt to start the MySQL server.

   You can also specify options as Start parameters in the
   Windows Services utility before you start the MySQL service.

Starting the service

   Once a MySQL server has been installed as a service, Windows
   starts the service automatically whenever Windows starts. The
   service also can be started immediately from the Services
   utility, or by using a NET START MySQL command. The NET
   command is not case sensitive.

   When run as a service, mysqld has no access to a console
   window, so no messages can be seen there. If mysqld does not
   start, check the error log to see whether the server wrote
   any messages there to indicate the cause of the problem. The
   error log is located in the MySQL data directory (for
   example, C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data). It is
   the file with a suffix of .err.

   When a MySQL server has been installed as a service, and the
   service is running, Windows stops the service automatically
   when Windows shuts down. The server also can be stopped
   manually by using the Services utility, the NET STOP MySQL
   command, or the mysqladmin shutdown command.

   You also have the choice of installing the server as a manual
   service if you do not wish for the service to be started
   automatically during the boot process. To do this, use the
   --install-manual option rather than the --install option:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqld" --install-ma
nual

Removing the service

   To remove a server that is installed as a service, first stop
   it if it is running by executing NET STOP MySQL. Then use the
   --remove option to remove it:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqld" --remove

   If mysqld is not running as a service, you can start it from
   the command line. For instructions, see Section 2.3.5.5,
   "Starting MySQL from the Windows Command Line."

   If you encounter difficulties during installation. see
   Section 2.3.6, "Troubleshooting a Microsoft Windows MySQL
   Server Installation."

2.3.5.8 Testing The MySQL Installation

   You can test whether the MySQL server is working by executing
   any of the following commands:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqlshow"
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqlshow" -u root m
ysql
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysqladmin" version
status proc
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\bin\mysql" test

   If mysqld is slow to respond to TCP/IP connections from
   client programs, there is probably a problem with your DNS.
   In this case, start mysqld with the --skip-name-resolve
   option and use only localhost and IP addresses in the Host
   column of the MySQL grant tables. (Be sure that an account
   exists that specifies an IP address or you may not be able to
   connect.)

   You can force a MySQL client to use a named-pipe connection
   rather than TCP/IP by specifying the --pipe or
   --protocol=PIPE option, or by specifying . (period) as the
   host name. Use the --socket option to specify the name of the
   pipe if you do not want to use the default pipe name.

   If you have set a password for the root account, deleted the
   anonymous account, or created a new user account, then to
   connect to the MySQL server you must use the appropriate -u
   and -p options with the commands shown previously. See
   Section 4.2.2, "Connecting to the MySQL Server."

   For more information about mysqlshow, see Section 4.5.6,
   "mysqlshow --- Display Database, Table, and Column
   Information."

2.3.6 Troubleshooting a Microsoft Windows MySQL Server Installation

   When installing and running MySQL for the first time, you may
   encounter certain errors that prevent the MySQL server from
   starting. This section helps you diagnose and correct some of
   these errors.

   Your first resource when troubleshooting server issues is the
   error log. The MySQL server uses the error log to record
   information relevant to the error that prevents the server
   from starting. The error log is located in the data directory
   specified in your my.ini file. The default data directory
   location is C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data, or
   C:\ProgramData\Mysql on Windows 7 and Windows Server 2008.
   The C:\ProgramData directory is hidden by default. You need
   to change your folder options to see the directory and
   contents. For more information on the error log and
   understanding the content, see Section 5.2.2, "The Error
   Log."

   For information regarding possible errors, also consult the
   console messages displayed when the MySQL service is
   starting. Use the NET START MySQL command from the command
   line after installing mysqld as a service to see any error
   messages regarding the starting of the MySQL server as a
   service. See Section 2.3.5.7, "Starting MySQL as a Windows
   Service."

   The following examples show other common error messages you
   might encounter when installing MySQL and starting the server
   for the first time:

     * If the MySQL server cannot find the mysql privileges
       database or other critical files, it displays these
       messages:
System error 1067 has occurred.
Fatal error: Can't open and lock privilege tables:
Table 'mysql.user' doesn't exist

       These messages often occur when the MySQL base or data
       directories are installed in different locations than the
       default locations (C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server
       5.6 and C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data,
       respectively).
       This situation can occur when MySQL is upgraded and
       installed to a new location, but the configuration file
       is not updated to reflect the new location. In addition,
       old and new configuration files might conflict. Be sure
       to delete or rename any old configuration files when
       upgrading MySQL.
       If you have installed MySQL to a directory other than
       C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6, ensure that the
       MySQL server is aware of this through the use of a
       configuration (my.ini) file. Put the my.ini file in your
       Windows directory, typically C:\WINDOWS. To determine its
       exact location from the value of the WINDIR environment
       variable, issue the following command from the command
       prompt:
C:\> echo %WINDIR%

       You can create or modify an option file with any text
       editor, such as Notepad. For example, if MySQL is
       installed in E:\mysql and the data directory is
       D:\MySQLdata, you can create the option file and set up a
       [mysqld] section to specify values for the basedir and
       datadir options:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=E:/mysql
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=D:/MySQLdata

       Microsoft Windows path names are specified in option
       files using (forward) slashes rather than backslashes. If
       you do use backslashes, double them:
[mysqld]
# set basedir to your installation path
basedir=C:\\Program Files\\MySQL\\MySQL Server 5.6
# set datadir to the location of your data directory
datadir=D:\\MySQLdata

       The rules for use of backslash in option file values are
       given in Section 4.2.6, "Using Option Files."
       If you change the datadir value in your MySQL
       configuration file, you must move the contents of the
       existing MySQL data directory before restarting the MySQL
       server.
       See Section 2.3.5.2, "Creating an Option File."

     * If you reinstall or upgrade MySQL without first stopping
       and removing the existing MySQL service and install MySQL
       using the MySQL Installer, you might see this error:
Error: Cannot create Windows service for MySql. Error: 0

       This occurs when the Configuration Wizard tries to
       install the service and finds an existing service with
       the same name.
       One solution to this problem is to choose a service name
       other than mysql when using the configuration wizard.
       This enables the new service to be installed correctly,
       but leaves the outdated service in place. Although this
       is harmless, it is best to remove old services that are
       no longer in use.
       To permanently remove the old mysql service, execute the
       following command as a user with administrative
       privileges, on the command line:
C:\> sc delete mysql
[SC] DeleteService SUCCESS

       If the sc utility is not available for your version of
       Windows, download the delsrv utility from
       http://www.microsoft.com/windows2000/techinfo/reskit/tool
       s/existing/delsrv-o.asp and use the delsrv mysql syntax.

2.3.7 Windows Postinstallation Procedures

   GUI tools exist that perform most of the tasks described in
   this section, including:

     * MySQL Installer: Used to install and upgrade MySQL
       products.

     * MySQL Workbench: Manages the MySQL server and edits SQL
       statements.

     * MySQL Notifier: Starts, stops, or restarts the MySQL
       server, and monitors its status.

     * MySQL for Excel
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-for-excel/en/index.html):
       Edits MySQL data with Microsoft Excel.

   On Windows, you need not create the data directory and the
   grant tables. MySQL Windows distributions include the grant
   tables with a set of preinitialized accounts in the mysql
   database under the data directory.

   Regarding passwords, if you installed MySQL using the MySQL
   Installer, you may have already assigned passwords to the
   accounts. (See Section 2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft
   Windows Using MySQL Installer.") Otherwise, use the
   password-assignment procedure given in Section 2.10.4,
   "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."

   Before assigning passwords, you might want to try running
   some client programs to make sure that you can connect to the
   server and that it is operating properly. Make sure that the
   server is running (see Section 2.3.5.4, "Starting the Server
   for the First Time"). You can also set up a MySQL service
   that runs automatically when Windows starts (see Section
   2.3.5.7, "Starting MySQL as a Windows Service").

   These instructions assume that your current location is the
   MySQL installation directory and that it has a bin
   subdirectory containing the MySQL programs used here. If that
   is not true, adjust the command path names accordingly.

   If you installed MySQL using MySQL Installer (see Section
   2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows Using MySQL
   Installer"), the default installation directory is C:\Program
   Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6:
C:\> cd "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6"

   A common installation location for installation from a Zip
   package is C:\mysql:
C:\> cd C:\mysql

   Alternatively, add the bin directory to your PATH environment
   variable setting. That enables your command interpreter to
   find MySQL programs properly, so that you can run a program
   by typing only its name, not its path name. See Section
   2.3.5.6, "Customizing the PATH for MySQL Tools."

   With the server running, issue the following commands to
   verify that you can retrieve information from the server. The
   output should be similar to that shown here.

   Use mysqlshow to see what databases exist:
C:\> bin\mysqlshow
+--------------------+
|     Databases      |
+--------------------+
| information_schema |
| mysql              |
| test               |
+--------------------+

   The list of installed databases may vary, but will always
   include the minimum of mysql and information_schema.

   The preceding command (and commands for other MySQL programs
   such as mysql) may not work if the correct MySQL account does
   not exist. For example, the program may fail with an error,
   or you may not be able to view all databases. If you
   installed MySQL using MySQL Installer, the root user will
   have been created automatically with the password you
   supplied. In this case, you should use the -u root and -p
   options. (You must use those options if you have already
   secured the initial MySQL accounts.) With -p, the client
   program prompts for the root password. For example:
C:\> bin\mysqlshow -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
+--------------------+
|     Databases      |
+--------------------+
| information_schema |
| mysql              |
| test               |
+--------------------+

   If you specify a database name, mysqlshow displays a list of
   the tables within the database:
C:\> bin\mysqlshow mysql
Database: mysql
+---------------------------+
|          Tables           |
+---------------------------+
| columns_priv              |
| db                        |
| event                     |
| func                      |
| help_category             |
| help_keyword              |
| help_relation             |
| help_topic                |
| plugin                    |
| proc                      |
| procs_priv                |
| proxies_priv              |
| servers                   |
| tables_priv               |
| time_zone                 |
| time_zone_leap_second     |
| time_zone_name            |
| time_zone_transition      |
| time_zone_transition_type |
| user                      |
+---------------------------+

   Use the mysql program to select information from a table in
   the mysql database:
C:\> bin\mysql -e "SELECT User, Host FROM mysql.user" mysql
+------+-----------+
| User | Host      |
+------+-----------+
| root | localhost |
+------+-----------+

   For more information about mysqlshow and mysql, see Section
   4.5.6, "mysqlshow --- Display Database, Table, and Column
   Information," and Section 4.5.1, "mysql --- The MySQL
   Command-Line Tool."

2.3.8 Upgrading MySQL on Windows

   To upgrade MySQL on Windows, follow these steps:

    1. Review Section 2.11.1, "Upgrading MySQL," for additional
       information on upgrading MySQL that is not specific to
       Windows.

    2. Always back up your current MySQL installation before
       performing an upgrade. See Section 7.2, "Database Backup
       Methods."

    3. Download the latest Windows distribution of MySQL from
       http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/.

    4. Before upgrading MySQL, stop the server. If the server is
       installed as a service, stop the service with the
       following command from the command prompt:
C:\> NET STOP MySQL

       If you are not running the MySQL server as a service, use
       mysqladmin to stop it. For example, before upgrading from
       MySQL 5.5 to 5.6, use mysqladmin from MySQL 5.5 as
       follows:
C:\> "C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.5\bin\mysqladmin" -u root
shutdown

       Note
       If the MySQL root user account has a password, invoke
       mysqladmin with the -p option and enter the password when
       prompted.

    5. Before upgrading to MySQL 5.6 from a version previous to
       4.1.5, or from a version of MySQL installed from a Zip
       archive to a version of MySQL installed with the MySQL
       Installation Wizard, you must first manually remove the
       previous installation and MySQL service (if the server is
       installed as a service).
       To remove the MySQL service, use the following command:
C:\> C:\mysql\bin\mysqld --remove

       If you do not remove the existing service, the MySQL
       Installation Wizard may fail to properly install the new
       MySQL service.

    6. If you are using the MySQL Installer, start it as
       described in Section 2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on
       Microsoft Windows Using MySQL Installer."

    7. If you are upgrading MySQL from a Zip archive, extract
       the archive. You may either overwrite your existing MySQL
       installation (usually located at C:\mysql), or install it
       into a different directory, such as C:\mysql5.
       Overwriting the existing installation is recommended.
       However, for upgrades (as opposed to installing for the
       first time), you must remove the data directory from your
       existing MySQL installation to avoid replacing your
       current data files. To do so, follow these steps:
         a. Unzip the Zip archive in some location other than
            your current MySQL installation
         b. Remove the data directory
         c. Rezip the Zip archive
         d. Unzip the modified Zip archive on top of your
            existing installation
       Alternatively:
         a. Unzip the Zip archive in some location other than
            your current MySQL installation
         b. Remove the data directory
         c. Move the data directory from the current MySQL
            installation to the location of the just-removed
            data directory
         d. Remove the current MySQL installation
         e. Move the unzipped installation to the location of
            the just-removed installation

    8. If you were running MySQL as a Windows service and you
       had to remove the service earlier in this procedure,
       reinstall the service. (See Section 2.3.5.7, "Starting
       MySQL as a Windows Service.")

    9. Restart the server. For example, use NET START MySQL if
       you run MySQL as a service, or invoke mysqld directly
       otherwise.
   10. As Administrator, run mysql_upgrade to check your tables,
       attempt to repair them if necessary, and update your
       grant tables if they have changed so that you can take
       advantage of any new capabilities. See Section 4.4.7,
       "mysql_upgrade --- Check and Upgrade MySQL Tables."
   11. If you encounter errors, see Section 2.3.6,
       "Troubleshooting a Microsoft Windows MySQL Server
       Installation."

2.4 Installing MySQL on OS X

   For a list of supported OS X versions that the MySQL server
   supports, see
   http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms/database.html
   .

   MySQL for OS X is available in a number of different forms:

     * Native Package Installer format, which uses the native OS
       X installer (DMG) to walk you through the installation of
       MySQL. For more information, see Section 2.4.2,
       "Installing MySQL on OS X Using Native Packages." You can
       use the package installer with OS X. The user you use to
       perform the installation must have administrator
       privileges.

     * Tar package format, which uses a file packaged using the
       Unix tar and gzip commands. To use this method, you will
       need to open a Terminal window. You do not need
       administrator privileges using this method, as you can
       install the MySQL server anywhere using this method. For
       more information on using this method, you can use the
       generic instructions for using a tarball, Section 2.2,
       "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic Binaries."
       In addition to the core installation, the Package
       Installer also includes Section 2.4.4, "Installing the
       MySQL Startup Item" and Section 2.4.5, "Installing and
       Using the MySQL Preference Pane," both of which simplify
       the management of your installation.

   For additional information on using MySQL on OS X, see
   Section 2.4.1, "General Notes on Installing MySQL on OS X."

2.4.1 General Notes on Installing MySQL on OS X

   You should keep the following issues and notes in mind:

     * OS X 10.4 deprecated startup items in favor of launchd
       daemons, and as of OS X 10.10 (Yosemite), startup items
       do not function. For these reasons, using launchd daemons
       is preferred over startup items.

     * You may need (or want) to create a specific mysql user to
       own the MySQL directory and data. You can do this through
       the Directory Utility, and the mysql user should already
       exist. For use in single user mode, an entry for _mysql
       (note the underscore prefix) should already exist within
       the system /etc/passwd file.

     * If you get an "insecure startup item disabled" error when
       MySQL launches, use the following procedure. Adjust the
       pathnames appropriately for your system.

         1. Modify the mysql.script using this command (enter it
            on a single line):
shell> sudo /Applications/TextEdit.app/Contents/MacOS/TextEdit
  /usr/local/mysql/support-files/mysql.server


         2. Locate the option file that defines the basedir
            value and modify it to contain these lines:
basedir=/usr/local/mysql
datadir=/usr/local/mysql/data

            In the /Library/StartupItems/MySQLCOM/ directory,
            make the following group ID changes from staff to
            wheel:
shell> sudo chgrp wheel MySQLCOM StartupParameters.plist


         3. Start the server from System Preferences or
            Terminal.app.

     * Because the MySQL package installer installs the MySQL
       contents into a version and platform specific directory,
       you can use this to upgrade and migrate your database
       between versions. You will need to either copy the data
       directory from the old version to the new version, or
       alternatively specify an alternative datadir value to set
       location of the data directory. By default, the MySQL
       directories are installed under /usr/local/.

     * You might want to add aliases to your shell's resource
       file to make it easier to access commonly used programs
       such as mysql and mysqladmin from the command line. The
       syntax for bash is:
alias mysql=/usr/local/mysql/bin/mysql
alias mysqladmin=/usr/local/mysql/bin/mysqladmin

       For tcsh, use:
alias mysql /usr/local/mysql/bin/mysql
alias mysqladmin /usr/local/mysql/bin/mysqladmin

       Even better, add /usr/local/mysql/bin to your PATH
       environment variable. You can do this by modifying the
       appropriate startup file for your shell. For more
       information, see Section 4.2.1, "Invoking MySQL
       Programs."

     * After you have copied over the MySQL database files from
       the previous installation and have successfully started
       the new server, you should consider removing the old
       installation files to save disk space. Additionally, you
       should also remove older versions of the Package Receipt
       directories located in
       /Library/Receipts/mysql-VERSION.pkg.

     * Prior to OS X 10.7, MySQL server was bundled with OS X
       Server.

2.4.2 Installing MySQL on OS X Using Native Packages

   The package is located inside a disk image (.dmg) file that
   you first need to mount by double-clicking its icon in the
   Finder. It should then mount the image and display its
   contents.
   Note

   Before proceeding with the installation, be sure to stop all
   running MySQL server instances by using either the MySQL
   Manager Application (on OS X Server) or mysqladmin shutdown
   on the command line.

   When installing from the package version, you can also
   install the MySQL Preference Pane, which will enable you to
   control the startup and execution of your MySQL server from
   System Preferences. For more information, see Section 2.4.5,
   "Installing and Using the MySQL Preference Pane."

   When installing using the package installer, the files are
   installed into a directory within /usr/local matching the
   name of the installation version and platform. For example,
   the installer file mysql-5.6-osx10.8-x86_64.dmg installs
   MySQL into /usr/local/mysql-5.6-osx10.8-x86_64/ . The
   following table shows the layout of the installation
   directory.

   Table 2.5 MySQL Installation Layout on OS X
   Directory Contents of Directory
   bin, scripts mysqld server, client and utility programs
   data Log files, databases
   docs Helper documents, like the Release Notes and build
   information
   include Include (header) files
   lib Libraries
   man Unix manual pages
   mysql-test MySQL test suite
   share Miscellaneous support files, including error messages,
   sample configuration files, SQL for database installation
   sql-bench Benchmarks
   support-files Scripts and sample configuration files
   /tmp/mysql.sock Location of the MySQL Unix socket

   During the package installer process, a symbolic link from
   /usr/local/mysql to the version/platform specific directory
   created during installation will be created automatically.

    1. Download and open the MySQL package installer, which is
       provided on a disk image (.dmg) that includes the main
       MySQL installation package file. Double-click the disk
       image to open it.
       Figure 2.40 MySQL Package Installer: DMG Contents
       MySQL Package Installer: DMG Contents

    2. Double-click the MySQL installer package. It will be
       named according to the version of MySQL you have
       downloaded. For example, if you have downloaded MySQL
       server 5.6.25, double-click
       mysql-5.6.25-osx-10.8-x86_64.pkg.

    3. You will be presented with the opening installer dialog.
       Click Continue to begin installation.
       Figure 2.41 MySQL Package Installer: Introduction
       MySQL Package Installer: Introduction

    4. If you have downloaded the community version of MySQL,
       you will be shown a copy of the relevant GNU General
       Public License. Click Continue and then Agree to
       continue.

    5. From the Installation Type page you can either click
       Install to execute the installation wizard using all
       defaults, click Customize to alter which components to
       install (MySQL server, Startup Item, Preference Pane --
       all enabled by default), or click Change Installation
       Location to change the type of installation for either
       all users, only the user executing the Installer, or
       define a custom location.
       Figure 2.42 MySQL Package Installer: Installation Type
       MySQL Package Installer: Installation Type
       Figure 2.43 MySQL Package Installer: Destination Select
       (Change Installation Location)
       MySQL Package Installer: Destination Select (Change
       Installation Location)
       Figure 2.44 MySQL Package Installer: Customize
       MySQL Package Installer: Customize

    6. Click Install to begin the installation process.

    7. Once the installation has been completed successfully,
       you will be shown an Install Succeeded message with a
       short summary. Now, Close the wizard and begin using the
       MySQL server.
       Figure 2.45 MySQL Package Installer: Summary
       MySQL Package Installer: Summary

   For convenience, you may also want to install a launch daemon
   and preference pane. See Section 2.4.3, "Installing a MySQL
   Launch Daemon," and Section 2.4.5, "Installing and Using the
   MySQL Preference Pane."

2.4.3 Installing a MySQL Launch Daemon

   OS X uses launch daemons to automatically start, stop, and
   manage processes and applications such as MySQL. Using launch
   daemons is recommended over startup items on OS X.
   Note

   OS X 10.4 deprecated startup items in favor of launchd
   daemons, and as of OS X 10.10 (Yosemite), startup items do
   not function. For these reasons, using launchd daemons is
   preferred over startup items.

   Here is an example launchd file that starts MySQL:

<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!DOCTYPE plist PUBLIC "-//Apple//DTD PLIST 1.0//EN"
"http://www.apple.com/DTDs/PropertyList-1.0.dtd">
<plist version="1.0">
  <dict>
    <key>KeepAlive</key>
    <true/>
    <key>Label</key>
    <string>com.mysql.mysqld</string>
    <key>ProgramArguments</key>
    <array>
    <string>/usr/local/mysql/bin/mysqld_safe</string>
    <string>--user=mysql</string>
    </array>
  </dict>
</plist>


   Adjust the ProgramArguments array according to your system,
   as for example your path to mysqld_safe might be different.
   After making the proper adjustments, do the following:

     * Save the XML as a file named
       /Library/LaunchDaemons/com.mysql.mysql.plist

     * Adjust the file permissions using the Apple recommended
       owner "root", owning group "wheel", and file permissions
       "644"
shell> sudo chown root:wheel /Library/LaunchDaemons/com.mysql.mysql.pl
ist
shell> sudo chmod 644 /Library/LaunchDaemons/com.mysql.mysql.plist


     * Enable this new MySQL service
shell> sudo launchctl load -w /Library/LaunchDaemons/com.mysql.mysql.p
list

   The MySQL daemon is now running, and automatically starts
   when your system is rebooted.

2.4.4 Installing the MySQL Startup Item

   The MySQL Installation Package includes a startup item that
   can be used to automatically start and stop MySQL.
   Important

   Startup items are deprecated in favor of launchd daemons. For
   additional information, see Section 2.4.3, "Installing a
   MySQL Launch Daemon."

   To install the MySQL Startup Item:

    1. Download and open the MySQL package installer, which is
       provided on a disk image (.dmg) that includes the main
       MySQL installation package.
       Note
       Previously, the OS X packages included separate
       MySQLStartupItem.pkg and MySQL.prefPane files. They have
       since been merged into the main package file.
       Figure 2.46 MySQL Package Installer: DMG Contents
       MySQL Package Installer: DMG Contents

    2. Go through the process of installing the MySQL server as
       described in the documentation at Section 2.4.2,
       "Installing MySQL on OS X Using Native Packages."

    3. Click Customize at the Installation Type step. The
       "Startup Item" option is listed there and enabled by
       default.
       Figure 2.47 MySQL Installer on OS X: Customize
       MySQL Installer on OS X: Customize

    4. Complete the MySQL server installation process.

   The Startup Item for MySQL is installed into
   /Library/StartupItems/MySQLCOM. The Startup Item installation
   adds a variable MYSQLCOM=-YES- to the system configuration
   file /etc/hostconfig. If you want to disable the automatic
   startup of MySQL, change this variable to MYSQLCOM=-NO-.
   Note

   Deselecting Automatically Start MySQL Server on Startup from
   the MySQL Preference Pane sets the MYSQLCOM variable to -NO-.

   After the installation, you can start and stop the MySQL
   server from the MySQL Preference Pane (preferred), or by
   running the following commands in a terminal window. You must
   have administrator privileges to perform these tasks, and you
   may be prompted for your password.

   If you have installed the Startup Item, use this command to
   start the server:
shell> sudo /Library/StartupItems/MySQLCOM/MySQLCOM start

   If you have installed the Startup Item, use this command to
   stop the server:
shell> sudo /Library/StartupItems/MySQLCOM/MySQLCOM stop

2.4.5 Installing and Using the MySQL Preference Pane

   The MySQL Installation Package includes a MySQL preference
   Pane that enables you to start, stop, and control automated
   startup during boot of your MySQL installation.

   To install the MySQL Preference Pane:

    1. Download and open the MySQL package installer, which is
       provided on a disk image (.dmg) that includes the main
       MySQL installation package.
       Note
       Previously, the OS X packages included separate
       MySQLStartupItem.pkg and MySQL.prefPane files. They have
       since been merged into the main package file.
       Figure 2.48 MySQL Package Installer: DMG Contents
       MySQL Package Installer: DMG Contents

    2. Go through the process of installing the MySQL server, as
       described in the documentation at Section 2.4.2,
       "Installing MySQL on OS X Using Native Packages."

    3. Click Customize at the Installation Type step. The
       "Preference Pane" option is listed there and enabled by
       default.
       Figure 2.49 MySQL Installer on OS X: Customize
       MySQL Installer on OS X: Customize

    4. Complete the MySQL server installation process.

   Note

   The MySQL Preference Pane only starts and stops MySQL
   installation installed from the MySQL package installation
   that have been installed in the default location.

   Once the MySQL Preference Pane has been installed, you can
   control your MySQL server instance using the preference pane.
   To use the preference pane, open the System Preferences...
   from the Apple menu. Select the MySQL preference pane by
   clicking the MySQL logo within the bottom section of the
   preference panes list.

   Figure 2.50 MySQL Preference Pane: Location
   MySQL Preference Pane: Location

   The MySQL Preference Pane shows the current status of the
   MySQL server, showing stopped (in red) if the server is not
   running and running (in green) if the server has already been
   started. The preference pane also shows the current setting
   for whether the MySQL server has been set to start
   automatically.

     * To start the MySQL server using the preference pane:
       Click Start MySQL Server. You may be prompted for the
       username and password of a user with administrator
       privileges to start the MySQL server.

     * To stop the MySQL server using the preference pane:
       Click Stop MySQL Server. You may be prompted for the
       username and password of a user with administrator
       privileges to stop the MySQL server.

     * To automatically start the MySQL server when the system
       boots:
       Check the check box next to Automatically Start MySQL
       Server on Startup.

     * To disable automatic MySQL server startup when the system
       boots:
       Uncheck the check box next to Automatically Start MySQL
       Server on Startup.

   You can close the System Preferences... window once you have
   completed your settings.

2.5 Installing MySQL on Linux

   Linux supports a number of different solutions for installing
   MySQL. We recommend that you use one of the distributions
   from Oracle, for which several methods for installation are
   available:

     * Installing with Yum using the MySQL Yum repository
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/yum/). For details,
       see Section 2.5.1, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the
       MySQL Yum Repository."

     * Installing with APT using the MySQL APT Repository
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/apt/). For details,
       see Section 2.5.3, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the
       MySQL APT Repository."

     * Installing with Zypper using the MySQL SLES Repository
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/suse/). For details,
       see Section 2.5.4, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the
       MySQL SLES Repository."

     * Installing using a precompiled RPM package. For more
       information, see Section 2.5.5, "Installing MySQL on
       Linux Using RPM Packages."

     * Installing using a precompiled Debian package. For more
       information, see Section 2.5.6, "Installing MySQL on
       Linux Using Debian Packages from Oracle."

     * Installing from a generic binary package in .tar.gz
       format. See Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux
       Using Generic Binaries" for more information.

     * Installing using Oracle's Unbreakable Linux Network
       (ULN). For more information, see Section 2.6, "Installing
       MySQL Using Unbreakable Linux Network (ULN)."

     * Extracting and compiling MySQL from a source
       distribution. For detailed instructions, see Section 2.9,
       "Installing MySQL from Source."

   As an alternative, you can use the package manager on your
   system to automatically download and install MySQL with
   packages from the native software repositories of your Linux
   distribution. These native packages are often several
   versions behind the currently available release. You will
   also normally be unable to install development milestone
   releases (DMRs), as these are not usually made available in
   the native repositories. For more information on using the
   native package installers, see Section 2.5.7, "Installing
   MySQL on Linux from the Native Software Repositories."
   Note

   For many Linux installations, you will want to set up MySQL
   to be started automatically when your machine starts. Many of
   the native package installations perform this operation for
   you, but for source, binary and RPM solutions you may need to
   set this up separately. The required script, mysql.server,
   can be found in the support-files directory under the MySQL
   installation directory or in a MySQL source tree. You can
   install it as /etc/init.d/mysql for automatic MySQL startup
   and shutdown. See Section 4.3.3, "mysql.server --- MySQL
   Server Startup Script."

2.5.1 Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL Yum Repository

   MySQL provides a Yum-style software repository for the
   following Linux platforms:

     * EL5, EL6, and EL7-based platforms (for example, the
       corresponding versions of Red Hat Enterprise Linux,
       Oracle Linux, and CentOS)

     * Fedora 20 and 21

   Currently, the MySQL Yum repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/yum/) for the
   above-mentioned platforms provides RPM packages for
   installing the MySQL server, client, MySQL Workbench, MySQL
   Utilities (not available for EL5-based platforms),
   Connector/ODBC, and Connector/Python (not available for
   EL5-based platforms).

Before You Start

   As a popular, open-source software, MySQL, in its original or
   re-packaged form, is widely installed on many systems from
   various sources, including different software download sites,
   software repositories, and so on. The following instructions
   assume that no versions of MySQL (whether distributed by
   Oracle or other parties) have already been installed on your
   system; if that is not the case, see Section 2.11.1.1,
   "Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL Yum Repository" or Section
   2.5.2, "Replacing a Third-Party Distribution of MySQL Using
   the MySQL Yum Repository."

Steps for a Fresh Installation of MySQL

   Follow the steps below to install the latest GA version of
   MySQL with the MySQL Yum repository:

    1. Adding the MySQL Yum Repository
       First, add the MySQL Yum repository to your system's
       repository list. This is a one-time operation, which can
       be performed by installing an RPM provided by MySQL.
       Follow these steps:
         a. Go to the Download MySQL Yum Repository page
            (downloads/repo/yum/
            (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/yum/)) in the
            MySQL Developer Zone.
         b. Select and download the release package for your
            platform.
         c. Install the downloaded release package with the
            following command (except for EL5-based systems),
            replacing platform-and-version-specific-package-name
            with the name of the downloaded RPM package:
shell> sudo yum localinstall platform-and-version-specific-package-nam
e.rpm

            For an EL6-based system, the command is in the form
            of:
shell> sudo yum localinstall mysql-community-release-el6-{version-numb
er}.noarch.rpm

            For an EL7-based system:
shell> sudo yum localinstall mysql-community-release-el7-{version-numb
er}.noarch.rpm

            For Fedora 20:
shell> sudo yum localinstall mysql-community-release-fc20-{version-num
ber}.noarch.rpm

            For Fedora 21:
shell> sudo yum localinstall mysql-community-release-fc21-{version-num
ber}.noarch.rpm

            For an EL5-based system, use the following command
            instead:
shell> sudo rpm -Uvh mysql-community-release-el5-{version-number}.noar
ch.rpm

            The installation command adds the MySQL Yum
            repository to your system's repository list and
            downloads the GnuPG key to check the integrity of
            the software packages. See Section 2.1.3.2,
            "Signature Checking Using GnuPG" for details on
            GnuPG key checking.
            You can check that the MySQL Yum repository has been
            successfully added by the following command:
shell> yum repolist enabled | grep "mysql.*-community.*"

       Note
       Once the MySQL Yum repository is enabled on your system,
       any system-wide update by the yum update command will
       upgrade MySQL packages on your system and also replace
       any native third-party packages, if Yum finds
       replacements for them in the MySQL Yum repository; see
       Section 2.11.1.1, "Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL Yum
       Repository" and, for a discussion on some possible
       effects of that on your system, see Section 2.11.1.1, "."

    2. Selecting a Release Series
       Note
       When using the MySQL Yum repository, the latest GA
       release of MySQL is selected for installation by default.
       If this is what you want, you can skip to the next step,
       Section 2.5.1, "."
       Within the MySQL Yum repository, different release series
       of the MySQL Community Server are hosted in different
       subrepositories. The subrepository for the latest GA
       series (currently 5.6) is enabled by default, and the
       subrepositories for all other series (for example, the
       5.7 series, currently still in developer milestone
       release (DMR) status) are disabled by default. Use this
       command to see all the subrepositories in the MySQL Yum
       repository, and see which of them are enabled or
       disabled:
shell> yum repolist all | grep mysql

       To install the latest release from the latest GA series,
       no configuration is needed. To install the latest release
       from a specific series other than the latest GA series,
       disable the subrepository for the latest GA series and
       enable the subrepository for the specific series before
       running the installation command. If your platform
       supports yum-config-manager, you can do that by issuing
       these commands, which disable the subrepository for the
       5.6 series and enable the one for the 5.7 series:
shell> sudo yum-config-manager --disable mysql56-community
shell> sudo yum-config-manager --enable mysql57-community-dmr

       Besides using yum-config-manager, you can also select a
       release series by editing manually the
       /etc/yum.repos.d/mysql-community.repo file. This is a
       typical entry for a release series' subrepository in the
       file:
# Enable to use MySQL 5.6
[mysql56-community]
name=MySQL 5.6 Community Server
baseurl=http://repo.mysql.com/yum/mysql-5.6-community/el/5/$basearch/
enabled=1
gpgcheck=1
gpgkey=file:/etc/pki/rpm-gpg/RPM-GPG-KEY-mysql
       Find the entry for the subrepository you want to
       configure, and edit the enabled option. Specify enabled=0
       to disable a subrepository, or enabled=1 to enable a
       subrepository. For example, to install the latest 5.7
       DMR, make sure you have enabled=0 for the above
       subrepository entry for MySQL 5.6, and have enabled=1 for
       the entry for the 5.7 series:
# Note: MySQL 5.7 is currently in development. For use at your own ris
k.
# Please read with sub pages: https://dev.mysql.com/doc/relnotes/mysql
/5.7/en/
[mysql57-community-dmr]
name=MySQL 5.7 Community Server Development Milestone Release
baseurl=http://repo.mysql.com/yum/mysql-5.7-community/el/6/$basearch/
enabled=1
gpgcheck=1
gpgkey=file:/etc/pki/rpm-gpg/RPM-GPG-KEY-mysql

       You should only enable subrepository for one release
       series at any time. When subrepositories for more than
       one release series are enabled, the latest series will be
       used by Yum.
       Verify that the correct subrepositories have been enabled
       and disabled by running the following command and
       checking its output:
shell> yum repolist enabled | grep mysql


    3. Installing MySQL with Yum
       Install MySQL by the following command:
shell> sudo yum install mysql-community-server

       This installs the package for MySQL server
       (mysql-community-server) and also packages for the
       components required to run the server, including packages
       for the client (mysql-community-client), the common error
       messages and character sets for client and server
       (mysql-community-common), and the shared client libraries
       (mysql-community-libs).

    4. Starting and Stopping the MySQL Server
       Start the MySQL server with the following command:
shell> sudo service mysqld start
       This is a sample output of the above command:
Starting mysqld:[ OK ]
       You can check the status of the MySQL server with the
       following command:
shell> sudo service mysqld status
       This is a sample output of the above command:
mysqld (pid 3066) is running.
       Stop the MySQL server with the following command:
shell> sudo service mysqld stop

    5. Securing the MySQL Installation
       The program mysql_secure_installation allows you to
       perform important operations like setting the root
       password, removing anonymous users, and so on. Always run
       it to secure your MySQL installation:
shell> mysql_secure_installation
       It is important to remember the root password you set.
       See Section 4.4.5, "mysql_secure_installation --- Improve
       MySQL Installation Security" for details.

   For more information on the postinstallation procedures, see
   Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and Testing."
   Note

   Compatibility Information for EL7-based platforms: The
   following RPM packages from the native software repositories
   of the platforms are incompatible with the package from the
   MySQL Yum repository that installs the MySQL server. Once you
   have installed MySQL using the MySQL Yum repository, you will
   not be able to install these packages (and vice versa).

     * akonadi-mysql

     * ocsinventory

Installing Additional MySQL Products and Components with Yum

   You can use Yum to install and manage individual components
   of MySQL. Some of these components are hosted in
   sub-repositories of the MySQL Yum repository: for example,
   the MySQL Connectors are to be found in the MySQL Connectors
   Community sub-repository, and the MySQL Workbench in MySQL
   Tools Community. You can use the following command to list
   the packages for all the MySQL components available for your
   platform from the MySQL Yum repository:
shell> sudo yum --disablerepo=\* --enablerepo='mysql*-community*' list
 available

   Install any packages of your choice with the following
   command, replacing package-name with name of the package:
shell> sudo yum install package-name

   For example, to install MySQL Workbench:
shell> sudo yum install mysql-workbench-community

   To install the shared client libraries:
shell> sudo yum install mysql-community-libs

Updating MySQL with Yum

   Besides installation, you can also perform updates for MySQL
   products and components using the MySQL Yum repository. See
   Section 2.11.1.1, "Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL Yum
   Repository" for details.

2.5.2 Replacing a Third-Party Distribution of MySQL Using the MySQL
Yum Repository

   For supported Yum-based platforms (see Section 2.5.1,
   "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL Yum Repository,"
   for a list), you can replace a third-party distribution of
   MySQL with the latest GA release from MySQL using the MySQL
   Yum repository. According to how your third-party
   distribution of MySQL was installed, there are different
   steps to follow:

Replacing a Native Third-Party Distribution of MySQL

   If you have installed a third-party distribution of MySQL
   from a native software repository (that is, a software
   repository provided by your own Linux distribution), follow
   these steps:

    1. Backing Up Your Database
       To avoid loss of data, always back up your database
       before trying to replace your MySQL installation using
       the MySQL Yum repository. See Chapter 7, "Backup and
       Recovery," on how to back up your database.

    2. Adding the MySQL Yum Repository
       Add the MySQL Yum repository to your system's repository
       list by following the instructions given in Section
       2.5.1, "."

    3. Replacing the Native Third-Party Distribution by a Yum
       Update
       By design, the MySQL Yum repository will replace your
       native, third-party MySQL when you perform a yum update
       command on the system, or a yum update mysql-server.

   After updating MySQL using the Yum repository, applications
   compiled with older versions of the shared client libraries
   should continue to work. However, if you want to recompile
   applications and dynamically link them with the updated
   libraries, see Section 2.11.1.1, "," for some special
   considerations.

Replacing a Nonnative Third-Party Distribution of MySQL

   If you have installed a third-party distribution of MySQL
   from a nonnative software repository (that is, a software
   repository not provided by your own Linux distribution),
   follow these steps:

    1. Backing Up Your Database
       To avoid loss of data, always back up your database
       before trying to replace your MySQL installation using
       the MySQL Yum repository. See Chapter 7, "Backup and
       Recovery," on how to back up your database.

    2. Stopping Yum from Receiving MySQL Packages from
       Third-Party, Nonnative Repositories
       Before you can use the MySQL Yum repository for
       installing MySQL, you must stop your system from
       receiving MySQL packages from any third-party, nonnative
       Yum repositories.
       For example, if you have installed MariaDB using their
       own software repository, get a list of the installed
       MariaDB packages using the following command:
shell> yum list installed mariadb\*
       This is a sample output for the command:
MariaDB-common.i686                      10.0.4-1
  @mariadb
MariaDB-compat.i686                      10.0.4-1
  @mariadb
MariaDB-server.i686                      10.0.4-1
  @mariadb

       From the command output, we can identify the installed
       packages (MariaDB-common, MariaDB-compat, and
       MariaDB-server) and the source of them (a nonnative
       software repository named mariadb).
       As another example, if you have installed Percona using
       their own software repository, get a list of the
       installed Percona packages using the following command:
shell> yum list installed Percona\*
       This is a sample output for the command:
Percona-Server-client-55.i686     5.5.39-rel36.0.el6          @percona
-release-i386
Percona-Server-server-55.i686     5.5.39-rel36.0.el6          @percona
-release-i386
Percona-Server-shared-55.i686     5.5.39-rel36.0.el6          @percona
-release-i386
percona-release.noarch            0.1-3                       @/percon
a-release-0.1-3.noarch

       From the command output, we can identify the installed
       packages (Percona-Server-client, Percona-Server-server,
       Percona-Server-shared, and percona-release.noarch) and
       the source of them (a nonnative software repository named
       percona-release).
       If you are not sure which third-party MySQL fork you have
       installed, this command should reveal it and list the RPM
       packages installed for it, as well as the third-party
       repository that supplies the packages:
shell> yum --disablerepo=\* provides mysql\*
       The next step is to stop Yum from receiving packages from
       the nonnative repository. If the yum-config-manager
       utility is supported on your platform, you can, for
       example, use this command for MariaDB:
shell> sudo yum-config-manager --disable mariadb
       And use this command for Percona:
shell> sudo yum-config-manager --disable percona-release
       You can perform the same task by removing the entry for
       the software repository existing in one of the repository
       files under the /etc/yum.repos.d/ directory. This is how
       the entry typically looks like for MariaDB:
[mariadb] name = MariaDB
 baseurl = [base URL for repository]
 gpgkey = [URL for GPG key]
 gpgcheck =1
       The entry is usually found in the file
       /etc/yum.repos.d/MariaDB.repo for MariaDB---delete the
       file, or remove entry from it (or from the file in which
       you find the entry).
       Note
       This step is not necessary for an installation that was
       configured with a Yum repository release package (like
       Percona) if you are going to remove the release package
       (percona-release.noarch for Percona), as shown in the
       uninstall command for Percona in Step 3 below.

    3. Uninstalling the Nonnative Third-Party MySQL Distribution
       of MySQL
       The nonnative third-party MySQL distribution must first
       be uninstalled before you can use the MySQL Yum
       repository to install MySQL. For the MariaDB packages
       found in Step 2 above, uninstall them with the following
       command:
shell> sudo yum remove MariaDB-common MariaDB-compat MariaDB-server
       For the Percona packages we found in Step 2 above:
shell> sudo yum remove Percona-Server-client-55 Percona-Server-server-
55 \
  Percona-Server-shared-55.i686 percona-release

    4. Installing MySQL with the MySQL Yum Repository
       Then, install MySQL with the MySQL Yum repository by
       following the instructions given in Section 2.5.1,
       "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL Yum
       Repository:" .
       Important

          + If you have chosen to replace your third-party MySQL
            distribution with a newer version of MySQL from the
            MySQL Yum repository, remember to run mysql_upgrade
            after the server starts, to check and possibly
            resolve any incompatibilities between the old data
            and the upgraded software. mysql_upgrade also
            performs other functions; see Section 4.4.7,
            "mysql_upgrade --- Check and Upgrade MySQL Tables"
            for details.

          + For EL7-based platforms: See Section 2.5.1, "."

2.5.3 Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL APT Repository

   The MySQL APT repository provides deb packages for installing
   and managing the MySQL server, client, and other components
   on the following Linux platforms: :

     * Debian 7.x ("wheezy")

     * Ubuntu 12.04 LTS ("Precise Pangolin")

     * Ubuntu 14.04 LTS ("Trusty Tahr")

     * Ubuntu 14.10 ("Utopic Unicorn")

   Instructions for using the MySQL APT Repository are available
   in A Quick Guide to Using the MySQL APT Repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-apt-repo-quick-guide/en/).
   Note

   The MySQL APT Repository is now in development release. We
   encourage you to try it and provide us with feedback. Please
   report any bugs or inconsistencies you observe to our Bugs
   Database (http://bugs.mysql.com).

2.5.4 Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL SLES Repository

   The MySQL SLES repository provides RPM packages for
   installing and managing the MySQL server, client, and other
   components on SUSE Enterprise Linux Server.

   Instructions for using the MySQL SLES repository are
   available in A Quick Guide to Using the MySQL SLES Repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-sles-repo-quick-guide/en/).
   Note

   The MySQL SLES repository is now in development release. We
   encourage you to try it and provide us with feedback. Please
   report any bugs or inconsistencies you observe to our Bugs
   Database (http://bugs.mysql.com).

2.5.5 Installing MySQL on Linux Using RPM Packages

   Note

   To install or upgrade to MySQL 5.6.11 or later, be sure to
   read the special instructions at the end of this section.

   The recommended way to install MySQL on RPM-based Linux
   distributions that use glibc is by using the RPM packages
   provided by MySQL. There are two sources for obtaining the
   Community versions of the RPM packages:

     * From the MySQL software repositories, for the following
       platforms:

          + For EL5, EL6, or EL7-based platforms and Fedora 20
            or 21, use the MySQL Yum repository (see Section
            2.5.1, "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL
            Yum Repository" for details).

          + For SUSE Enterprise Linux Server, use the MySQL SLES
            repository (see Section 2.5.4, "Installing MySQL on
            Linux Using the MySQL SLES Repository" for details).

     * From the MySQL Downloads page
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/) in the MySQL Developer
       Zone (http://dev.mysql.com/), on which we provide various
       RPM packages that work for different platforms.

   The discussions in this section only apply to the RPM
   packages directly downloaded from the MySQL Developer Zone.
   Installations created with these packages result in files
   under the system directories shown in the following table.

   Table 2.6 MySQL Installation Layout for Linux RPM Packages
   from the MySQL Developer Zone
   Directory Contents of Directory
   /usr/bin Client programs and scripts
   /usr/sbin The mysqld server
   /var/lib/mysql Log files, databases
   /usr/share/info MySQL manual in Info format
   /usr/share/man Unix manual pages
   /usr/include/mysql Include (header) files
   /usr/lib/mysql Libraries
   /usr/share/mysql Miscellaneous support files, including error
   messages, character set files, sample configuration files,
   SQL for database installation
   /usr/share/sql-bench Benchmarks
   Note

   RPM distributions of MySQL are also provided by other
   vendors. Be aware that they may differ from those built by us
   in features, capabilities, and conventions (including
   communication setup), and that the instructions in this
   manual do not necessarily apply to installing them. The
   vendor's instructions should be consulted instead. Because of
   these differences, RPM packages built by us check whether
   such RPMs built by other vendors are installed. If so, the
   RPM does not install and produces a message explaining this.

   Conflicts can arise when an RPM from another vendor is
   already installed, such as when a vendor's convention about
   which files belong with the server and which belong with the
   client library differ from the breakdown used for Oracle
   packages. In such cases, attempts to install an Oracle RPM
   with rpm -i may result in messages that files in the RPM to
   be installed conflict with files from an installed package
   (denoted mysql-libs in the following paragraphs).

   We provide a MySQL-shared-compat package with each MySQL
   release. This package is meant to replace mysql-libs and
   provides a replacement-compatible client library for older
   MySQL series. MySQL-shared-compat is set up to make
   mysql-libs obsolete, but rpm explicitly refuses to replace
   obsoleted packages when invoked with -i (unlike -U), which is
   why installation with rpm -i produces a conflict.

   MySQL-shared-compat can safely be installed alongside
   mysql-libs because libraries are installed to different
   locations. Therefore, it is possible to install shared-compat
   first, then manually remove mysql-libs before continuing with
   the installation. After mysql-libs is removed, the dynamic
   linker stops looking for the client library in the location
   where mysql-libs puts it, and the library provided by the
   MySQL-shared-compat package takes over.

   Another alternative is to install packages using yum. In a
   directory containing all RPM packages for a MySQL release,
   yum install MySQL*rpm installs them in the correct order and
   removes mysql-libs in one step without conflicts.

   In most cases, you need to install only the MySQL-server and
   MySQL-client packages to get a functional MySQL installation.
   The other packages are not required for a standard
   installation.

   As of MySQL 5.6.8, new RPM install operations (not upgrades)
   invoke mysql_install_db with the --random-passwords option
   that provides for more secure MySQL installation. Invoking
   mysql_install_db with --random-passwords causes it to assign
   a random password to the MySQL root accounts, set the
   "password expired" flag for those accounts, and not create
   anonymous-user MySQL accounts. It will be necessary after
   installation to start the server, connect as root using the
   password written to the $HOME/.mysql_secret file, and assign
   a new root password. Until this is done, root cannot do
   anything else. This must be done for each root account you
   intend to use. To change the password, you can use the SET
   PASSWORD statement (for example, with the mysql client). You
   can also use mysqladmin or mysql_secure_installation. For
   additional details, see Section 4.4.3, "mysql_install_db ---
   Initialize MySQL Data Directory." (Install operations using
   RPMs for Unbreakable Linux Network are unaffected because
   they do not use mysql_install_db.)
   Important

   RPMs for MySQL Cluster.  Standard MySQL server RPMs built by
   MySQL do not provide support for the NDBCLUSTER storage
   engine. For more information about installing MySQL Cluster
   from RPMs, see Section 18.2, "MySQL Cluster Installation."

   When upgrading a MySQL Cluster RPM installation, you must
   upgrade all installed RPMs, including the Server and Client
   RPMs.

   For upgrades, if your installation was originally produced by
   installing multiple RPM packages, it is best to upgrade all
   the packages, not just some. For example, if you previously
   installed the server and client RPMs, do not upgrade just the
   server RPM.

   If the data directory exists at RPM installation time, the
   installation process does not modify existing data. This has
   the effect, for example, that accounts in the grant tables
   are not initialized to the default set of accounts.

   If you get a dependency failure when trying to install MySQL
   packages (for example, error: removing these packages would
   break dependencies: libmysqlclient.so.10 is needed by ...),
   you should also install the MySQL-shared-compat package,
   which includes the shared libraries for older releases for
   backward compatibility.

   The RPM packages shown in the following list are available.
   The names shown here use a suffix of
   .linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm, but particular packages can have
   different suffixes, described later. If you plan to install
   multiple RPM packages, you may wish to download the RPM
   Bundle tar file instead, which contains multiple RPM packages
   to that you need not download them separately.

     * MySQL-server-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       The MySQL server. You need this unless you only want to
       connect to a MySQL server running on another machine.

     * MySQL-client-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       The standard MySQL client programs. You probably always
       want to install this package.

     * MySQL-devel-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       The libraries and include files that are needed if to
       compile other MySQL clients, such as the Perl modules.
       Install this RPM if you intend to compile C API
       applications.

     * MySQL-shared-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       This package contains the shared libraries
       (libmysqlclient.so*) that certain languages and
       applications need to dynamically load and use MySQL. It
       contains single-threaded and thread-safe libraries.
       Install this RPM if you intend to compile or run C API
       applications that depend on the shared client library.

     * MySQL-shared-compat-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       This package includes the shared libraries for older
       releases, but not the libraries for the current release.
       It contains single-threaded and thread-safe libraries.
       Install this package if you have applications installed
       that are dynamically linked against older versions of
       MySQL but you want to upgrade to the current version
       without breaking the library dependencies.
       As of MySQL 5.6.5, the MySQL-shared-compat RPM package
       enables users of Red Hat-provided mysql-*-5.1 RPM
       packages to migrate to Oracle-provided MySQL-*-5.5
       packages. MySQL-shared-compat replaces the Red Hat
       mysql-libs package by replacing libmysqlclient.so files
       of the latter package, thus satisfying dependencies of
       other packages on mysql-libs. This change affects only
       users of Red Hat (or Red Hat-compatible) RPM packages.
       Nothing is different for users of Oracle RPM packages.

     * MySQL-embedded-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       The embedded MySQL server library.

     * MySQL-test-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
       This package includes the MySQL test suite.

     * MySQL-VERSION.src.rpm
       This contains the source code for all of the previous
       packages. It can also be used to rebuild the RPMs on
       other architectures (for example, Alpha or SPARC).

   The suffix of RPM package names (following the VERSION value)
   has the following syntax:
.PLATFORM.CPU.rpm

   The PLATFORM and CPU values indicate the type of system for
   which the package is built. PLATFORM indicates the platform
   and CPU indicates the processor type or family.

   All packages are dynamically linked against glibc 2.5. The
   PLATFORM value indicates whether the package is platform
   independent or intended for a specific platform, as shown in
   the following table.

   Table 2.7 MySQL Linux Installation Packages
   PLATFORM Value Intended Use
   linux_glibc25 Platform independent, should run on any Linux
   distribution that supports glibc 2.5
   rhel5, rhel6 Red Hat Enterprise Linux 5 or 6
   el6, el7 Enterprise Linux 6 or 7
   sles10, sles11 SUSE Linux Enterprise Server 10 or 11

   In MySQL 5.6, only linux_glibc2.5 packages are available
   currently.

   The CPU value indicates the processor type or family for
   which the package is built.

   Table 2.8 MySQL Installation Packages for Linux CPU
   Identifiers
      CPU Value      Intended Processor Type or Family
   i386, i586, i686 Pentium processor or better, 32 bit
   x86_64           64-bit x86 processor
   ia64             Itanium (IA-64) processor

   To see all files in an RPM package (for example, a
   MySQL-server RPM), run a command like this:
shell> rpm -qpl MySQL-server-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

   To perform a standard minimal installation, install the
   server and client RPMs:
shell> rpm -i MySQL-server-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
shell> rpm -i MySQL-client-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

   To install only the client programs, install just the client
   RPM:
shell> rpm -i MySQL-client-VERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

   RPM provides a feature to verify the integrity and
   authenticity of packages before installing them. To learn
   more about this feature, see Section 2.1.3, "Verifying
   Package Integrity Using MD5 Checksums or GnuPG."

   The server RPM places data under the /var/lib/mysql
   directory. The RPM also creates a login account for a user
   named mysql (if one does not exist) to use for running the
   MySQL server, and creates the appropriate entries in
   /etc/init.d/ to start the server automatically at boot time.
   (This means that if you have performed a previous
   installation and have made changes to its startup script, you
   may want to make a copy of the script so that you do not lose
   it when you install a newer RPM.) See Section 2.10.5,
   "Starting and Stopping MySQL Automatically," for more
   information on how MySQL can be started automatically on
   system startup.

   In MySQL 5.6, during a new installation, the server boot
   scripts are installed, but the MySQL server is not started at
   the end of the installation, since the status of the server
   during an unattended installation is not known.

   In MySQL 5.6, during an upgrade installation using the RPM
   packages, if the MySQL server is running when the upgrade
   occurs, the MySQL server is stopped, the upgrade occurs, and
   the MySQL server is restarted. If the MySQL server is not
   already running when the RPM upgrade occurs, the MySQL server
   is not started at the end of the installation.
   Note

   If you are upgrading from a community version to a commercial
   version of MySQL (which actually requires you to first
   uninstall the community version and then install the
   commercial version), you must restart the server manually
   after the upgrade.

   If something goes wrong, you can find more information in the
   binary installation section. See Section 2.2, "Installing
   MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic Binaries."
   Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables
   initially have no passwords. After starting the server, you
   should set up passwords for them using the instructions in
   Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and Testing."

   During RPM installation, a user named mysql and a group named
   mysql are created on the system. This is done using the
   useradd, groupadd, and usermod commands. Those commands
   require appropriate administrative privileges, which is
   required for locally managed users and groups (as listed in
   the /etc/passwd and /etc/group files) by the RPM installation
   process being run by root.

   If you log in as the mysql user, you may find that MySQL
   displays "Invalid (old?) table or database name" errors that
   mention .mysqlgui, lost+found, .mysqlgui, .bash_history,
   .fonts.cache-1, .lesshst, .mysql_history, .profile, .viminfo,
   and similar files created by MySQL or operating system
   utilities. You can safely ignore these error messages or
   remove the files or directories that cause them if you do not
   need them.

   For nonlocal user management (LDAP, NIS, and so forth), the
   administrative tools may require additional authentication
   (such as a password), and will fail if the installing user
   does not provide this authentication. Even if they fail, the
   RPM installation will not abort but succeed, and this is
   intentional. If they failed, some of the intended transfer of
   ownership may be missing, and it is recommended that the
   system administrator then manually ensures some appropriate
   user and group exists and manually transfers ownership
   following the actions in the RPM spec file.

   In MySQL 5.6.11, the RPM spec file has been updated, which
   has the following consequences:

     * For a non-upgrade installation (no existing MySQL version
       installed), it possible to install MySQL using yum.

     * For upgrades, it is necessary to clean up any earlier
       MySQL installations. In effect, the update is performed
       by removing the old installations and installing the new
       one.

   Additional details follow.

   For a non-upgrade installation of MySQL 5.6.11 or later, it
   is possible to install using yum:
shell> yum install MySQL-server-NEWVERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

   For upgrades to MySQL 5.6.11 or later, the upgrade is
   performed by removing the old installation and installing the
   new one. To do this, use the following procedure:

    1. Remove the existing 5.6.X installation. OLDVERSION is the
       version to remove.
shell> rpm -e MySQL-server-OLDVERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

       Repeat this step for all installed MySQL RPMs.

    2. Install the new version. NEWVERSION is the version to
       install.
shell> rpm -ivh MySQL-server-NEWVERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

   Alternatively, the removal and installation can be done using
   yum:
shell> yum remove MySQL-server-OLDVERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm
shell> yum install MySQL-server-NEWVERSION.linux_glibc2.5.i386.rpm

2.5.6 Installing MySQL on Linux Using Debian Packages from Oracle

   Oracle provides Debian packages for installing MySQL on
   Debian or Debian-like Linux systems. The packages are
   available through two different channels:

     * The MySQL APT Repository
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/apt/), supporting
       the Debian 7, Ubuntu 12, and Ubuntu 14 platforms. For
       details, see Section 2.5.3, "Installing MySQL on Linux
       Using the MySQL APT Repository."

     * The MySQL Developer Zone's Download Area
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/). For details, see
       Section 2.1.2, "How to Get MySQL." The following are some
       information on the Debian packages available there and
       the instructions for installing them:

          + You may also need to install the libaio library if
            it is not already present on your system:
shell> sudo apt-get install libaio1


          + For Debian 7, Ubuntu 12, and Ubuntu 14:
               o Various Debian packages are provided in the
                 MySQL Developer Zone for installing different
                 components of MySQL. The preferred method is to
                 use the tarball bundle, which contains the
                 packages needed for a basic setup of MySQL. The
                 tarball bundles have names in the format of
                 mysql-server_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb-bundle.tar. MVER
                 is the MySQL version and DVER is the Linux
                 distribution version. The CPU value indicates
                 the processor type or family for which the
                 package is built, as shown in the following
                 table:
                 Table 2.9 MySQL Debian 7 and Ubuntu
                 Installation Packages CPU Identifiers

                 CPU Value  Intended Processor Type or Family
                 i386      Pentium processor or better, 32 bit
                 amd64     64-bit x86 processor
               o After downloading the tarball, unpack it with
                 the following command:
shell> tar -xvf mysql-server_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb-bundle.tar

               o In general, install the deb packages unpacked
                 from the tarball with the command (see
                 explanations below for the extra steps required
                 for installing the server package):
shell> sudo dpkg -i package-name.deb
                 There are four packages to install:
                    # The database common files (install this
                      package before the other ones):
shell> sudo dpkg -i mysql-common_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb
                    # The MySQL server:
                      Install first the package for the database
                      common files (see the last bullet), and
                      then pre-configure your server
                      installation by the following command:
shell> dpkg-preconfigure mysql-community-server_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb
                      There are then two requests for you:
                         @ Supply a password for the root user
                           for your MySQL installation.
                           Important
                           Make sure you remember the root
                           password you set. Users who want to
                           set a password later can leave the
                           password field blank in the dialogue
                           box and just press OK. However, it is
                           very important that you set the
                           password soon using the program
                           mysql_secure_installation, as people
                           can gain anonymous access to your
                           MySQL server until you have secured
                           the database's root account with a
                           password.
                         @ Indicate if you want to install the
                           test database with "Yes" or "No".
                           Installation of the test database is
                           not recommended for production
                           environments.
                      Next, install the server package with the
                      following command:
shell> sudo dpkg -i mysql-community-server_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb
                    # The MySQL client:
shell> sudo dpkg -i mysql-community-client_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb
                    # The MySQL shared client library:
shell> sudo dpkg -i libmysqlclient18_MVER-DVER_CPU.deb
                 Here are where the files are installed on the
                 system:
                    # All configuration files (like my.cnf) are
                      under /etc
                    # All binaries, libraries, headers, etc.,
                      are under /usr
                    # The data directory is under /var

          + For Debian 6:
               o Debian package files directly downloaded from
                 the MySQL Developer Zone have names in the
                 mysql-MVER-DVER-CPU.deb format. MVER is the
                 MySQL version and DVER is the Debian version.
                 The CPU value indicates the processor type or
                 family for which the package is built, as shown
                 in the following table:
                 Table 2.10 MySQL Debian 6 Installation Package
                 CPU Identifiers

                 CPU Value  Intended Processor Type or Family
                 i686      Pentium processor or better, 32 bit
                 x86_64    64-bit x86 processor
               o After downloading a Debian package, use the
                 following command to install it;
shell> dpkg -i mysql-MVER-DVER-CPU.deb

                 The Debian package installs files under the
                 /opt/mysql/server-5.6 directory.

   Note

   Debian distributions of MySQL are also provided by other
   vendors. Be aware that they may differ from those built by
   Oracle in features, capabilities, and conventions (including
   communication setup), and that the instructions in this
   manual do not necessarily apply to installing them. The
   vendor's instructions should be consulted instead.

2.5.7 Installing MySQL on Linux from the Native Software
Repositories

   Many Linux distributions include a version of the MySQL
   server, client tools, and development components in their
   native software repositories and can be installed with the
   platforms' standard package management systems. This section
   provides basic instructions for installing MySQL using those
   package management systems.
   Important

   Native packages are often several versions behind the
   currently available release. You will also normally be unable
   to install development milestone releases (DMRs), as these
   are not usually made available in the native repositories.
   Before proceeding, we recommend that you check out the other
   installation options described in Section 2.5, "Installing
   MySQL on Linux."

   Distribution specific instructions are shown below:

     * Red Hat Linux, Fedora, CentOS
       Note
       For EL5, EL6, or EL7-based Linux platforms and Fedora 20
       or 21, you can install MySQL using the MySQL Yum
       repository instead of the platform's native software
       repository. See Section 2.5.1, "Installing MySQL on Linux
       Using the MySQL Yum Repository" for details.
       For Red Hat and similar distributions, the MySQL
       distribution is divided into a number of separate
       packages, mysql for the client tools, mysql-server for
       the server and associated tools, and mysql-libs for the
       libraries. The libraries are required if you want to
       provide connectivity from different languages and
       environments such as Perl, Python and others.
       To install, use the yum command to specify the packages
       that you want to install. For example:
root-shell> yum install mysql mysql-server mysql-libs mysql-server
Loaded plugins: presto, refresh-packagekit
Setting up Install Process
Resolving Dependencies
--> Running transaction check
---> Package mysql.x86_64 0:5.1.48-2.fc13 set to be updated
---> Package mysql-libs.x86_64 0:5.1.48-2.fc13 set to be updated
---> Package mysql-server.x86_64 0:5.1.48-2.fc13 set to be updated
--> Processing Dependency: perl-DBD-MySQL for package: mysql-server-5.
1.48-2.fc13.x86_64
--> Running transaction check
---> Package perl-DBD-MySQL.x86_64 0:4.017-1.fc13 set to be updated
--> Finished Dependency Resolution

Dependencies Resolved

======================================================================
==========
 Package               Arch          Version               Repository
     Size
======================================================================
==========
Installing:
 mysql                 x86_64        5.1.48-2.fc13         updates
    889 k
 mysql-libs            x86_64        5.1.48-2.fc13         updates
    1.2 M
 mysql-server          x86_64        5.1.48-2.fc13         updates
    8.1 M
Installing for dependencies:
 perl-DBD-MySQL        x86_64        4.017-1.fc13          updates
    136 k

Transaction Summary
======================================================================
==========
Install       4 Package(s)
Upgrade       0 Package(s)

Total download size: 10 M
Installed size: 30 M
Is this ok [y/N]: y
Downloading Packages:
Setting up and reading Presto delta metadata
Processing delta metadata
Package(s) data still to download: 10 M
(1/4): mysql-5.1.48-2.fc13.x86_64.rpm                    | 889 kB
00:04
(2/4): mysql-libs-5.1.48-2.fc13.x86_64.rpm               | 1.2 MB
00:06
(3/4): mysql-server-5.1.48-2.fc13.x86_64.rpm             | 8.1 MB
00:40
(4/4): perl-DBD-MySQL-4.017-1.fc13.x86_64.rpm            | 136 kB
00:00
----------------------------------------------------------------------
----------
Total                                           201 kB/s |  10 MB
00:52
Running rpm_check_debug
Running Transaction Test
Transaction Test Succeeded
Running Transaction
  Installing     : mysql-libs-5.1.48-2.fc13.x86_64
      1/4
  Installing     : mysql-5.1.48-2.fc13.x86_64
      2/4
  Installing     : perl-DBD-MySQL-4.017-1.fc13.x86_64
      3/4
  Installing     : mysql-server-5.1.48-2.fc13.x86_64
      4/4

Installed:
  mysql.x86_64 0:5.1.48-2.fc13            mysql-libs.x86_64 0:5.1.48-2
.fc13
  mysql-server.x86_64 0:5.1.48-2.fc13

Dependency Installed:
  perl-DBD-MySQL.x86_64 0:4.017-1.fc13


Complete!

       MySQL and the MySQL server should now be installed. A
       sample configuration file is installed into /etc/my.cnf.
       An init script, to start and stop the server, will have
       been installed into /etc/init.d/mysqld. To start the
       MySQL server use service:
root-shell> service mysqld start

       To enable the server to be started and stopped
       automatically during boot, use chkconfig:
root-shell> chkconfig --levels 235 mysqld on

       Which enables the MySQL server to be started (and
       stopped) automatically at the specified the run levels.
       The database tables will have been automatically created
       for you, if they do not already exist. You should,
       however, run mysql_secure_installation to set the root
       passwords on your server.

     * Debian, Ubuntu, Kubuntu
       Note
       For Debian 7, Ubuntu 12, and Ubuntu 14, MySQL can be
       installed using the MySQL APT Repository
       (http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/repo/apt/) instead of the
       platform's native software repository. See Section 2.5.3,
       "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL APT
       Repository" for details.
       On Debian and related distributions, there are two
       packages for MySQL in their software repositories,
       mysql-client and mysql-server, for the client and server
       components respectively. You should specify an explicit
       version, for example mysql-client-5.1, to ensure that you
       install the version of MySQL that you want.
       To download and install, including any dependencies, use
       the apt-get command, specifying the packages that you
       want to install.
       Note
       Before installing, make sure that you update your apt-get
       index files to ensure you are downloading the latest
       available version.
       A sample installation of the MySQL packages might look
       like this (some sections trimmed for clarity):
root-shell> apt-get install mysql-client-5.1 mysql-server-5.1
Reading package lists... Done
Building dependency tree
Reading state information... Done
The following packages were automatically installed and are no longer
required:
  linux-headers-2.6.28-11 linux-headers-2.6.28-11-generic
Use 'apt-get autoremove' to remove them.
The following extra packages will be installed:
  bsd-mailx libdbd-mysql-perl libdbi-perl libhtml-template-perl
  libmysqlclient15off libmysqlclient16 libnet-daemon-perl libplrpc-per
l mailx
  mysql-common postfix
Suggested packages:
  dbishell libipc-sharedcache-perl tinyca procmail postfix-mysql postf
ix-pgsql
  postfix-ldap postfix-pcre sasl2-bin resolvconf postfix-cdb
The following NEW packages will be installed
  bsd-mailx libdbd-mysql-perl libdbi-perl libhtml-template-perl
  libmysqlclient15off libmysqlclient16 libnet-daemon-perl libplrpc-per
l mailx
  mysql-client-5.1 mysql-common mysql-server-5.1 postfix
0 upgraded, 13 newly installed, 0 to remove and 182 not upgraded.
Need to get 1907kB/25.3MB of archives.
After this operation, 59.5MB of additional disk space will be used.
Do you want to continue [Y/n]? Y
Get: 1 http://gb.archive.ubuntu.com jaunty-updates/main mysql-common 5
.1.30really5.0.75-0ubuntu10.5 [63.6kB]
Get: 2 http://gb.archive.ubuntu.com jaunty-updates/main libmysqlclient
15off 5.1.30really5.0.75-0ubuntu10.5 [1843kB]
Fetched 1907kB in 9s (205kB/s)

Preconfiguring packages ...
Selecting previously deselected package mysql-common.
(Reading database ... 121260 files and directories currently installed
.)
...
Processing 1 added doc-base file(s)...
Registering documents with scrollkeeper...
Setting up libnet-daemon-perl (0.43-1) ...
Setting up libplrpc-perl (0.2020-1) ...
Setting up libdbi-perl (1.607-1) ...
Setting up libmysqlclient15off (5.1.30really5.0.75-0ubuntu10.5) ...

Setting up libdbd-mysql-perl (4.008-1) ...
Setting up libmysqlclient16 (5.1.31-1ubuntu2) ...

Setting up mysql-client-5.1 (5.1.31-1ubuntu2) ...

Setting up mysql-server-5.1 (5.1.31-1ubuntu2) ...

 * Stopping MySQL database server mysqld
   ...done.
100825 11:46:15  InnoDB: Started; log sequence number 0 46409
100825 11:46:15  InnoDB: Starting shutdown...
100825 11:46:17  InnoDB: Shutdown completed; log sequence number 0 464
09
100825 11:46:17 [Warning] Forcing shutdown of 1 plugins

 * Starting MySQL database server mysqld
   ...done.

 * Checking for corrupt, not cleanly closed and upgrade needing tables
.
...
Processing triggers for libc6 ...
ldconfig deferred processing now taking place

       Note
       The apt-get command will install a number of packages,
       including the MySQL server, in order to provide the
       typical tools and application environment. This can mean
       that you install a large number of packages in addition
       to the main MySQL package.
       During installation, the initial database will be
       created, and you will be prompted for the MySQL root
       password (and confirmation). A configuration file will
       have been created in /etc/mysql/my.cnf. An init script
       will have been created in /etc/init.d/mysql.
       The server will already be started. You can manually
       start and stop the server using:
root-shell> service mysql [start|stop]

       The service will automatically be added to the 2, 3 and 4
       run levels, with stop scripts in the single, shutdown and
       restart levels.

     * Gentoo Linux
       As a source-based distribution, installing MySQL on
       Gentoo involves downloading the source, patching the
       Gentoo specifics, and then compiling the MySQL server and
       installing it. This process is handled automatically by
       the emerge command. Depending on the version of MySQL
       that you want to install, you may need to unmask the
       specific version that you want for your chosen platform.
       The MySQL server and client tools are provided within a
       single package, dev-db/mysql. You can obtain a list of
       the versions available to install by looking at the
       portage directory for the package:
root-shell> ls /usr/portage/dev-db/mysql/mysql-5.1*
mysql-5.1.39-r1.ebuild
mysql-5.1.44-r1.ebuild
mysql-5.1.44-r2.ebuild
mysql-5.1.44-r3.ebuild
mysql-5.1.44.ebuild
mysql-5.1.45-r1.ebuild
mysql-5.1.45.ebuild
mysql-5.1.46.ebuild

       To install a specific MySQL version, you must specify the
       entire atom. For example:
root-shell> emerge =dev-db/mysql-5.1.46

       A simpler alternative is to use the virtual/mysql-5.1
       package, which will install the latest version:
root-shell> emerge =virtual/mysql-5.1

       If the package is masked (because it is not tested or
       certified for the current platform), use the
       ACCEPT_KEYWORDS environment variable. For example:
root-shell> ACCEPT_KEYWORDS="~x86" emerge =virtual/mysql-5.1

       After installation, you should create a new database
       using mysql_install_db, and set the password for the root
       user on MySQL. You can use the configuration interface to
       set the password and create the initial database:
root-shell> emerge --config =dev-db/mysql-5.1.46

       A sample configuration file will have been created for
       you in /etc/mysql/my.cnf, and an init script will have
       been created in /etc/init.d/mysql.
       To enable MySQL to start automatically at the normal
       (default) run levels, you can use:
root-shell> rc-update add mysql default

2.6 Installing MySQL Using Unbreakable Linux Network (ULN)

   Linux supports a number of different solutions for installing
   MySQL, covered in Section 2.5, "Installing MySQL on Linux."
   One of the methods, covered in this section, is installing
   from Oracle's Unbreakable Linux Network (ULN). You can find
   information about Oracle Linux and ULN under
   http://linux.oracle.com/.

   To use ULN, you need to obtain a ULN login and register the
   machine used for installation with ULN. This is described in
   detail in the ULN FAQ
   (https://linux.oracle.com/uln_faq.html). The page also
   describes how to install and update packages.The MySQL
   packages are in the "MySQL for Oracle Linux 6" and "MySQL for
   Oracle Linux 7" channels for your system architecture on ULN.
   Note

   At the time of this writing, ULN provides MySQL 5.6 for
   Oracle Linux 6 and Oracle Linux 7.

   Once MySQL has been installed using ULN, you can find
   information on starting and stopping the server, and more, in
   this section, particularly under Section 2.5.5, "Installing
   MySQL on Linux Using RPM Packages."

   If you're updating an existing MySQL installation to an
   installation using ULN, the recommended procedure is to
   export your data using mysqldump, remove the existing
   installation, install MySQL from ULN, and load the exported
   data into your freshly installed MySQL.

   If the existing MySQL installation you're upgrading from is
   from a previous release series (prior to MySQL 5.6), make
   sure to read the section on upgrading MySQL, Section 2.11.1,
   "Upgrading MySQL."

2.7 Installing MySQL on Solaris and OpenSolaris

   MySQL on Solaris and OpenSolaris is available in a number of
   different formats.

     * For information on installing using the native Solaris
       PKG format, see Section 2.7.1, "Installing MySQL on
       Solaris Using a Solaris PKG."

     * On OpenSolaris, the standard package repositories include
       MySQL packages specially built for OpenSolaris that
       include entries for the Service Management Framework
       (SMF) to enable control of the installation using the SMF
       administration commands. For more information, see
       Section 2.7.2, "Installing MySQL on OpenSolaris Using
       IPS."

     * To use a standard tar binary installation, use the notes
       provided in Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux
       Using Generic Binaries." Check the notes and hints at the
       end of this section for Solaris specific notes that you
       may need before or after installation.

   To obtain a binary MySQL distribution for Solaris in tarball
   or PKG format, http://dev.mysql.com/downloads/mysql/5.6.html.

   Additional notes to be aware of when installing and using
   MySQL on Solaris:

     * If you want to use MySQL with the mysql user and group,
       use the groupadd and useradd commands:
groupadd mysql
useradd -g mysql mysql


     * If you install MySQL using a binary tarball distribution
       on Solaris, you may run into trouble even before you get
       the MySQL distribution unpacked, as the Solaris tar
       cannot handle long file names. This means that you may
       see errors when you try to unpack MySQL.
       If this occurs, you must use GNU tar (gtar) to unpack the
       distribution. In Solaris 10 and OpenSolaris gtar is
       normally located in /usr/sfw/bin/gtar, but may not be
       included in the default path definition.

     * When using Solaris 10 for x86_64, you should mount any
       file systems on which you intend to store InnoDB files
       with the forcedirectio option. (By default mounting is
       done without this option.) Failing to do so will cause a
       significant drop in performance when using the InnoDB
       storage engine on this platform.

     * If you would like MySQL to start automatically, you can
       copy support-files/mysql.server to /etc/init.d and create
       a symbolic link to it named /etc/rc3.d/S99mysql.server.

     * If too many processes try to connect very rapidly to
       mysqld, you should see this error in the MySQL log:
Error in accept: Protocol error

       You might try starting the server with the --back_log=50
       option as a workaround for this.

     * To configure the generation of core files on Solaris you
       should use the coreadm command. Because of the security
       implications of generating a core on a setuid()
       application, by default, Solaris does not support core
       files on setuid() programs. However, you can modify this
       behavior using coreadm. If you enable setuid() core files
       for the current user, they will be generated using the
       mode 600 and owned by the superuser.

2.7.1 Installing MySQL on Solaris Using a Solaris PKG

   You can install MySQL on Solaris and OpenSolaris using a
   binary package using the native Solaris PKG format instead of
   the binary tarball distribution.

   To use this package, download the corresponding
   mysql-VERSION-solaris10-PLATFORM.pkg.gz file, then uncompress
   it. For example:
shell> gunzip mysql-5.6.25-solaris10-x86_64.pkg.gz

   To install a new package, use pkgadd and follow the onscreen
   prompts. You must have root privileges to perform this
   operation:
shell> pkgadd -d mysql-5.6.25-solaris10-x86_64.pkg

The following packages are available:
  1  mysql     MySQL Community Server (GPL)
               (i86pc) 5.6.25

Select package(s) you wish to process (or 'all' to process
all packages). (default: all) [?,??,q]:

   The PKG installer installs all of the files and tools needed,
   and then initializes your database if one does not exist. To
   complete the installation, you should set the root password
   for MySQL as provided in the instructions at the end of the
   installation. Alternatively, you can run the
   mysql_secure_installation script that comes with the
   installation.

   By default, the PKG package installs MySQL under the root
   path /opt/mysql. You can change only the installation root
   path when using pkgadd, which can be used to install MySQL in
   a different Solaris zone. If you need to install in a
   specific directory, use a binary tar file distribution.

   The pkg installer copies a suitable startup script for MySQL
   into /etc/init.d/mysql. To enable MySQL to startup and
   shutdown automatically, you should create a link between this
   file and the init script directories. For example, to ensure
   safe startup and shutdown of MySQL you could use the
   following commands to add the right links:
shell> ln /etc/init.d/mysql /etc/rc3.d/S91mysql
shell> ln /etc/init.d/mysql /etc/rc0.d/K02mysql

   To remove MySQL, the installed package name is mysql. You can
   use this in combination with the pkgrm command to remove the
   installation.

   To upgrade when using the Solaris package file format, you
   must remove the existing installation before installing the
   updated package. Removal of the package does not delete the
   existing database information, only the server, binaries and
   support files. The typical upgrade sequence is therefore:
shell> mysqladmin shutdown
shell> pkgrm mysql
shell> pkgadd -d mysql-5.6.25-solaris10-x86_64.pkg
shell> mysqld_safe &
shell> mysql_upgrade

   You should check the notes in Section 2.11, "Upgrading or
   Downgrading MySQL" before performing any upgrade.

2.7.2 Installing MySQL on OpenSolaris Using IPS

   OpenSolaris includes standard packages for MySQL in the core
   repository. The MySQL packages are based on a specific
   release of MySQL and updated periodically. For the latest
   release you must use either the native Solaris PKG, tar, or
   source installations. The native OpenSolaris packages include
   SMF files so that you can easily control your MySQL
   installation, including automatic startup and recovery, using
   the native service management tools.

   To install MySQL on OpenSolaris, use the pkg command. You
   will need to be logged in as root, or use the pfexec tool, as
   shown in the example below:
shell> pfexec pkg install SUNWmysql56

   The package set installs three individual packages,
   SUNWmysql56lib, which contains the MySQL client libraries;
   SUNWmysql56r which contains the root components, including
   SMF and configuration files; and SUNWmysql56u which contains
   the scripts, binary tools and other files. You can install
   these packages individually if you only need the
   corresponding components.

   The MySQL files are installed into /usr/mysql which symbolic
   links for the sub directories (bin, lib, etc.) to a version
   specific directory. For MySQL 5.6, the full installation is
   located in /usr/mysql/5.6. The default data directory is
   /var/mysql/5.6/data. The configuration file is installed in
   /etc/mysql/5.6/my.cnf. This layout permits multiple versions
   of MySQL to be installed, without overwriting the data and
   binaries from other versions.

   Once installed, you must run mysql_install_db to initialize
   the database, and use the mysql_secure_installation to secure
   your installation.

Using SMF to manage your MySQL installation

   Once installed, you can start and stop your MySQL server
   using the installed SMF configuration. The service name is
   mysql, or if you have multiple versions installed, you should
   use the full version name, for example mysql:version_56. To
   start and enable MySQL to be started at boot time:
shell> svcadm enable mysql

   To disable MySQL from starting during boot time, and shut the
   MySQL server down if it is running, use:
shell> svcadm disable mysql

   To restart MySQL, for example after a configuration file
   changes, use the restart option:
shell> svcadm restart mysql

   You can also use SMF to configure the data directory and
   enable full 64-bit mode. For example, to set the data
   directory used by MySQL:
shell> svccfg
svc:> select mysql:version_56
svc:/application/database/mysql:version_56> setprop mysql/data=/data0/
mysql

   By default, the 32-bit binaries are used. To enable the
   64-bit server on 64-bit platforms, set the enable_64bit
   parameter. For example:
svc:/application/database/mysql:version_56> setprop mysql/enable_64bit
=1

   You need to refresh the SMF after settings these options:
shell> svcadm refresh mysql

2.8 Installing MySQL on FreeBSD

   This section provides information about installing MySQL on
   variants of FreeBSD Unix.

   You can install MySQL on FreeBSD by using the binary
   distribution provided by Oracle. For more information, see
   Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic
   Binaries."

   The easiest (and preferred) way to install MySQL is to use
   the mysql-server and mysql-client ports available at
   http://www.freebsd.org/. Using these ports gives you the
   following benefits:

     * A working MySQL with all optimizations enabled that are
       known to work on your version of FreeBSD.

     * Automatic configuration and build.

     * Startup scripts installed in /usr/local/etc/rc.d.

     * The ability to use pkg_info -L to see which files are
       installed.

     * The ability to use pkg_delete to remove MySQL if you no
       longer want it on your machine.

   The MySQL build process requires GNU make (gmake) to work. If
   GNU make is not available, you must install it first before
   compiling MySQL.

   To install using the ports system:
# cd /usr/ports/databases/mysql51-server
# make
...
# cd /usr/ports/databases/mysql51-client
# make
...

   The standard port installation places the server into
   /usr/local/libexec/mysqld, with the startup script for the
   MySQL server placed in /usr/local/etc/rc.d/mysql-server.

   Some additional notes on the BSD implementation:

     * To remove MySQL after installation using the ports
       system:
# cd /usr/ports/databases/mysql51-server
# make deinstall
...
# cd /usr/ports/databases/mysql51-client
# make deinstall
...


     * If you get problems with the current date in MySQL,
       setting the TZ variable should help. See Section 2.12,
       "Environment Variables."

2.9 Installing MySQL from Source

   Building MySQL from the source code enables you to customize
   build parameters, compiler optimizations, and installation
   location. For a list of systems on which MySQL is known to
   run, see
   http://www.mysql.com/support/supportedplatforms/database.html
   .

   Before you proceed with an installation from source, check
   whether Oracle produces a precompiled binary distribution for
   your platform and whether it works for you. We put a great
   deal of effort into ensuring that our binaries are built with
   the best possible options for optimal performance.
   Instructions for installing binary distributions are
   available in Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux
   Using Generic Binaries."

Source Installation Methods

   There are two methods for installing MySQL from source:

     * Use a standard MySQL source distribution. To obtain a
       standard distribution, see Section 2.1.2, "How to Get
       MySQL." For instructions on building from a standard
       distribution, see Section 2.9.2, "Installing MySQL Using
       a Standard Source Distribution."
       Standard distributions are available as compressed tar
       files, Zip archives, or RPM packages. Distribution files
       have names of the form mysql-VERSION.tar.gz,
       mysql-VERSION.zip, or mysql-VERSION.rpm, where VERSION is
       a number like 5.6.25. File names for source distributions
       can be distinguished from those for precompiled binary
       distributions in that source distribution names are
       generic and include no platform name, whereas binary
       distribution names include a platform name indicating the
       type of system for which the distribution is intended
       (for example, pc-linux-i686 or winx64).

     * Use a MySQL development tree. For information on building
       from one of the development trees, see Section 2.9.3,
       "Installing MySQL Using a Development Source Tree."

Source Installation System Requirements

   Installation of MySQL from source requires several
   development tools. Some of these tools are needed no matter
   whether you use a standard source distribution or a
   development source tree. Other tool requirements depend on
   which installation method you use.

   To install MySQL from source, your system must have the
   following tools, regardless of installation method:

     * CMake, which is used as the build framework on all
       platforms. CMake can be downloaded from
       http://www.cmake.org.

     * A good make program. Although some platforms come with
       their own make implementations, it is highly recommended
       that you use GNU make 3.75 or newer. It may already be
       available on your system as gmake. GNU make is available
       from http://www.gnu.org/software/make/.

     * A working ANSI C++ compiler. GCC 4.2.1 or later, Sun
       Studio 12 or later, Visual Studio 2010 or later, and many
       current vendor-supplied compilers are known to work.

     * Perl is needed if you intend to run test scripts. Most
       Unix-like systems include Perl. On Windows, you can use a
       version such as ActiveState Perl.

   To install MySQL from a standard source distribution, one of
   the following tools is required to unpack the distribution
   file:

     * For a .tar.gz compressed tar file: GNU gunzip to
       uncompress the distribution and a reasonable tar to
       unpack it. If your tar program supports the z option, it
       can both uncompress and unpack the file.
       GNU tar is known to work. The standard tar provided with
       some operating systems is not able to unpack the long
       file names in the MySQL distribution. You should download
       and install GNU tar, or if available, use a preinstalled
       version of GNU tar. Usually this is available as gnutar,
       gtar, or as tar within a GNU or Free Software directory,
       such as /usr/sfw/bin or /usr/local/bin. GNU tar is
       available from http://www.gnu.org/software/tar/.

     * For a .zip Zip archive: WinZip or another tool that can
       read .zip files.

     * For an .rpm RPM package: The rpmbuild program used to
       build the distribution unpacks it.

   To install MySQL from a development source tree, the
   following additional tools are required:

     * One of the following revision control systems is required
       to obtain the development source code:

          + Git: The GitHub Help (https://help.github.com/)
            provides instructions for downloading and installing
            Git on different platforms. MySQL officially joined
            GitHub in September, 2014. For more information
            about MySQL's move to GitHub, refer to the
            announcement on the MySQL Release Engineering blog:
            MySQL on GitHub
            (http://mysqlrelease.com/2014/09/mysql-on-github/)

          + Bazaar: The Bazaar VCS Web site
            (http://bazaar-vcs.org) provides instructions for
            downloading and installing Bazaar on different
            platforms. Bazaar is supported on any platform that
            supports Python, and is therefore compatible with
            any Linux, Unix, Windows, or OS X host.

     * bison 2.1 or newer, available from
       http://www.gnu.org/software/bison/. (Version 1 is no
       longer supported.) Use the latest version of bison where
       possible; if you experience problems, upgrade to a later
       version, rather than revert to an earlier one.
       bison is available from
       http://www.gnu.org/software/bison/. bison for Windows can
       be downloaded from
       http://gnuwin32.sourceforge.net/packages/bison.htm.
       Download the package labeled "Complete package, excluding
       sources". On Windows, the default location for bison is
       the C:\Program Files\GnuWin32 directory. Some utilities
       may fail to find bison because of the space in the
       directory name. Also, Visual Studio may simply hang if
       there are spaces in the path. You can resolve these
       problems by installing into a directory that does not
       contain a space; for example C:\GnuWin32.

     * On OpenSolaris and Solaris Express, m4 must be installed
       in addition to bison. m4 is available from
       http://www.gnu.org/software/m4/.

   Note

   If you have to install any programs, modify your PATH
   environment variable to include any directories in which the
   programs are located. See Section 4.2.10, "Setting
   Environment Variables."

   If you run into problems and need to file a bug report,
   please use the instructions in Section 1.7, "How to Report
   Bugs or Problems."

2.9.1 MySQL Layout for Source Installation

   By default, when you install MySQL after compiling it from
   source, the installation step installs files under
   /usr/local/mysql. The component locations under the
   installation directory are the same as for binary
   distributions. See Section 2.2, "MySQL Installation Layout
   for Generic Unix/Linux Binary Package," and Section 2.3.1,
   "MySQL Installation Layout on Microsoft Windows." To
   configure installation locations different from the defaults,
   use the options described at Section 2.9.4, "MySQL
   Source-Configuration Options."

2.9.2 Installing MySQL Using a Standard Source Distribution

   To install MySQL from a standard source distribution:

    1. Verify that your system satisfies the tool requirements
       listed at Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL from Source."

    2. Obtain a distribution file using the instructions in
       Section 2.1.2, "How to Get MySQL."

    3. Configure, build, and install the distribution using the
       instructions in this section.

    4. Perform postinstallation procedures using the
       instructions in Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and
       Testing."

   In MySQL 5.6, CMake is used as the build framework on all
   platforms. The instructions given here should enable you to
   produce a working installation. For additional information on
   using CMake to build MySQL, see How to Build MySQL Server
   with CMake
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/internals/en/cmake.html).

   If you start from a source RPM, use the following command to
   make a binary RPM that you can install. If you do not have
   rpmbuild, use rpm instead.
shell> rpmbuild --rebuild --clean MySQL-VERSION.src.rpm

   The result is one or more binary RPM packages that you
   install as indicated in Section 2.5.5, "Installing MySQL on
   Linux Using RPM Packages."

   The sequence for installation from a compressed tar file or
   Zip archive source distribution is similar to the process for
   installing from a generic binary distribution (see Section
   2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic
   Binaries"), except that it is used on all platforms and
   includes steps to configure and compile the distribution. For
   example, with a compressed tar file source distribution on
   Unix, the basic installation command sequence looks like
   this:
# Preconfiguration setup
shell> groupadd mysql
shell> useradd -r -g mysql mysql
# Beginning of source-build specific instructions
shell> tar zxvf mysql-VERSION.tar.gz
shell> cd mysql-VERSION
shell> cmake .
shell> make
shell> make install
# End of source-build specific instructions
# Postinstallation setup
shell> cd /usr/local/mysql
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql data
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &
# Next command is optional
shell> cp support-files/mysql.server /etc/init.d/mysql.server

   mysql_install_db creates a default option file named my.cnf
   in the base installation directory. This file is created from
   a template included in the distribution package named
   my-default.cnf. For more information, see Section 5.1.2.2,
   "Using a Sample Default Server Configuration File."

   A more detailed version of the source-build specific
   instructions is shown following.
   Note

   The procedure shown here does not set up any passwords for
   MySQL accounts. After following the procedure, proceed to
   Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and Testing," for
   postinstallation setup and testing.

Perform Preconfiguration Setup

   On Unix, set up the mysql user and group that will be used to
   run and execute the MySQL server and own the database
   directory. For details, see Creating a mysql System User and
   Group, in Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using
   Generic Binaries." Then perform the following steps as the
   mysql user, except as noted.

Obtain and Unpack the Distribution

   Pick the directory under which you want to unpack the
   distribution and change location into it.

   Obtain a distribution file using the instructions in Section
   2.1.2, "How to Get MySQL."

   Unpack the distribution into the current directory:

     * To unpack a compressed tar file, tar can uncompress and
       unpack the distribution if it has z option support:
shell> tar zxvf mysql-VERSION.tar.gz

       If your tar does not have z option support, use gunzip to
       unpack the distribution and tar to unpack it:
shell> gunzip < mysql-VERSION.tar.gz | tar xvf -

       Alternatively, CMake can uncompress and unpack the
       distribution:
shell> cmake -E tar zxvf mysql-VERSION.tar.gz


     * To unpack a Zip archive, use WinZip or another tool that
       can read .zip files.

   Unpacking the distribution file creates a directory named
   mysql-VERSION.

Configure the Distribution

   Change location into the top-level directory of the unpacked
   distribution:
shell> cd mysql-VERSION

   Configure the source directory. The minimum configuration
   command includes no options to override configuration
   defaults:
shell> cmake .

   On Windows, specify the development environment. For example,
   the following commands configure MySQL for 32-bit or 64-bit
   builds, respectively:
shell> cmake . -G "Visual Studio 10 2010"
shell> cmake . -G "Visual Studio 10 2010 Win64"

   On OS X, to use the Xcode IDE:
shell> cmake . -G Xcode

   When you run cmake, you might want to add options to the
   command line. Here are some examples:

     * -DBUILD_CONFIG=mysql_release: Configure the source with
       the same build options used by Oracle to produce binary
       distributions for official MySQL releases.

     * -DCMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX=dir_name: Configure the
       distribution for installation under a particular
       location.

     * -DCPACK_MONOLITHIC_INSTALL=1: Cause make package to
       generate a single installation file rather than multiple
       files.

     * -DWITH_DEBUG=1: Build the distribution with debugging
       support.

   For a more extensive list of options, see Section 2.9.4,
   "MySQL Source-Configuration Options."

   To list the configuration options, use one of the following
   commands:
shell> cmake . -L   # overview
shell> cmake . -LH  # overview with help text
shell> cmake . -LAH # all params with help text
shell> ccmake .     # interactive display

   If CMake fails, you might need to reconfigure by running it
   again with different options. If you do reconfigure, take
   note of the following:

     * If CMake is run after it has previously been run, it may
       use information that was gathered during its previous
       invocation. This information is stored in CMakeCache.txt.
       When CMake starts up, it looks for that file and reads
       its contents if it exists, on the assumption that the
       information is still correct. That assumption is invalid
       when you reconfigure.

     * Each time you run CMake, you must run make again to
       recompile. However, you may want to remove old object
       files from previous builds first because they were
       compiled using different configuration options.

   To prevent old object files or configuration information from
   being used, run these commands on Unix before re-running
   CMake:
shell> make clean
shell> rm CMakeCache.txt

   Or, on Windows:
shell> devenv MySQL.sln /clean
shell> del CMakeCache.txt

   If you build out of the source tree (as described later), the
   CMakeCache.txt file and all built files are in the build
   directory, so you can remove that directory to object files
   and cached configuration information.

   If you are going to send mail to a MySQL mailing list to ask
   for configuration assistance, first check the files in the
   CMakeFiles directory for useful information about the
   failure. To file a bug report, please use the instructions in
   Section 1.7, "How to Report Bugs or Problems."

Build the Distribution

   On Unix:
shell> make
shell> make VERBOSE=1

   The second command sets VERBOSE to show the commands for each
   compiled source.

   Use gmake instead on systems where you are using GNU make and
   it has been installed as gmake.

   On Windows:
shell> devenv MySQL.sln /build RelWithDebInfo

   It is possible to build out of the source tree to keep the
   tree clean. If the top-level source directory is named
   mysql-src under your current working directory, you can build
   in a directory named bld at the same level like this:
shell> mkdir bld
shell> cd bld
shell> cmake ../mysql-src

   The build directory need not actually be outside the source
   tree. For example, to build in a directory, you can build in
   a directory named bld under the top-level source tree, do
   this, starting with mysql-src as your current working
   directory:
shell> mkdir bld
shell> cd bld
shell> cmake ..

   If you have multiple source trees at the same level (for
   example, to build multiple versions of MySQL), the second
   strategy can be advantageous. The first strategy places all
   build directories at the same level, which requires that you
   choose a unique name for each. With the second strategy, you
   can use the same name for the build directory within each
   source tree.

   If you have gotten to the compilation stage, but the
   distribution does not build, see Section 2.9.5, "Dealing with
   Problems Compiling MySQL," for help. If that does not solve
   the problem, please enter it into our bugs database using the
   instructions given in Section 1.7, "How to Report Bugs or
   Problems." If you have installed the latest versions of the
   required tools, and they crash trying to process our
   configuration files, please report that also. However, if you
   get a command not found error or a similar problem for
   required tools, do not report it. Instead, make sure that all
   the required tools are installed and that your PATH variable
   is set correctly so that your shell can find them.

Install the Distribution

   On Unix:
shell> make install

   This installs the files under the configured installation
   directory (by default, /usr/local/mysql). You might need to
   run the command as root.

   To install in a specific directory, add a DESTDIR parameter
   to the command line:
shell> make install DESTDIR="/opt/mysql"

   Alternatively, generate installation package files that you
   can install where you like:
shell> make package

   This operation produces one or more .tar.gz files that can be
   installed like generic binary distribution packages. See
   Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux Using Generic
   Binaries." If you run CMake with
   -DCPACK_MONOLITHIC_INSTALL=1, the operation produces a single
   file. Otherwise, it produces multiple files.

   On Windows, generate the data directory, then create a .zip
   archive installation package:
shell> devenv MySQL.sln /build RelWithDebInfo /project initial_databas
e
shell> devenv MySQL.sln /build RelWithDebInfo /project package

   You can install the resulting .zip archive where you like.
   See Section 2.3.5, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows
   Using a noinstall Zip Archive."

Perform Postinstallation Setup

   The remainder of the installation process involves setting up
   the configuration file, creating the core databases, and
   starting the MySQL server. For instructions, see Section
   2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and Testing."
   Note

   The accounts that are listed in the MySQL grant tables
   initially have no passwords. After starting the server, you
   should set up passwords for them using the instructions in
   Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and Testing."

2.9.3 Installing MySQL Using a Development Source Tree

   This section describes how to install MySQL from the latest
   development source code, which is currently hosted on both
   GitHub (https://github.com/) and Launchpad
   (http://launchpad.net/). To obtain the MySQL Server source
   code from one of these repository hosting services, you can
   set up a local MySQL Git repository or a local MySQL Bazaar
   branch.

     * On GitHub (https://github.com/), MySQL Server and other
       MySQL projects are found on the MySQL
       (https://github.com/mysql) page. The MySQL Server project
       is a single repository that contains branches for MySQL
       5.5, 5.6, and 5.7.
       MySQL officially joined GitHub in September, 2014. For
       more information about MySQL's move to GitHub, refer to
       the announcement on the MySQL Release Engineering blog:
       MySQL on GitHub
       (http://mysqlrelease.com/2014/09/mysql-on-github/)

     * On Launchpad (http://launchpad.net/), MySQL projects,
       including MySQL Server, MySQL Workbench, and others are
       found on the Oracle/MySQL Engineering
       (http://launchpad.net/~mysql) page. For the repositories
       related only to MySQL Server, see the MySQL Server
       (http://launchpad.net/mysql-server) page.
       Note
       The MySQL Server repositories on Launchpad are frozen as
       of MySQL 5.5.41, MySQL 5.6.22, and MySQL 5.7.5. Updates
       for later MySQL releases are published to GitHub
       (https://github.com/mysql).

Prerequisites for Installing from Development Source

   To install MySQL from a development source tree, your system
   must satisfy the tool requirements outlined in Section 2.9,
   "Installing MySQL from Source."

Setting Up a MySQL Git Repository

   To set up a MySQL Git repository on your machine, use this
   procedure:

    1. Clone the MySQL Git repository to your machine. The
       following command clones the MySQL Git repository to a
       directory named mysql-server. The download size is
       approximately 437 MB. The initial download will take some
       time to complete, depending on the speed of your
       connection.
~$ git clone https://github.com/mysql/mysql-server.git
Cloning into 'mysql-server'...
remote: Counting objects: 1035465, done.
remote: Total 1035465 (delta 0), reused 0 (delta 0)
Receiving objects: 100% (1035465/1035465), 437.48 MiB | 5.10 MiB/s, do
ne.
Resolving deltas: 100% (855607/855607), done.
Checking connectivity... done.
Checking out files: 100% (21902/21902), done.

    2. When the clone operation completes, the contents of your
       local MySQL Git repository appear similar to the
       following:
~$ cd mysql-server

~/mysql-server$ ls
BUILD            COPYING             libmysqld    regex          tests
BUILD-CMAKE      dbug                libservices  scripts        unitt
est
client           Docs                man          sql            VERSI
ON
cmake            extra               mysql-test   sql-bench      vio
CMakeLists.txt   include             mysys        sql-common     win
cmd-line-utils   INSTALL-SOURCE      packaging    storage        zlib
config.h.cmake   INSTALL-WIN-SOURCE  plugin       strings
configure.cmake  libmysql            README       support-files

    3. Use the git branch -r command to view the remote tracking
       branches for the MySQL repository.
~/mysql-server$ git branch -r
  origin/5.5
  origin/5.6
  origin/5.7
  origin/HEAD -> origin/5.7
  origin/cluster-7.2
  origin/cluster-7.3
  origin/cluster-7.4

    4. To view the branches that are checked out in your local
       repository, issue the git branch command. When you cloned
       the MySQL Git repository, the MySQL 5.7 branch was
       checked out automatically. The asterisk identifies the
       5.7 branch as the active branch.
~/mysql-server$ git branch
* 5.7

    5. To check out a different MySQL branch, run the git
       checkout command, specifying the branch name. For
       example, to checkout the MySQL 5.6 branch:
~/mysql-server$ git checkout 5.6
Branch 5.6 set up to track remote branch 5.6 from origin.
Switched to a new branch '5.6'

    6. Run git branch again to verify that the MySQL 5.6 branch
       is present. MySQL 5.6, which is the last branch you
       checked out, is marked by an asterisk indicating that it
       is the active branch.
~/mysql-server$ git branch
* 5.6
  5.7
       The git checkout command is also used to switch branches.
       For example, to make MySQL 5.7 the active branch again,
       you would run git checkout 5.7.

    7. To obtain changes made after your initial setup of the
       MySQL Git repository, switch to the branch you want to
       update and issue the git pull command:
~/mysql-server$ git checkout 5.6
~/mysql-server$ git pull

       To examine the commit history, use the git log option:
~/mysql-server$ git log

       You can also browse commit history and source code on the
       GitHub MySQL (https://github.com/mysql) site.
       If you see changes or code that you have a question
       about, send an email to the MySQL internals mailing list.
       See Section 1.6.1, "MySQL Mailing Lists." For information
       about contributing a patch, see Contributing to MySQL
       Server
       (http://mysqlserverteam.com/contributing-to-mysql-server/
       ).

    8. After you have cloned the MySQL Git repository and have
       checked out the branch you want to build, you can build
       MySQL Server from the source code. Instructions are
       provided in Section 2.9.2, "Installing MySQL Using a
       Standard Source Distribution," except that you skip the
       part about obtaining and unpacking the distribution.
       Be careful about installing a build from a distribution
       source tree on a production machine. The installation
       command may overwrite your live release installation. If
       you already have MySQL installed and do not want to
       overwrite it, run CMake with values for the
       CMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX, MYSQL_TCP_PORT, and MYSQL_UNIX_ADDR
       options different from those used by your production
       server. For additional information about preventing
       multiple servers from interfering with each other, see
       Section 5.3, "Running Multiple MySQL Instances on One
       Machine."
       Play hard with your new installation. For example, try to
       make new features crash. Start by running make test. See
       Section 24.1.2, "The MySQL Test Suite."

Setting Up a MySQL Bazaar Branch

   Note

   The MySQL Server repositories on Launchpad are frozen as of
   MySQL 5.5.41, MySQL 5.6.22, and MySQL 5.7.5. Updates for
   later MySQL releases are published to GitHub
   (https://github.com/mysql).

   To setup a MySQL Bazaar branch on your machine, use this
   procedure:

    1. To obtain a copy of the MySQL development source code
       hosted on Launchpad (http://launchpad.net/), create a new
       Bazaar branch. If you do not already have a Bazaar
       repository directory set up, you must initialize a new
       directory:
shell> mkdir mysql-server
shell> bzr init-repo --trees mysql-server

       This is a one-time operation.

    2. Assuming that you have an initialized repository
       directory, you can branch from the public MySQL server
       repositories to create a local source tree. To create a
       branch of a specific version:
shell> cd mysql-server
shell> bzr branch lp:mysql-server/5.6 mysql-5.6

       This is a one-time operation per source tree. You can
       branch the source trees for several versions of MySQL
       under the mysql-server directory.
       The initial download will take some time to complete,
       depending on the speed of your connection. Once you have
       downloaded the first tree, additional trees should take
       significantly less time to download.

    3. When building from the Bazaar branch, you may want to
       create a copy of your active branch so that you can make
       configuration and other changes without affecting the
       original branch contents. You can achieve this by
       branching from the original branch:
shell> bzr branch mysql-5.6 mysql-5.6-build


    4. To obtain changes made after you have set up the branch
       initially, update it using the pull option periodically.
       Use this command in the top-level directory of the local
       copy:
shell> bzr pull

       To examine the changeset comments for the tree, use the
       log option to bzr:
shell> bzr log

       You can also browse changesets, comments, and source code
       online at the Launchpad MySQL Server
       (http://launchpad.net/mysql-server) page.
       If you see diffs (changes) or code that you have a
       question about, do not hesitate to send email to the
       MySQL internals mailing list. See Section 1.6.1, "MySQL
       Mailing Lists." For information about contributing at
       patch, see Contributing to MySQL Server
       (http://mysqlserverteam.com/contributing-to-mysql-server/
       ).

    5. After you have the local branch, you can build MySQL
       server from the source code. Instructions are provided in
       Section 2.9.2, "Installing MySQL Using a Standard Source
       Distribution," except that you skip the part about
       obtaining and unpacking the distribution.
       Be careful about installing a build from a distribution
       source tree on a production machine. The installation
       command may overwrite your live release installation. If
       you already have MySQL installed and do not want to
       overwrite it, run CMake with values for the
       CMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX, MYSQL_TCP_PORT, and MYSQL_UNIX_ADDR
       options different from those used by your production
       server. For additional information about preventing
       multiple servers from interfering with each other, see
       Section 5.3, "Running Multiple MySQL Instances on One
       Machine."
       Play hard with your new installation. For example, try to
       make new features crash. Start by running make test. See
       Section 24.1.2, "The MySQL Test Suite."

2.9.4 MySQL Source-Configuration Options

   The CMake program provides a great deal of control over how
   you configure a MySQL source distribution. Typically, you do
   this using options on the CMake command line. For information
   about options supported by CMake, run either of these
   commands in the top-level source directory:
shell> cmake . -LH
shell> ccmake .

   You can also affect CMake using certain environment
   variables. See Section 2.12, "Environment Variables."

   The following table shows the available CMake options. In the
   Default column, PREFIX stands for the value of the
   CMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX option, which specifies the installation
   base directory. This value is used as the parent location for
   several of the installation subdirectories.

   Table 2.11 MySQL Source-Configuration Option Reference
   (CMake)
   Formats Description Default Introduced Removed
   BUILD_CONFIG Use same build options as official releases
   CMAKE_BUILD_TYPE Type of build to produce RelWithDebInfo
   CMAKE_C_FLAGS Flags for C Compiler
   CMAKE_CXX_FLAGS Flags for C++ Compiler
   CMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX Installation base directory
   /usr/local/mysql
   COMPILATION_COMMENT Comment about compilation environment
   CPACK_MONOLITHIC_INSTALL Whether package build produces
   single file OFF
   DEFAULT_CHARSET The default server character set latin1
   DEFAULT_COLLATION The default server collation
   latin1_swedish_ci
   ENABLE_DEBUG_SYNC Whether to enable Debug Sync support ON
   ENABLE_DOWNLOADS Whether to download optional files OFF
   ENABLE_DTRACE Whether to include DTrace support
   ENABLE_GCOV Whether to include gcov support 5.6.3
   ENABLE_GPROF Enable gprof (optimized Linux builds only) OFF
   5.6.6
   ENABLED_LOCAL_INFILE Whether to enable LOCAL for LOAD DATA
   INFILE OFF
   ENABLED_PROFILING Whether to enable query profiling code ON

   IGNORE_AIO_CHECK With -DBUILD_CONFIG=mysql_release, ignore
   libaio check OFF 5.6.1
   INNODB_PAGE_ATOMIC_REF_COUNT Enable or disable atomic page
   reference counting ON 5.6.16
   INSTALL_BINDIR User executables directory PREFIX/bin
   INSTALL_DOCDIR Documentation directory PREFIX/docs
   INSTALL_DOCREADMEDIR README file directory PREFIX
   INSTALL_INCLUDEDIR Header file directory PREFIX/include
   INSTALL_INFODIR Info file directory PREFIX/docs
   INSTALL_LAYOUT Select predefined installation layout
   STANDALONE
   INSTALL_LIBDIR Library file directory PREFIX/lib
   INSTALL_MANDIR Manual page directory PREFIX/man
   INSTALL_MYSQLSHAREDIR Shared data directory PREFIX/share
   INSTALL_MYSQLTESTDIR mysql-test directory PREFIX/mysql-test

   INSTALL_PLUGINDIR Plugin directory PREFIX/lib/plugin
   INSTALL_SBINDIR Server executable directory PREFIX/bin
   INSTALL_SCRIPTDIR Scripts directory PREFIX/scripts
   INSTALL_SHAREDIR aclocal/mysql.m4 installation directory
   PREFIX/share
   INSTALL_SQLBENCHDIR sql-bench directory PREFIX
   INSTALL_SUPPORTFILESDIR Extra support files directory
   PREFIX/support-files
   MEMCACHED_HOME Path to memcached [none]
   MYSQL_DATADIR Data directory
   MYSQL_MAINTAINER_MODE Whether to enable MySQL
   maintainer-specific development environment OFF
   MYSQL_PROJECT_NAME Windows/OS X project name 3306 5.6.5
   MYSQL_TCP_PORT TCP/IP port number 3306
   MYSQL_UNIX_ADDR Unix socket file /tmp/mysql.sock
   ODBC_INCLUDES ODBC includes directory
   ODBC_LIB_DIR ODBC library directory
   OPTIMIZER_TRACE Whether to support optimizer tracing 5.6.3
   SUNPRO_CXX_LIBRARY Client link library on Solaris 10+ 5.6.20

   SYSCONFDIR Option file directory
   TMPDIR tmpdir default value 5.6.16
   WITH_ASAN Enable AddressSanitizer OFF 5.6.15
   WITH_BUNDLED_LIBEVENT Use bundled libevent when building
   ndbmemcache ON
   WITH_BUNDLED_MEMCACHED Use bundled memcached when building
   ndbmemcache ON
   WITH_CLASSPATH Classpath to use when building MySQL Cluster
   Connector for Java. Default is an empty string.
   WITH_DEBUG Whether to include debugging support OFF
   WITH_DEFAULT_COMPILER_OPTIONS Whether to use default compiler
   options ON 5.6.6
   WITH_DEFAULT_FEATURE_SET Whether to use default feature set
   ON 5.6.6
   WITH_EDITLINE Which libedit/editline library to use bundled
   5.6.12
   WITH_EMBEDDED_SERVER Whether to build embedded server OFF
   WITH_EMBEDDED_SHARED_LIBRARY Whether to build a shared
   embedded server library OFF 5.6.17
   WITH_xxx_STORAGE_ENGINE Compile storage engine xxx statically
   into server
   WITH_ERROR_INSERT Enable error injection in the NDB storage
   engine. Should not be used for building binaries intended for
   production. OFF
   WITH_EXTRA_CHARSETS Which extra character sets to include all

   WITH_INNODB_MEMCACHED Whether to generate memcached shared
   libraries. OFF
   WITH_LIBEDIT Use bundled libedit library ON   5.6.12
   WITH_LIBEVENT Which libevent library to use bundled 5.6.6
   WITH_LIBWRAP Whether to include libwrap (TCP wrappers)
   support OFF
   WITH_NDB_BINLOG Enable binary logging by default by mysqld.
   ON
   WITH_NDB_DEBUG Produce a debug build for testing or
   troubleshooting. OFF
   WITH_NDB_JAVA Enable building of Java and ClusterJ support.
   Enabled by default. Supported in MySQL Cluster only. ON
   WITH_NDB_PORT Default port used by a management server built
   with this option. If this option was not used to build it,
   the management server's default port is 1186. [none]
   WITH_NDB_TEST Include NDB API test programs. OFF
   WITH_NDBCLUSTER_STORAGE_ENGINE Build the NDB storage engine
   ON
   WITH_NDBMTD Build multi-threaded data node. ON
   WITH_READLINE Use bundled readline library OFF   5.6.5
   WITH_SSL Type of SSL support no
   WITH_UNIXODBC Enable unixODBC support OFF
   WITH_VALGRIND Whether to compile in Valgrind header files OFF

   WITH_ZLIB Type of zlib support system
   WITHOUT_xxx_STORAGE_ENGINE Exclude storage engine xxx from
   build
   WITHOUT_SERVER Do not build the server OFF

   The following sections provide more information about CMake
   options.

     * Section 2.9.4, ""

     * Section 2.9.4, ""

     * Section 2.9.4, ""

     * Section 2.9.4, ""

     * Section 2.9.4, ""

   For boolean options, the value may be specified as 1 or ON to
   enable the option, or as 0 or OFF to disable the option.

   Many options configure compile-time defaults that can be
   overridden at server startup. For example, the
   CMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX, MYSQL_TCP_PORT, and MYSQL_UNIX_ADDR
   options that configure the default installation base
   directory location, TCP/IP port number, and Unix socket file
   can be changed at server startup with the --basedir, --port,
   and --socket options for mysqld. Where applicable,
   configuration option descriptions indicate the corresponding
   mysqld startup option.

General Options


     * -DBUILD_CONFIG=mysql_release
       This option configures a source distribution with the
       same build options used by Oracle to produce binary
       distributions for official MySQL releases.

     * -DCMAKE_BUILD_TYPE=type
       The type of build to produce:

          + RelWithDebInfo: Enable optimizations and generate
            debugging information. This is the default MySQL
            build type.

          + Debug: Disable optimizations and generate debugging
            information. This build type is also used if the
            WITH_DEBUG option is enabled. That is,
            -DWITH_DEBUG=1 has the same effect as
            -DCMAKE_BUILD_TYPE=Debug.

     * -DCPACK_MONOLITHIC_INSTALL=bool
       This option affects whether the make package operation
       produces multiple installation package files or a single
       file. If disabled, the operation produces multiple
       installation package files, which may be useful if you
       want to install only a subset of a full MySQL
       installation. If enabled, it produces a single file for
       installing everything.

Installation Layout Options

   The CMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX option indicates the base
   installation directory. Other options with names of the form
   INSTALL_xxx that indicate component locations are interpreted
   relative to the prefix and their values are relative
   pathnames. Their values should not include the prefix.

     * -DCMAKE_INSTALL_PREFIX=dir_name
       The installation base directory.
       This value can be set at server startup with the
       --basedir option.

     * -DINSTALL_BINDIR=dir_name
       Where to install user programs.

     * -DINSTALL_DOCDIR=dir_name
       Where to install documentation.

     * -DINSTALL_DOCREADMEDIR=dir_name
       Where to install README files.

     * -DINSTALL_INCLUDEDIR=dir_name
       Where to install header files.

     * -DINSTALL_INFODIR=dir_name
       Where to install Info files.

     * -DINSTALL_LAYOUT=name
       Select a predefined installation layout:

          + STANDALONE: Same layout as used for .tar.gz and .zip
            packages. This is the default.

          + RPM: Layout similar to RPM packages.

          + SVR4: Solaris package layout.

          + DEB: DEB package layout (experimental).
       You can select a predefined layout but modify individual
       component installation locations by specifying other
       options. For example:
shell> cmake . -DINSTALL_LAYOUT=SVR4 -DMYSQL_DATADIR=/var/mysql/data


     * -DINSTALL_LIBDIR=dir_name
       Where to install library files.

     * -DINSTALL_MANDIR=dir_name
       Where to install manual pages.

     * -DINSTALL_MYSQLSHAREDIR=dir_name
       Where to install shared data files.

     * -DINSTALL_MYSQLTESTDIR=dir_name
       Where to install the mysql-test directory. As of MySQL
       5.6.12, to suppress installation of this directory,
       explicitly set the option to the empty value
       (-DINSTALL_MYSQLTESTDIR=).

     * -DINSTALL_PLUGINDIR=dir_name
       The location of the plugin directory.
       This value can be set at server startup with the
       --plugin_dir option.

     * -DINSTALL_SBINDIR=dir_name
       Where to install the mysqld server.

     * -DINSTALL_SCRIPTDIR=dir_name
       Where to install mysql_install_db.

     * -DINSTALL_SHAREDIR=dir_name
       Where to install aclocal/mysql.m4.

     * -DINSTALL_SQLBENCHDIR=dir_name
       Where to install the sql-bench directory. To suppress
       installation of this directory, explicitly set the option
       to the empty value (-DINSTALL_SQLBENCHDIR=).

     * -DINSTALL_SUPPORTFILESDIR=dir_name
       Where to install extra support files.

     * -DMYSQL_DATADIR=dir_name
       The location of the MySQL data directory.
       This value can be set at server startup with the
       --datadir option.

     * -DODBC_INCLUDES=dir_name
       The location of the ODBC includes directory, and may be
       used while configuring Connector/ODBC.

     * -DODBC_LIB_DIR=dir_name
       The location of the ODBC library directory, and may be
       used while configuring Connector/ODBC.

     * -DSYSCONFDIR=dir_name
       The default my.cnf option file directory.
       This location cannot be set at server startup, but you
       can start the server with a given option file using the
       --defaults-file=file_name option, where file_name is the
       full path name to the file.

     * -DTMPDIR=dir_name
       The default location to use for the tmpdir system
       variable. If unspecified, the value defaults to P_tmpdir
       in <stdio.h>. This option was added in MySQL 5.6.16.

Storage Engine Options

   Storage engines are built as plugins. You can build a plugin
   as a static module (compiled into the server) or a dynamic
   module (built as a dynamic library that must be installed
   into the server using the INSTALL PLUGIN statement or the
   --plugin-load option before it can be used). Some plugins
   might not support static or dynamic building.

   The MyISAM, MERGE, MEMORY, and CSV engines are mandatory
   (always compiled into the server) and need not be installed
   explicitly.

   To compile a storage engine statically into the server, use
   -DWITH_engine_STORAGE_ENGINE=1. Some permissible engine
   values are ARCHIVE, BLACKHOLE, EXAMPLE, FEDERATED, INNOBASE
   (InnoDB), NDB or NDBCLUSTER (NDB), PARTITION (partitioning
   support), and PERFSCHEMA (Performance Schema). Examples:
-DWITH_INNOBASE_STORAGE_ENGINE=1
-DWITH_ARCHIVE_STORAGE_ENGINE=1
-DWITH_BLACKHOLE_STORAGE_ENGINE=1
-DWITH_PERFSCHEMA_STORAGE_ENGINE=1

   Note

   WITH_NDBCLUSTER_STORAGE_ENGINE is supported only when
   building MySQL Cluster using the MySQL Cluster sources. It
   cannot be used to enable clustering support in other MySQL
   source trees or distributions. In MySQL Cluster source
   distributions, it is enabled by default. See Section
   18.2.2.3, "Building MySQL Cluster from Source on Linux," and
   Section 18.2.3.2, "Compiling and Installing MySQL Cluster
   from Source on Windows," for more information.

   To exclude a storage engine from the build, use
   -DWITHOUT_engine_STORAGE_ENGINE=1. Examples:
-DWITHOUT_EXAMPLE_STORAGE_ENGINE=1
-DWITHOUT_FEDERATED_STORAGE_ENGINE=1
-DWITHOUT_PARTITION_STORAGE_ENGINE=1

   If neither -DWITH_engine_STORAGE_ENGINE nor
   -DWITHOUT_engine_STORAGE_ENGINE are specified for a given
   storage engine, the engine is built as a shared module, or
   excluded if it cannot be built as a shared module.

Feature Options


     * -DCOMPILATION_COMMENT=string
       A descriptive comment about the compilation environment.

     * -DDEFAULT_CHARSET=charset_name
       The server character set. By default, MySQL uses the
       latin1 (cp1252 West European) character set.
       charset_name may be one of binary, armscii8, ascii, big5,
       cp1250, cp1251, cp1256, cp1257, cp850, cp852, cp866,
       cp932, dec8, eucjpms, euckr, gb2312, gbk, geostd8, greek,
       hebrew, hp8, keybcs2, koi8r, koi8u, latin1, latin2,
       latin5, latin7, macce, macroman, sjis, swe7, tis620,
       ucs2, ujis, utf8, utf8mb4, utf16, utf16le, utf32. The
       permissible character sets are listed in the
       cmake/character_sets.cmake file as the value of
       CHARSETS_AVAILABLE.
       This value can be set at server startup with the
       --character_set_server option.

     * -DDEFAULT_COLLATION=collation_name
       The server collation. By default, MySQL uses
       latin1_swedish_ci. Use the SHOW COLLATION statement to
       determine which collations are available for each
       character set.
       This value can be set at server startup with the
       --collation_server option.

     * -DENABLE_DEBUG_SYNC=bool
       Whether to compile the Debug Sync facility into the
       server. This facility is used for testing and debugging.
       This option is enabled by default, but has no effect
       unless MySQL is configured with debugging enabled. If
       debugging is enabled and you want to disable Debug Sync,
       use -DENABLE_DEBUG_SYNC=0.
       When compiled in, Debug Sync is disabled by default at
       runtime. To enable it, start mysqld with the
       --debug-sync-timeout=N option, where N is a timeout value
       greater than 0. (The default value is 0, which disables
       Debug Sync.) N becomes the default timeout for individual
       synchronization points.
       For a description of the Debug Sync facility and how to
       use synchronization points, see MySQL Internals: Test
       Synchronization
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/internals/en/test-synchronizati
       on.html).

     * -DENABLE_DOWNLOADS=bool
       Whether to download optional files. For example, with
       this option enabled, CMake downloads the Google Test
       distribution that is used by the test suite to run unit
       tests.

     * -DENABLE_DTRACE=bool
       Whether to include support for DTrace probes. For
       information about DTrace, wee Section 5.4, "Tracing
       mysqld Using DTrace"

     * -DENABLE_GCOV=bool
       Whether to include gcov support (Linux only).

     * -DENABLE_GPROF=bool
       Whether to enable gprof (optimized Linux builds only).
       This option was added in MySQL 5.6.6.

     * -DENABLED_LOCAL_INFILE=bool
       Whether to enable LOCAL capability in the client library
       for LOAD DATA INFILE.
       This option controls client-side LOCAL capability, but
       the capability can be set on the server side at server
       startup with the --local-infile option. See Section
       6.1.6, "Security Issues with LOAD DATA LOCAL."

     * -DENABLED_PROFILING=bool
       Whether to enable query profiling code (for the SHOW
       PROFILE and SHOW PROFILES statements).

     * -DIGNORE_AIO_CHECK=bool
       If the -DBUILD_CONFIG=mysql_release option is given on
       Linux, the libaio library must be linked in by default.
       If you do not have libaio or do not want to install it,
       you can suppress the check for it by specifying
       -DIGNORE_AIO_CHECK=1. This option was added in MySQL
       5.6.1.

     * -DINNODB_PAGE_ATOMIC_REF_COUNT=bool
       Whether to enable or disable atomic page reference
       counting. Fetching and releasing pages from the buffer
       pool and tracking the page state are expensive and
       complex operations. Using a page mutex to track these
       operations does not scale well. With
       INNODB_PAGE_ATOMIC_REF_COUNT=ON (default), fetch and
       release is tracked using atomics where available. For
       platforms that do not support atomics, set
       INNODB_PAGE_ATOMIC_REF_COUNT=OFF to disable atomic page
       reference counting.
       When atomic page reference counting is enabled (default),
       "[Note] InnoDB: Using atomics to ref count buffer pool
       pages" is printed to the error log at server startup. If
       atomic page reference counting is disabled, "[Note]
       InnoDB: Using mutexes to ref count buffer pool pages" is
       printed instead.
       INNODB_PAGE_ATOMIC_REF_COUNT was introduced with the fix
       for MySQL Bug #68079. The option is removed in MySQL
       5.7.5. Support for atomics is required to build MySQL as
       of MySQL 5.7.5, which makes the option obsolete.

     * -DMYSQL_MAINTAINER_MODE=bool
       Whether to enable a MySQL maintainer-specific development
       environment. If enabled, this option causes compiler
       warnings to become errors.

     * -DMYSQL_PROJECT_NAME=name
       For Windows or OS X, the project name to incorporate into
       the project file name. This option was added in MySQL
       5.6.5.

     * -DMYSQL_TCP_PORT=port_num
       The port number on which the server listens for TCP/IP
       connections. The default is 3306.
       This value can be set at server startup with the --port
       option.

     * -DMYSQL_UNIX_ADDR=file_name
       The Unix socket file path on which the server listens for
       socket connections. This must be an absolute path name.
       The default is /tmp/mysql.sock.
       This value can be set at server startup with the --socket
       option.

     * -DOPTIMIZER_TRACE=bool
       Whether to support optimizer tracing. See MySQL
       Internals: Tracing the Optimizer
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/internals/en/optimizer-tracing.
       html). This option was added in MySQL 5.6.3.

     * -DWITH_ASAN=bool
       Whether to enable AddressSanitizer, for compilers that
       support it. The default is off. This option was added in
       MySQL 5.6.15.

     * -DWITH_DEBUG=bool
       Whether to include debugging support.
       Configuring MySQL with debugging support enables you to
       use the --debug="d,parser_debug" option when you start
       the server. This causes the Bison parser that is used to
       process SQL statements to dump a parser trace to the
       server's standard error output. Typically, this output is
       written to the error log.

     * -DWITH_DEFAULT_FEATURE_SET=bool
       Whether to use the flags from
       cmake/build_configurations/feature_set.cmake. This option
       was added in MySQL 5.6.6.

     * -DWITH_EDITLINE=value
       Which libedit/editline library to use. The permitted
       values are bundled (the default) and system.
       WITH_EDITLINE was added in MySQL 5.6.12. It replaces
       WITH_LIBEDIT, which has been removed.

     * -DWITH_EMBEDDED_SERVER=bool
       Whether to build the libmysqld embedded server library.

     * -DWITH_EMBEDDED_SHARED_LIBRARY=bool
       Whether to build a shared libmysqld embedded server
       library. This option was added in MySQL 5.6.17.

     * -DWITH_EXTRA_CHARSETS=name
       Which extra character sets to include:

          + all: All character sets. This is the default.

          + complex: Complex character sets.

          + none: No extra character sets.

     * -DWITH_INNODB_MEMCACHED=bool
       Whether to generate memcached shared libraries
       (libmemcached.so and innodb_engine.so).

     * -DWITH_LIBEVENT=string
       Which libevent library to use. Permitted values are
       bundled (default), system, and yes. If you specify system
       or yes, the system libevent library is used if present.
       If the system library is not found, the bundled libevent
       library is used. The libevent library is required by
       InnoDB memcached.

     * -DWITH_LIBEDIT=bool
       Whether to use the libedit library bundled with the
       distribution.
       WITH_LIBEDIT was removed in MySQL 5.6.12. Use
       WITH_EDITLINE instead.

     * -DWITH_LIBWRAP=bool
       Whether to include libwrap (TCP wrappers) support.

     * -DWITH_READLINE=bool
       Whether to use the readline library bundled with the
       distribution. This option was removed in MySQL 5.6.5
       because readline is no longer bundled.

     * -DWITH_SSL={ssl_type|path_name}

     * The type of SSL support to include (if any) or the path
       name to the OpenSSL installation to use.

          + ssl_type can be one of the following values:
               o no: No SSL support. This is the default before
                 MySQL 5.6.6. As of 5.6.6, this is no longer a
                 permitted value and the default is bundled.
               o yes: Use the system SSL library if present,
                 else the library bundled with the distribution.
               o bundled: Use the SSL library bundled with the
                 distribution. This is the default as of MySQL
                 5.6.6.
               o system: Use the system SSL library.

          + path_name, permitted for MySQL 5.6.7 and after, is
            the path name to the OpenSSL installation to use.
            Using this can be preferable to using the ssl_type
            value of system, for it can prevent CMake from
            detecting and using an older or incorrect OpenSSL
            version installed on the system. (Another permitted
            way to do the same thing is to set the
            CMAKE_PREFIX_PATH option to path_name.)
       For information about using SSL support, see Section
       6.3.10, "Using SSL for Secure Connections."

     * -DWITH_UNIXODBC=1
       Enables unixODBC support, for Connector/ODBC.

     * -DWITH_VALGRIND=bool
       Whether to compile in the Valgrind header files, which
       exposes the Valgrind API to MySQL code. The default is
       OFF.
       To generate a Valgrind-aware debug build,
       -DWITH_VALGRIND=1 normally is combined with
       -DWITH_DEBUG=1. See Building Debug Configurations
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/internals/en/debug-configuratio
       ns.html).

     * -DWITH_ZLIB=zlib_type
       Some features require that the server be built with
       compression library support, such as the COMPRESS() and
       UNCOMPRESS() functions, and compression of the
       client/server protocol. The WITH_ZLIB indicates the
       source of zlib support:

          + bundled: Use the zlib library bundled with the
            distribution.

          + system: Use the system zlib library. This is the
            default.

     * -DWITHOUT_SERVER=bool
       Whether to build without the MySQL server. The default is
       OFF, which does build the server.

Compiler Flags


     * -DCMAKE_C_FLAGS="flags"
       Flags for the C Compiler.

     * -DCMAKE_CXX_FLAGS="flags"
       Flags for the C++ Compiler.

     * -DWITH_DEFAULT_COMPILER_OPTIONS=bool
       Whether to use the flags from
       cmake/build_configurations/compiler_options.cmake. This
       option was added in MySQL 5.6.6.
       Note
       All optimization flags were carefully chosen and tested
       by the MySQL build team. Overriding them can lead to
       unexpected results and is done at your own risk.

     * -DSUNPRO_CXX_LIBRARY="lib_name"
       Enable linking against libCstd instead of stlport4 on
       Solaris 10 or later. This works only for client code
       because the server depends on C++98. Example usage:
cmake -DWITHOUT_SERVER=1 -DSUNPRO_CXX_LIBRARY=Cstd

       This option was added in MySQL 5.6.20.

   To specify your own C and C++ compiler flags, for flags that
   do not affect optimization, use the CMAKE_C_FLAGS and
   CMAKE_CXX_FLAGS CMake options.

   When providing your own compiler flags, you might want to
   specify CMAKE_BUILD_TYPE as well.

   For example, to create a 32-bit release build on a 64-bit
   Linux machine, do this:
shell> mkdir bld
shell> cd bld
shell> cmake .. -DCMAKE_C_FLAGS=-m32 \
         -DCMAKE_CXX_FLAGS=-m32 \
         -DCMAKE_BUILD_TYPE=RelWithDebInfo

   If you set flags that affect optimization (-Onumber), you
   must set the CMAKE_C_FLAGS_build_type and/or
   CMAKE_CXX_FLAGS_build_type options, where build_type
   corresponds to the CMAKE_BUILD_TYPE value. To specify a
   different optimization for the default build type
   (RelWithDebInfo) set the CMAKE_C_FLAGS_RELWITHDEBINFO and
   CMAKE_CXX_FLAGS_RELWITHDEBINFO options. For example, to
   compile on Linux with -O3 and with debug symbols, do this:
shell> cmake .. -DCMAKE_C_FLAGS_RELWITHDEBINFO="-O3 -g" \
         -DCMAKE_CXX_FLAGS_RELWITHDEBINFO="-O3 -g"

CMake Options for Compiling MySQL Cluster

   The following options are for use when building MySQL Cluster
   with the MySQL Cluster sources; they are not currently
   supported when using sources from the MySQL 5.6 Server tree.

     * -DMEMCACHED_HOME=path
       Perform the build using the memcached (version 1.6 or
       later) installed in the system directory indicated by
       path. Files from this installation that are used in the
       build include the memcached binary, header files, and
       libraries, as well as the memcached_utilities library and
       the header file engine_testapp.h.
       You must leave this option unset when building
       ndbmemcache using the bundled memcached sources
       (WITH_BUNDLED_MEMCACHED option); in other words, the
       bundled sources are used by default).
       This option was added in MySQL Cluster NDB 7.2.2.
       While additional CMake options---such as for SASL
       authorization and for providing dtrace support---are
       available for use when compiling memcached from external
       sources, these options are currently not enabled for the
       memcached sources bundled with MySQL Cluster.

     * -DWITH_BUNDLED_LIBEVENT={ON|OFF}
       Use the libevent included in the MySQL Cluster sources
       when building MySQL Cluster with ndbmemcached support
       (MySQL Cluster NDB 7.2.2 and later). Enabled by default.
       OFF causes the system's libevent to be used instead.

     * -DWITH_BUNDLED_MEMCACHED={ON|OFF}
       Build the memcached sources included in the MySQL Cluster
       source tree (MySQL Cluster NDB 7.2.3 and later), then use
       the resulting memcached server when building the
       ndbmemcache engine. In this case, make install places the
       memcached binary in the installation bin directory, and
       the ndbmemcache engine shared object file ndb_engine.so
       in the installation lib directory.
       This option is ON by default.

     * -DWITH_CLASSPATH=path
       Sets the classpath for building MySQL Cluster Connector
       for Java. The default is empty. In MySQL Cluster NDB
       7.2.9 and later, this option is ignored if
       -DWITH_NDB_JAVA=OFF is used.

     * -DWITH_ERROR_INSERT={ON|OFF}
       Enables error injection in the NDB kernel. For testing
       only; not intended for use in building production
       binaries. The default is OFF.

     * -DWITH_NDBCLUSTER_STORAGE_ENGINE={ON|OFF}
       Build and link in support for the NDB (NDBCLUSTER)
       storage engine in mysqld. The default is ON.

     * -DWITH_NDBCLUSTER={ON|OFF}
       This is an alias for WITH_NDBCLUSTER_STORAGE_ENGINE.

     * -DWITH_NDBMTD={ON|OFF}
       Build the multi-threaded data node executable ndbmtd. The
       default is ON.

     * -DWITH_NDB_BINLOG={ON|OFF}
       Enable binary logging by default in the mysqld built
       using this option. ON by default.

     * -DWITH_NDB_DEBUG={ON|OFF}
       Enable building the debug versions of the MySQL Cluster
       binaries. OFF by default.

     * -DWITH_NDB_JAVA={ON|OFF}
       Enable building MySQL Cluster with Java support,
       including ClusterJ.
       This option was added in MySQL Cluster NDB 7.2.9, and is
       ON by default. If you do not wish to compile MySQL
       Cluster with Java support, you must disable it explicitly
       by specifying -DWITH_NDB_JAVA=OFF when running CMake.
       Otherwise, if Java cannot be found, configuration of the
       build fails.

     * -DWITH_NDB_PORT=port
       Causes the MySQL Cluster management server (ndb_mgmd)
       that is built to use this port by default. If this option
       is unset, the resulting management server tries to use
       port 1186 by default.

     * -DWITH_NDB_TEST={ON|OFF}
       If enabled, include a set of NDB API test programs. The
       default is OFF.

2.9.5 Dealing with Problems Compiling MySQL

   The solution to many problems involves reconfiguring. If you
   do reconfigure, take note of the following:

     * If CMake is run after it has previously been run, it may
       use information that was gathered during its previous
       invocation. This information is stored in CMakeCache.txt.
       When CMake starts up, it looks for that file and reads
       its contents if it exists, on the assumption that the
       information is still correct. That assumption is invalid
       when you reconfigure.

     * Each time you run CMake, you must run make again to
       recompile. However, you may want to remove old object
       files from previous builds first because they were
       compiled using different configuration options.

   To prevent old object files or configuration information from
   being used, run the following commands before re-running
   CMake:

   On Unix:
shell> make clean
shell> rm CMakeCache.txt

   On Windows:
shell> devenv MySQL.sln /clean
shell> del CMakeCache.txt

   If you build outside of the source tree, remove and recreate
   your build directory before re-running CMake. For
   instructions on building outside of the source tree, see How
   to Build MySQL Server with CMake
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/internals/en/cmake.html).

   On some systems, warnings may occur due to differences in
   system include files. The following list describes other
   problems that have been found to occur most often when
   compiling MySQL:

     * To define which C and C++ compilers to use, you can
       define the CC and CXX environment variables. For example:
shell> CC=gcc
shell> CXX=g++
shell> export CC CXX

       To specify your own C and C++ compiler flags, use the
       CMAKE_C_FLAGS and CMAKE_CXX_FLAGS CMake options. See
       Section 2.9.4, "."
       To see what flags you might need to specify, invoke
       mysql_config with the --cflags and --cxxflags options.

     * To see what commands are executed during the compile
       stage, after using CMake to configure MySQL, run make
       VERBOSE=1 rather than just make.

     * If compilation fails, check whether the
       MYSQL_MAINTAINER_MODE option is enabled. This mode causes
       compiler warnings to become errors, so disabling it may
       enable compilation to proceed.

     * If your compile fails with errors such as any of the
       following, you must upgrade your version of make to GNU
       make:
make: Fatal error in reader: Makefile, line 18:
Badly formed macro assignment

       Or:
make: file `Makefile' line 18: Must be a separator (:

       Or:
pthread.h: No such file or directory

       Solaris and FreeBSD are known to have troublesome make
       programs.
       GNU make 3.75 is known to work.

     * The sql_yacc.cc file is generated from sql_yacc.yy.
       Normally, the build process does not need to create
       sql_yacc.cc because MySQL comes with a pregenerated copy.
       However, if you do need to re-create it, you might
       encounter this error:
"sql_yacc.yy", line xxx fatal: default action causes potential...

       This is a sign that your version of yacc is deficient.
       You probably need to install a recent version of bison
       (the GNU version of yacc) and use that instead.
       Versions of bison older than 1.75 may report this error:
sql_yacc.yy:#####: fatal error: maximum table size (32767) exceeded

       The maximum table size is not actually exceeded; the
       error is caused by bugs in older versions of bison.

   For information about acquiring or updating tools, see the
   system requirements in Section 2.9, "Installing MySQL from
   Source."

2.9.6 MySQL Configuration and Third-Party Tools

   Third-party tools that need to determine the MySQL version
   from the MySQL source can read the VERSION file in the
   top-level source directory. The file lists the pieces of the
   version separately. For example, if the version is MySQL
   5.7.4-m14, the file looks like this:
MYSQL_VERSION_MAJOR=5
MYSQL_VERSION_MINOR=7
MYSQL_VERSION_PATCH=4
MYSQL_VERSION_EXTRA=-m14

   If the source is not for a General Availablility (GA)
   release, the MYSQL_VERSION_EXTRA value will be nonempty. For
   the example, the value corresponds to Milestone 14.

   To construct a five-digit number from the version components,
   use this formula:
MYSQL_VERSION_MAJOR*10000 + MYSQL_VERSION_MINOR*100 + MYSQL_VERSION_PA
TCH

2.10 Postinstallation Setup and Testing

   This section discusses tasks that you should perform after
   installing MySQL:

     * If necessary, initialize the data directory and create
       the MySQL grant tables. For some MySQL installation
       methods, data directory initialization may be done for
       you automatically:

          + Installation on Windows

          + Installation on Linux using a server RPM
            distribution.

          + Installation using the native packaging system on
            many platforms, including Debian Linux, Ubuntu
            Linux, Gentoo Linux, and others.

          + Installation on OS X using a DMG distribution.
       For other platforms and installation types, including
       installation from generic binary and source
       distributions, you must initialize the data directory
       yourself. For instructions, see Section 2.10.1,
       "Initializing the Data Directory."

     * For instructions, see Section 2.10.2, "Starting the
       Server," and Section 2.10.3, "Testing the Server."

     * Assign passwords to any initial accounts in the grant
       tables, if that was not already done during data
       directory initialization. Passwords prevent unauthorized
       access to the MySQL server. You may also wish to restrict
       access to test databases. For instructions, see Section
       2.10.4, "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."

     * Optionally, arrange for the server to start and stop
       automatically when your system starts and stops. For
       instructions, see Section 2.10.5, "Starting and Stopping
       MySQL Automatically."

     * Optionally, populate time zone tables to enable
       recognition of named time zones. For instructions, see
       Section 10.6, "MySQL Server Time Zone Support."

   When you are ready to create additional user accounts, you
   can find information on the MySQL access control system and
   account management in Section 6.2, "The MySQL Access
   Privilege System," and Section 6.3, "MySQL User Account
   Management."

2.10.1 Initializing the Data Directory

   After installing MySQL, you must initialize the data
   directory, including the tables in the mysql system database.
   For some MySQL installation methods, data directory
   initialization may be done automatically, as described in
   Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and Testing." For other
   installation methods, including installation from generic
   binary and source distributions, you must initialize the data
   directory yourself.

   This section describes how to initialize the data directory
   on Unix and Unix-like systems. (For Windows, see Section
   2.3.7, "Windows Postinstallation Procedures.") For some
   suggested commands that you can use to test whether the
   server is accessible and working properly, see Section
   2.10.3, "Testing the Server."

   In the examples shown here, the server runs under the user ID
   of the mysql login account. This assumes that such an account
   exists. Either create the account if it does not exist, or
   substitute the name of a different existing login account
   that you plan to use for running the server. For information
   about creating the account, see Creating a mysql System User
   and Group, in Section 2.2, "Installing MySQL on Unix/Linux
   Using Generic Binaries."

    1. Change location into the top-level directory of your
       MySQL installation, represented here by BASEDIR:
shell> cd BASEDIR

       BASEDIR is likely to be something like /usr/local/mysql,
       /usr/local, or /usr/bin (for installation wtih MySQL Yum
       repository, or other means). The following steps assume
       that you have changed location to this directory.
       You will find several files and subdirectories in the
       BASEDIR directory. The most important for installation
       purposes are the bin and scripts subdirectories, which
       contain the server as well as client and utility
       programs.

    2. If necessary, ensure that the distribution contents are
       accessible to mysql. If you installed the distribution as
       mysql, no further action is required. If you installed
       the distribution as root, its contents will be owned by
       root. Change its ownership to mysql by executing the
       following commands as root in the installation directory.
       The first command changes the owner attribute of the
       files to the mysql user. The second changes the group
       attribute to the mysql group.
shell> chown -R mysql .
shell> chgrp -R mysql .


    3. If necessary, initialize the data directory, including
       the mysql database containing the initial MySQL grant
       tables that determine how users are permitted to connect
       to the server.
       Typically, data directory initialization need be done
       only the first time you install MySQL. If you are
       upgrading an existing installation, you should run
       mysql_upgrade instead (see Section 4.4.7, "mysql_upgrade
       --- Check and Upgrade MySQL Tables"). However, the
       command that initializes the data directory does not
       overwrite any existing privilege tables, so it should be
       safe to run in any circumstances.
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql

       It is important to make sure that the database
       directories and files are owned by the mysql login
       account so that the server has read and write access to
       them when you run it later. To ensure this if you run
       mysql_install_db as root, include the --user option as
       shown. Otherwise, you should execute the program while
       logged in as mysql, in which case you can omit the --user
       option from the command.
       The mysql_install_db command creates the server's data
       directory. Under the data directory, it creates
       directories for the mysql database that holds the grant
       tables and the test database that you can use to test
       MySQL. The program also creates privilege table entries
       for the initial account or accounts. test_. For a
       complete listing and description of the grant tables, see
       Section 6.2, "The MySQL Access Privilege System."
       It might be necessary to specify other options such as
       --basedir or --datadir if mysql_install_db does not
       identify the correct locations for the installation
       directory or data directory. For example:
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql \
         --basedir=/opt/mysql/mysql \
         --datadir=/opt/mysql/mysql/data

       For a more secure installation, invoke mysql_install_db
       with the --random-passwords option. This causes it to
       assign a random password to the MySQL root accounts, set
       the "password expired" flag for those accounts, and
       remove the anonymous-user MySQL accounts. For additional
       details, see Section 4.4.3, "mysql_install_db ---
       Initialize MySQL Data Directory." (Install operations
       using RPMs for Unbreakable Linux Network are unaffected
       because they do not use mysql_install_db.)
       If you do not want to have the test database, you can
       remove it after starting the server, using the
       instructions in Section 2.10.4, "Securing the Initial
       MySQL Accounts."
       If you have trouble with mysql_install_db at this point,
       see Section 2.10.1.1, "Problems Running
       mysql_install_db."

    4. After initializing the data directory, you can establish
       the final installation ownership settings. To leave the
       installation owned by mysql, no action is required here.
       Otherwise, most of the MySQL installation can be owned by
       root if you like. The exception is that the data
       directory must be owned by mysql. To accomplish this, run
       the following commands as root in the installation
       directory. For some distribution types, the data
       directory might be named var rather than data; adjust the
       second command accordingly.
shell> chown -R root .
shell> chown -R mysql data

       If the plugin directory (the directory named by the
       plugin_dir system variable) is writable by the server, it
       may be possible for a user to write executable code to a
       file in the directory using SELECT ... INTO DUMPFILE.
       This can be prevented by making the plugin directory read
       only to the server or by setting the secure_file_priv
       system variable at server startup to a directory where
       SELECT writes can be performed safely.

    5. To specify options that the MySQL server should use at
       startup, put them in a /etc/my.cnf or /etc/mysql/my.cnf
       file. See Section 5.1.2, "Server Configuration Defaults."
       If you do not do this, the server starts with its default
       settings.

    6. If you want MySQL to start automatically when you boot
       your machine, see Section 2.10.5, "Starting and Stopping
       MySQL Automatically."

   Data directory initialization creates time zone tables in the
   mysql database but does not populate them. To do so, use the
   instructions in Section 10.6, "MySQL Server Time Zone
   Support."

2.10.1.1 Problems Running mysql_install_db

   The purpose of the mysql_install_db program is to initialize
   the data directory, including the tables in the mysql system
   database. It does not overwrite existing MySQL privilege
   tables, and it does not affect any other data.

   To re-create your privilege tables, first stop the mysqld
   server if it is running. Then rename the mysql directory
   under the data directory to save it, and run
   mysql_install_db. Suppose that your current directory is the
   MySQL installation directory and that mysql_install_db is
   located in the bin directory and the data directory is named
   data. To rename the mysql database and re-run
   mysql_install_db, use these commands.
shell> mv data/mysql data/mysql.old
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql

   When you run mysql_install_db, you might encounter the
   following problems:

     * mysql_install_db fails to install the grant tables
       You may find that mysql_install_db fails to install the
       grant tables and terminates after displaying the
       following messages:
Starting mysqld daemon with databases from XXXXXX
mysqld ended

       In this case, you should examine the error log file very
       carefully. The log should be located in the directory
       XXXXXX named by the error message and should indicate why
       mysqld did not start. If you do not understand what
       happened, include the log when you post a bug report. See
       Section 1.7, "How to Report Bugs or Problems."

     * There is a mysqld process running
       This indicates that the server is running, in which case
       the grant tables have probably been created already. If
       so, there is no need to run mysql_install_db at all
       because it needs to be run only once, when you first
       install MySQL.

     * Installing a second mysqld server does not work when one
       server is running
       This can happen when you have an existing MySQL
       installation, but want to put a new installation in a
       different location. For example, you might have a
       production installation, but you want to create a second
       installation for testing purposes. Generally the problem
       that occurs when you try to run a second server is that
       it tries to use a network interface that is in use by the
       first server. In this case, you should see one of the
       following error messages:
Can't start server: Bind on TCP/IP port:
Address already in use
Can't start server: Bind on unix socket...

       For instructions on setting up multiple servers, see
       Section 5.3, "Running Multiple MySQL Instances on One
       Machine."

     * You do not have write access to the /tmp directory
       If you do not have write access to create temporary files
       or a Unix socket file in the default location (the /tmp
       directory) or the TMPDIR environment variable, if it has
       been set, an error occurs when you run mysql_install_db
       or the mysqld server.
       You can specify different locations for the temporary
       directory and Unix socket file by executing these
       commands prior to starting mysql_install_db or mysqld,
       where some_tmp_dir is the full path name to some
       directory for which you have write permission:
shell> TMPDIR=/some_tmp_dir/
shell> MYSQL_UNIX_PORT=/some_tmp_dir/mysql.sock
shell> export TMPDIR MYSQL_UNIX_PORT

       Then you should be able to run mysql_install_db and start
       the server with these commands:
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

       If mysql_install_db is located in the scripts directory,
       modify the first command to scripts/mysql_install_db.
       See Section B.5.4.5, "How to Protect or Change the MySQL
       Unix Socket File," and Section 2.12, "Environment
       Variables."

   There are some alternatives to running the mysql_install_db
   program provided in the MySQL distribution:

     * If you want the initial privileges to be different from
       the standard defaults, use account-management statements
       such as CREATE USER, GRANT, and REVOKE to change the
       privileges after the grant tables have been set up. In
       other words, run mysql_install_db, and then use mysql -u
       root mysql to connect to the server as the MySQL root
       user so that you can issue the necessary statements. (See
       Section 13.7.1, "Account Management Statements.")
       To install MySQL on several machines with the same
       privileges, put the GRANT and REVOKE statements in a file
       and execute the file as a script using mysql after
       running mysql_install_db. For example:
shell> scripts/mysql_install_db --user=mysql
shell> bin/mysql -u root < your_script_file

       This enables you to avoid issuing the statements manually
       on each machine.

     * It is possible to re-create the grant tables completely
       after they have previously been created. You might want
       to do this if you are just learning how to use GRANT and
       REVOKE and have made so many modifications after running
       mysql_install_db that you want to wipe out the tables and
       start over.
       To re-create the grant tables, stop the server if it is
       running and remove the mysql database directory. Then run
       mysql_install_db again.

2.10.2 Starting the Server

   This section describes how start the server on Unix and
   Unix-like systems. (For Windows, see Section 2.3.5.4,
   "Starting the Server for the First Time.") For some suggested
   commands that you can use to test whether the server is
   accessible and working properly, see Section 2.10.3, "Testing
   the Server."

   Start the MySQL server like this:
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

   It is important that the MySQL server be run using an
   unprivileged (non-root) login account. To ensure this if you
   run mysqld_safe as root, include the --user option as shown.
   Otherwise, execute the program while logged in as mysql, in
   which case you can omit the --user option from the command.

   For further instructions for running MySQL as an unprivileged
   user, see Section 6.1.5, "How to Run MySQL as a Normal User."

   If the command fails immediately and prints mysqld ended,
   look for information in the error log (which by default is
   the host_name.err file in the data directory).

   If the server is unable to access the data directory it
   starts or read the grant tables in the mysql database, it
   writes a message to its error log. Such problems can occur if
   you neglected to create the grant tables by initializing the
   data directory before proceeding to this step, or if you ran
   the command that initializes the data directory without the
   --user option. Remove the data directory and run the command
   with the --user option.

   If you have other problems starting the server, see Section
   2.10.2.1, "Troubleshooting Problems Starting the MySQL
   Server." For more information about mysqld_safe, see Section
   4.3.2, "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

2.10.2.1 Troubleshooting Problems Starting the MySQL Server

   This section provides troubleshooting suggestions for
   problems starting the server. For additional suggestions for
   Windows systems, see Section 2.3.6, "Troubleshooting a
   Microsoft Windows MySQL Server Installation."

   If you have problems starting the server, here are some
   things to try:

     * Check the error log to see why the server does not start.
       Log files are located in the data directory (typically
       C:\Program Files\MySQL\MySQL Server 5.6\data on Windows,
       /usr/local/mysql/data for a Unix/Linux binary
       distribution, and /usr/local/var for a Unix/Linux source
       distribution). Look in the data directory for files with
       names of the form host_name.err and host_name.log, where
       host_name is the name of your server host. Then examine
       the last few lines of these files. Use tail to display
       them:
shell> tail host_name.err
shell> tail host_name.log


     * Specify any special options needed by the storage engines
       you are using. You can create a my.cnf file and specify
       startup options for the engines that you plan to use. If
       you are going to use storage engines that support
       transactional tables (InnoDB, NDB), be sure that you have
       them configured the way you want before starting the
       server. If you are using InnoDB tables, see Section 14.3,
       "InnoDB Configuration" for guidelines and Section 14.12,
       "InnoDB Startup Options and System Variables" for option
       syntax.
       Although storage engines use default values for options
       that you omit, Oracle recommends that you review the
       available options and specify explicit values for any
       options whose defaults are not appropriate for your
       installation.

     * Make sure that the server knows where to find the data
       directory. The mysqld server uses this directory as its
       current directory. This is where it expects to find
       databases and where it expects to write log files. The
       server also writes the pid (process ID) file in the data
       directory.
       The default data directory location is hardcoded when the
       server is compiled. To determine what the default path
       settings are, invoke mysqld with the --verbose and --help
       options. If the data directory is located somewhere else
       on your system, specify that location with the --datadir
       option to mysqld or mysqld_safe, on the command line or
       in an option file. Otherwise, the server will not work
       properly. As an alternative to the --datadir option, you
       can specify mysqld the location of the base directory
       under which MySQL is installed with the --basedir, and
       mysqld looks for the data directory there.
       To check the effect of specifying path options, invoke
       mysqld with those options followed by the --verbose and
       --help options. For example, if you change location into
       the directory where mysqld is installed and then run the
       following command, it shows the effect of starting the
       server with a base directory of /usr/local:
shell> ./mysqld --basedir=/usr/local --verbose --help

       You can specify other options such as --datadir as well,
       but --verbose and --help must be the last options.
       Once you determine the path settings you want, start the
       server without --verbose and --help.
       If mysqld is currently running, you can find out what
       path settings it is using by executing this command:
shell> mysqladmin variables

       Or:
shell> mysqladmin -h host_name variables

       host_name is the name of the MySQL server host.

     * Make sure that the server can access the data directory.
       The ownership and permissions of the data directory and
       its contents must allow the server to read and modify
       them.
       If you get Errcode 13 (which means Permission denied)
       when starting mysqld, this means that the privileges of
       the data directory or its contents do not permit server
       access. In this case, you change the permissions for the
       involved files and directories so that the server has the
       right to use them. You can also start the server as root,
       but this raises security issues and should be avoided.
       Change location into the data directory and check the
       ownership of the data directory and its contents to make
       sure the server has access. For example, if the data
       directory is /usr/local/mysql/var, use this command:
shell> ls -la /usr/local/mysql/var

       If the data directory or its files or subdirectories are
       not owned by the login account that you use for running
       the server, change their ownership to that account. If
       the account is named mysql, use these commands:
shell> chown -R mysql /usr/local/mysql/var
shell> chgrp -R mysql /usr/local/mysql/var

       Even with correct ownership, MySQL might fail to start up
       if there is other security software running on your
       system that manages application access to various parts
       of the file system. In this case, reconfigure that
       software to enable mysqld to access the directories it
       uses during normal operation.

     * Verify that the network interfaces the server wants to
       use are available.
       If either of the following errors occur, it means that
       some other program (perhaps another mysqld server) is
       using the TCP/IP port or Unix socket file that mysqld is
       trying to use:
Can't start server: Bind on TCP/IP port: Address already in use
Can't start server: Bind on unix socket...

       Use ps to determine whether you have another mysqld
       server running. If so, shut down the server before
       starting mysqld again. (If another server is running, and
       you really want to run multiple servers, you can find
       information about how to do so in Section 5.3, "Running
       Multiple MySQL Instances on One Machine.")
       If no other server is running, execute the command telnet
       your_host_name tcp_ip_port_number. (The default MySQL
       port number is 3306.) Then press Enter a couple of times.
       If you do not get an error message like telnet: Unable to
       connect to remote host: Connection refused, some other
       program is using the TCP/IP port that mysqld is trying to
       use. Track down what program this is and disable it, or
       tell mysqld to listen to a different port with the --port
       option. In this case, specify the same non-default port
       number for client programs when connecting to the server
       using TCP/IP.
       Another reason the port might be inaccessible is that you
       have a firewall running that blocks connections to it. If
       so, modify the firewall settings to permit access to the
       port.
       If the server starts but you cannot connect to it, make
       sure that you have an entry in /etc/hosts that looks like
       this:
127.0.0.1       localhost


     * If you cannot get mysqld to start, try to make a trace
       file to find the problem by using the --debug option. See
       Section 24.4.3, "The DBUG Package."

2.10.3 Testing the Server

   After the data directory is initialized and you have started
   the server, perform some simple tests to make sure that it
   works satisfactorily. This section assumes that your current
   location is the MySQL installation directory and that it has
   a bin subdirectory containing the MySQL programs used here.
   If that is not true, adjust the command path names
   accordingly.

   Alternatively, add the bin directory to your PATH environment
   variable setting. That enables your shell (command
   interpreter) to find MySQL programs properly, so that you can
   run a program by typing only its name, not its path name. See
   Section 4.2.10, "Setting Environment Variables."

   Use mysqladmin to verify that the server is running. The
   following commands provide simple tests to check whether the
   server is up and responding to connections:
shell> bin/mysqladmin version
shell> bin/mysqladmin variables

   If you cannot connect to the server, specify a -u root option
   to connect as root. If you have assigned a password for the
   root account already, you'll also need to specify -p on the
   command line and enter the password when prompted. For
   example:
shell> bin/mysqladmin -u root -p version
Enter password: (enter root password here)

   The output from mysqladmin version varies slightly depending
   on your platform and version of MySQL, but should be similar
   to that shown here:
shell> bin/mysqladmin version
mysqladmin  Ver 14.12 Distrib 5.6.25, for pc-linux-gnu on i686
...

Server version          5.6.25
Protocol version        10
Connection              Localhost via UNIX socket
UNIX socket             /var/lib/mysql/mysql.sock
Uptime:                 14 days 5 hours 5 min 21 sec

Threads: 1  Questions: 366  Slow queries: 0
Opens: 0  Flush tables: 1  Open tables: 19
Queries per second avg: 0.000

   To see what else you can do with mysqladmin, invoke it with
   the --help option.

   Verify that you can shut down the server (include a -p option
   if the root account has a password already):
shell> bin/mysqladmin -u root shutdown

   Verify that you can start the server again. Do this by using
   mysqld_safe or by invoking mysqld directly. For example:
shell> bin/mysqld_safe --user=mysql &

   If mysqld_safe fails, see Section 2.10.2.1, "Troubleshooting
   Problems Starting the MySQL Server."

   Run some simple tests to verify that you can retrieve
   information from the server. The output should be similar to
   that shown here.

   Use mysqlshow to see what databases exist:
shell> bin/mysqlshow
+--------------------+
|     Databases      |
+--------------------+
| information_schema |
| mysql              |
| test               |
+--------------------+

   The list of installed databases may vary, but will always
   include the minimum of mysql and information_schema.

   If you specify a database name, mysqlshow displays a list of
   the tables within the database:
shell> bin/mysqlshow mysql
Database: mysql
+---------------------------+
|          Tables           |
+---------------------------+
| columns_priv              |
| db                        |
| event                     |
| func                      |
| help_category             |
| help_keyword              |
| help_relation             |
| help_topic                |
| plugin                    |
| proc                      |
| procs_priv                |
| proxies_priv              |
| servers                   |
| tables_priv               |
| time_zone                 |
| time_zone_leap_second     |
| time_zone_name            |
| time_zone_transition      |
| time_zone_transition_type |
| user                      |
+---------------------------+

   Use the mysql program to select information from a table in
   the mysql database:
shell> bin/mysql -e "SELECT User, Host FROM mysql.user" mysql
+------+-----------+
| User | Host      |
+------+-----------+
| root | localhost |
+------+-----------+

   At this point, your server is running and you can access it.
   To tighten security if you have not yet assigned passwords to
   the initial account or accounts, follow the instructions in
   Section 2.10.4, "Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts."

2.10.4 Securing the Initial MySQL Accounts

   Part of the MySQL installation process involves initializing
   the data directory, including the mysql database containing
   the grant tables that define the initial MySQL accounts. For
   details, see Section 2.10, "Postinstallation Setup and
   Testing."

   The mysql.user grant table defines the initial MySQL user
   accounts and their access privileges:

     * Some accounts have the user name root. These are
       superuser accounts that have all privileges and can do
       anything. If these root accounts have empty passwords,
       anyone can connect to the MySQL server as root without a
       password and be granted all privileges.

          + On Windows, root accounts are created that permit
            connections from the local host only. Connections
            can be made by specifying the host name localhost,
            the IP address 127.0.0.1, or the IPv6 address ::1.
            If the user selects the Enable root access from
            remote machines option during installation, the
            Windows installer creates another root account that
            permits connections from any host.

          + On Unix, each root account permits connections from
            the local host. Connections can be made by
            specifying the host name localhost, the IP address
            127.0.0.1, the IPv6 address ::1, or the actual host
            name or IP address.
       An attempt to connect to the host 127.0.0.1 normally
       resolves to the localhost account. However, this fails if
       the server is run with the --skip-name-resolve option, so
       the 127.0.0.1 account is useful in that case. The ::1
       account is used for IPv6 connections.

     * If accounts for anonymous users were created, these have
       an empty user name. The anonymous accounts have no
       password, so anyone can use them to connect to the MySQL
       server.

          + On Windows, there is one anonymous account that
            permits connections from the local host. Connections
            can be made by specifying a host name of localhost.

          + On Unix, each anonymous account permits connections
            from the local host. Connections can be made by
            specifying a host name of localhost for one of the
            accounts, or the actual host name or IP address for
            the other.

   To display which accounts exist in the mysql.user table and
   check whether their passwords are empty, use the following
   statement:
mysql> SELECT User, Host, Password FROM mysql.user;
+------+--------------------+----------+
| User | Host               | Password |
+------+--------------------+----------+
| root | localhost          |          |
| root | myhost.example.com |          |
| root | 127.0.0.1          |          |
| root | ::1                |          |
|      | localhost          |          |
|      | myhost.example.com |          |
+------+--------------------+----------+

   This output indicates that there are several root and
   anonymous-user accounts, none of which have passwords. The
   output might differ on your system, but the presence of
   accounts with empty passwords means that your MySQL
   installation is unprotected until you do something about it:

     * Assign a password to each MySQL root account that does
       not have one.

     * To prevent clients from connecting as anonymous users
       without a password, either assign a password to each
       anonymous account or remove the accounts.

   In addition, the mysql.db table contains rows that permit all
   accounts to access the test database and other databases with
   names that start with test_. This is true even for accounts
   that otherwise have no special privileges such as the default
   anonymous accounts. This is convenient for testing but
   inadvisable on production servers. Administrators who want
   database access restricted only to accounts that have
   permissions granted explicitly for that purpose should remove
   these mysql.db table rows.

   The following instructions describe how to set up passwords
   for the initial MySQL accounts, first for the root accounts,
   then for the anonymous accounts. The instructions also cover
   how to remove anonymous accounts, should you prefer not to
   permit anonymous access at all, and describe how to remove
   permissive access to test databases. Replace newpwd in the
   examples with the password that you want to use. Replace
   host_name with the name of the server host. You can determine
   this name from the output of the preceding SELECT statement.
   For the output shown, host_name is myhost.example.com.
   Note

   For additional information about setting passwords, see
   Section 6.3.5, "Assigning Account Passwords." If you forget
   your root password after setting it, see Section B.5.4.1,
   "How to Reset the Root Password."

   You might want to defer setting the passwords until later, to
   avoid the need to specify them while you perform additional
   setup or testing. However, be sure to set them before using
   your installation for production purposes.

   To set up additional accounts, see Section 6.3.2, "Adding
   User Accounts."
   Note

   On Windows, you can also perform the process described in
   this section during installation with MySQL Installer (see
   Section 2.3.3, "Installing MySQL on Microsoft Windows Using
   MySQL Installer"). On all platforms, the MySQL distribution
   includes mysql_secure_installation, a command-line utility
   that automates much of the process of securing a MySQL
   installation. MySQL Workbench is available on all platforms,
   and also offers the ability to manage user accounts (see
   Chapter 26, "MySQL Workbench" ).

Assigning root Account Passwords

   A root account password can be set several ways. The
   following discussion demonstrates three methods:

     * Use the SET PASSWORD statement

     * Use the UPDATE statement

     * Use the mysqladmin command-line client program

   To assign passwords using SET PASSWORD, connect to the server
   as root and issue a SET PASSWORD statement for each root
   account listed in the mysql.user table.

   For Windows, do this:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'127.0.0.1' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'::1' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'%' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   The last statement is unnecessary if the mysql.user table has
   no root account with a host value of %.

   For Unix, do this:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'127.0.0.1' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'::1' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR 'root'@'host_name' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   You can also use a single statement that assigns a password
   to all root accounts by using UPDATE to modify the mysql.user
   table directly. This method works on any platform:
shell> mysql -u root
mysql> UPDATE mysql.user SET Password = PASSWORD('newpwd')
    ->     WHERE User = 'root';
mysql> FLUSH PRIVILEGES;

   The FLUSH statement causes the server to reread the grant
   tables. Without it, the password change remains unnoticed by
   the server until you restart it.

   To assign passwords to the root accounts using mysqladmin,
   execute the following commands:
shell> mysqladmin -u root password "newpwd"
shell> mysqladmin -u root -h host_name password "newpwd"

   Those commands apply both to Windows and to Unix. The double
   quotation marks around the password are not always necessary,
   but you should use them if the password contains spaces or
   other characters that are special to your command
   interpreter.

   The mysqladmin method of setting the root account passwords
   does not work for the 'root'@'127.0.0.1' or 'root'@'::1'
   account. Use the SET PASSWORD method shown earlier.

   After the root passwords have been set, you must supply the
   appropriate password whenever you connect as root to the
   server. For example, to shut down the server with mysqladmin,
   use this command:
shell> mysqladmin -u root -p shutdown
Enter password: (enter root password here)

   The mysql commands in the following instructions include a -p
   option based on the assumption that you have assigned the
   root account passwords using the preceding instructions and
   must specify that password when connecting to the server.

Assigning Anonymous Account Passwords

   To assign passwords to the anonymous accounts, connect to the
   server as root, then use either SET PASSWORD or UPDATE.

   To use SET PASSWORD on Windows, do this:
shell> mysql -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   To use SET PASSWORD on Unix, do this:
shell> mysql -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'localhost' = PASSWORD('newpwd');
mysql> SET PASSWORD FOR ''@'host_name' = PASSWORD('newpwd');

   To set the anonymous-user account passwords with a single
   UPDATE statement, do this (on any platform):
shell> mysql -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
mysql> UPDATE mysql.user SET Password = PASSWORD('newpwd')
    ->     WHERE User = '';
mysql> FLUSH PRIVILEGES;

   The FLUSH statement causes the server to reread the grant
   tables. Without it, the password change remains unnoticed by
   the server until you restart it.

Removing Anonymous Accounts

   If you prefer to remove any anonymous accounts rather than
   assigning them passwords, do so as follows on Windows:
shell> mysql -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
mysql> DROP USER ''@'localhost';

   On Unix, remove the anonymous accounts like this:
shell> mysql -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
mysql> DROP USER ''@'localhost';
mysql> DROP USER ''@'host_name';

Securing Test Databases

   By default, the mysql.db table contains rows that permit
   access by any user to the test database and other databases
   with names that start with test_. (These rows have an empty
   User column value, which for access-checking purposes matches
   any user name.) This means that such databases can be used
   even by accounts that otherwise possess no privileges. If you
   want to remove any-user access to test databases, do so as
   follows:
shell> mysql -u root -p
Enter password: (enter root password here)
mysql> DELETE FROM mysql.db WHERE Db LIKE 'test%';
mysql> FLUSH PRIVILEGES;

   The FLUSH statement causes the server to reread the grant
   tables. Without it, the privilege change remains unnoticed by
   the server until you restart it.

   With the preceding change, only users who have global
   database privileges or privileges granted explicitly for the
   test database can use it. However, if you prefer that the
   database not exist at all, drop it:
mysql> DROP DATABASE test;

2.10.5 Starting and Stopping MySQL Automatically

   This section discusses methods for starting and stopping the
   MySQL server.

   Generally, you start the mysqld server in one of these ways:

     * Invoke mysqld directly. This works on any platform.

     * On Windows, you can set up a MySQL service that runs
       automatically when Windows starts. See Section 2.3.5.7,
       "Starting MySQL as a Windows Service."

     * On Unix and Unix-like systems, you can invoke
       mysqld_safe, which tries to determine the proper options
       for mysqld and then runs it with those options. See
       Section 4.3.2, "mysqld_safe --- MySQL Server Startup
       Script."

     * On systems that use System V-style run directories (that
       is, /etc/init.d and run-level specific directories),
       invoke mysql.server. This script is used primarily at
       system startup and shutdown. It usually is installed
       under the name mysql. The mysql.server script starts the
       server by invoking mysqld_safe. See Section 4.3.3,
       "mysql.server --- MySQL Server Startup Script."

     * On OS X, install a launchd daemon to enable automatic
       MySQL startup at system startup. The daemon starts the
       server by invoking mysqld_safe. For details, see Section
       2.4.3, "Installing a MySQL Launch Daemon." A MySQL
       Preference Pane also provides control for starting and
       stopping MySQL through the System Preferences. See
       Section 2.4.5, "Installing and Using the MySQL Preference
       Pane."

     * On Solaris/OpenSolaris, use the service management
       framework (SMF) system to initiate and control MySQL
       startup. For more information, see Section 2.7.2,
       "Installing MySQL on OpenSolaris Using IPS."

   The mysqld_safe and mysql.server scripts, Solaris/OpenSolaris
   SMF, and the OS X Startup Item (or MySQL Preference Pane) can
   be used to start the server manually, or automatically at
   system startup time. mysql.server and the Startup Item also
   can be used to stop the server.

   The following table shows which option groups the server and
   startup scripts read from option files.

   Table 2.12 MySQL Startup Scripts and Supported Server Option
   Groups
      Script                  Option Groups
   mysqld       [mysqld], [server], [mysqld-major_version]
   mysqld_safe  [mysqld], [server], [mysqld_safe]
   mysql.server [mysqld], [mysql.server], [server]

   [mysqld-major_version] means that groups with names like
   [mysqld-5.5] and [mysqld-5.6] are read by servers having
   versions 5.5.x, 5.6.x, and so forth. This feature can be used
   to specify options that can be read only by servers within a
   given release series.

   For backward compatibility, mysql.server also reads the
   [mysql_server] group and mysqld_safe also reads the
   [safe_mysqld] group. However, you should update your option
   files to use the [mysql.server] and [mysqld_safe] groups
   instead.

   For more information on MySQL configuration files and their
   structure and contents, see Section 4.2.6, "Using Option
   Files."

2.11 Upgrading or Downgrading MySQL

   This section describes the steps to upgrade or downgrade a
   MySQL installation.

   Upgrading is a common procedure, as you pick up bug fixes
   within the same MySQL release series or significant features
   between major MySQL releases. You perform this procedure
   first on some test systems to make sure everything works
   smoothly, and then on the production systems.

   Downgrading is less common. Typically, you undo an upgrade
   because of some compatibility or performance issue that
   occurs on a production system, and was not uncovered during
   initial upgrade verification on the test systems. As with the
   upgrade procedure, perform and verify the downgrade procedure
   on some test systems first, before using it on a production
   system.

2.11.1 Upgrading MySQL

   As a general rule, to upgrade from one release series to
   another, go to the next series rather than skipping a series.
   To upgrade from a release series previous to MySQL 5.5,
   upgrade to each successive release series in turn until you
   have reached MySQL 5.5, and then proceed with the upgrade to
   MySQL 5.6. For example, if you currently are running MySQL
   5.1 and wish to upgrade to a newer series, upgrade to MySQL
   5.5 first before upgrading to 5.6, and so forth. For
   information on upgrading to MySQL 5.5, see the MySQL 5.5
   Reference Manual.

   To upgrade to MySQL 5.6, use the items in the following
   checklist as a guide:

     * Before any upgrade, back up your databases, including the
       mysql database that contains the grant tables. See
       Section 7.2, "Database Backup Methods."

     * Read all the notes in Section 2.11.1.3, "Upgrading from
       MySQL 5.5 to 5.6." These notes enable you to identify
       upgrade issues that apply to your current MySQL
       installation. Some incompatibilities discussed in that
       section require your attention before upgrading. Others
       require some action after upgrading.

     * Read the Release Notes
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/relnotes/mysql/5.6/en/) as
       well, which provide information about features that are
       new in MySQL 5.6 or differ from those found in earlier
       MySQL releases.

     * After upgrading to a new version of MySQL, run
       mysql_upgrade (see Section 4.4.7, "mysql_upgrade ---
       Check and Upgrade MySQL Tables"). This program checks
       your tables, and attempts to repair them if necessary. It
       also updates your grant tables to ensure that they have
       the current structure so that you can take advantage of
       any new capabilities. (Some releases of MySQL introduce
       changes to the structure of the grant tables to add new
       privileges or features.)
       mysql_upgrade does not upgrade the contents of the help
       tables. For upgrade instructions, see Section 5.1.10,
       "Server-Side Help."
       mysql_upgrade should not be used when the server is
       running with --gtid-mode=ON, since it may make changes in
       nontransactional system tables in the mysql database,
       many of which are MyISAM and cannot be changed to use a
       different storage engine. See Section 17.1.3.4, "GTID
       mode and mysql_upgrade."

     * If you run MySQL Server on Windows, see Section 2.3.8,
       "Upgrading MySQL on Windows."

     * If you use replication, see Section 17.4.3, "Upgrading a
       Replication Setup," for information on upgrading your
       replication setup.

     * If you use InnoDB, consider setting innodb_fast_shutdown
       to 0 before shutting down and upgrading your server. When
       you set innodb_fast_shutdown to 0, InnoDB does a slow
       shutdown, a full purge and an insert buffer merge before
       shutting down, which ensures that all data files are
       fully prepared in case the upgrade process modifies the
       file format.

     * If you upgrade an installation originally produced by
       installing multiple RPM packages, it is best to upgrade
       all the packages, not just some. For example, if you
       previously installed the server and client RPMs, do not
       upgrade just the server RPM.

     * If you have created a user-defined function (UDF) with a
       given name and upgrade MySQL to a version that implements
       a new built-in function with the same name, the UDF
       becomes inaccessible. To correct this, use DROP FUNCTION
       to drop the UDF, and then use CREATE FUNCTION to
       re-create the UDF with a different nonconflicting name.
       The same is true if the new version of MySQL implements a
       built-in function with the same name as an existing
       stored function. See Section 9.2.4, "Function Name
       Parsing and Resolution," for the rules describing how the
       server interprets references to different kinds of
       functions.

   For EL5, EL6, or EL7-based Linux platforms and Fedora 20 or
   21, you can perform an in-place upgrade of MySQL and its
   components with the MySQL Yum repository. See Section
   2.11.1.1, "Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL Yum Repository."

   On Debian 7, Ubuntu 12, and Ubuntu 14, you can perform an
   in-place upgrade of MySQL and its components with the MySQL
   APT repository. See Section 2.11.1.2, "Upgrading MySQL with
   the MySQL APT Repository."

   For upgrades between versions of a MySQL release series that
   has reached General Availability status, you can move the
   MySQL format files and data files between different versions
   on systems with the same architecture. For upgrades to a
   version of a MySQL release series that is in development
   status, that is not necessarily true. Use of development
   releases is at your own risk.

   If you are cautious about using new versions, you can always
   rename your old mysqld before installing a newer one. For
   example, if you are using a version of MySQL 5.5 and want to
   upgrade to 5.6, rename your current server from mysqld to
   mysqld-5.5. If your new mysqld then does something
   unexpected, you can simply shut it down and restart with your
   old mysqld.

   If problems occur, such as that the new mysqld server does
   not start or that you cannot connect without a password,
   verify that you do not have an old my.cnf file from your
   previous installation. You can check this with the
   --print-defaults option (for example, mysqld
   --print-defaults). If this command displays anything other
   than the program name, you have an active my.cnf file that
   affects server or client operation.

   If, after an upgrade, you experience problems with compiled
   client programs, such as Commands out of sync or unexpected
   core dumps, you probably have used old header or library
   files when compiling your programs. In this case, check the
   date for your mysql.h file and libmysqlclient.a library to
   verify that they are from the new MySQL distribution. If not,
   recompile your programs with the new headers and libraries.
   Recompilation might also be necessary for programs compiled
   against the shared client library if the library major
   version number has changed (for example from
   libmysqlclient.so.15 to libmysqlclient.so.16.

   If your MySQL installation contains a large amount of data
   that might take a long time to convert after an in-place
   upgrade, you might find it useful to create a "dummy"
   database instance for assessing what conversions might be
   needed and the work involved to perform them. Make a copy of
   your MySQL instance that contains a full copy of the mysql
   database, plus all other databases without data. Run your
   upgrade procedure on this dummy instance to see what actions
   might be needed so that you can better evaluate the work
   involved when performing actual data conversion on your
   original database instance.

   It is a good idea to rebuild and reinstall the Perl
   DBD::mysql module whenever you install a new release of
   MySQL. The same applies to other MySQL interfaces as well,
   such as PHP mysql extensions and the Python MySQLdb module.

2.11.1.1 Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL Yum Repository

   For supported Yum-based platforms (see Section 2.5.1,
   "Installing MySQL on Linux Using the MySQL Yum Repository,"
   for a list), you can perform an in-place upgrade for MySQL
   (that is, replacing the old version and then running the new
   version off the old data files) with the MySQL Yum
   repository.
   Notes

     * Before performing any update to MySQL, follow carefully
       the instructions in Section 2.11.1, "Upgrading MySQL."
       Among other instructions discussed there, it is
       especially important to back up your database before the
       update.

     * The following instructions assume you have installed
       MySQL with the MySQL Yum repository; if that is not the
       case, follow the instructions in Section 2.5.2,
       "Replacing a Third-Party Distribution of MySQL Using the
       MySQL Yum Repository."


    1. Selecting a Target Series
       By default, the MySQL Yum repository updates MySQL to the
       latest version in the release series you have chosen
       during installation (see Section 2.5.1, "" for details),
       which means, for example, a 5.6.x installation will NOT
       be updated to a 5.7.x release automatically. To update to
       another release series, you need to first disable the
       subrepository for the series that has been selected (by
       default, or by yourself) and enable the subrepository for
       your target series. To do that, follow the steps
       explained in Section 2.5.1, "" for editing the
       subrepository entries in
       the/etc/yum.repos.d/mysql-community.repo file.
       As a general rule, to upgrade from one release series to
       another, go to the next series rather than skipping a
       series. For example, if you are currently running MySQL
       5.5 and wish to upgrade to 5.7, upgrade to MySQL 5.6
       first before upgrading to 5.7.
       Important
       For important information about upgrading from MySQL 5.6
       to 5.7, see Upgrading from MySQL 5.6 to 5.7
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/refman/5.7/en/upgrading-from-pr
       evious-series.html).

    2. Upgrading MySQL
       Upgrade MySQL and its components by the following
       command:
shell> sudo yum update mysql-server
       Alternatively, you can update MySQL by telling Yum to
       update everything on your system (this might take
       considerably more time):
shell> sudo yum update

    3. Restarting MySQL
       The MySQL server always restarts after an update by Yum.
       Once the server restarts, run mysql_upgrade to check and
       possibly resolve any incompatibilities between the old
       data and the upgraded software. mysql_upgrade also
       performs other functions; see Section 4.4.7,
       "mysql_upgrade --- Check and Upgrade MySQL Tables" for
       details.

   You can also update only a specific component. Use the
   following command to list all the installed packages for the
   MySQL components:
shell> sudo yum list installed | grep "^mysql"

   After identifying the package name of the component of your
   choice, update the package with the following command,
   replacing package-name with the name of the package:
shell> sudo yum update package-name

Upgrading the Shared Client Libraries

   After updating MySQL using the Yum repository, applications
   compiled with older versions of the shared client libraries
   should continue to work.

   If you recompile applications and dynamically link them with
   the updated libraries: As typical with new versions of shared
   libraries where there are differences or additions in symbol
   versioning between the newer and older libraries (for
   example, between the newer, standard 5.6 shared client
   libraries and some older---prior or variant---versions of the
   shared libraries shipped natively by the Linux distributions'
   software repositories, or from some other sources), any
   applications compiled using the updated, newer shared
   libraries will require those updated libraries on systems
   where the applications are deployed. And, as expected, if
   those libraries are not in place, the applications requiring
   the shared libraries will fail. So, be sure to deploy the
   packages for the shared libraries from MySQL on those
   systems. You can do this by adding the MySQL Yum repository
   to the systems (see Section 2.5.1, "") and install the latest
   shared libraries using the instructions given in Section
   2.5.1, "."

2.11.1.2 Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL APT Repository

   On Debian 7, Ubuntu 12, and Ubuntu 14, you can perform an
   in-place upgrade of MySQL and its components with the MySQL
   APT repository. See Upgrading MySQL with the MySQL APT
   Repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-apt-repo-quick-guide/en/index
   .html#repo-qg-apt-upgrading) in A Quick Guide to Using the
   MySQL APT Repository
   (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/mysql-apt-repo-quick-guide/en/).

2.11.1.3 Upgrading from MySQL 5.5 to 5.6

   Note

   Beginning with MySQL 5.6.6, several MySQL Server parameters
   have defaults that differ from previous releases. See the
   notes regarding these changes later in this section,
   particularly regarding overriding them to preserve backward
   compatibility if that is a concern.
   Note

   It is good practice to back up your data before installing
   any new version of software. Although MySQL works very hard
   to ensure a high level of quality, protect your data by
   making a backup.

   To upgrade to 5.6 from any previous version, MySQL recommends
   that you dump your tables with mysqldump before upgrading and
   reload the dump file after upgrading. Use the --all-databases
   option to include all databases in the dump. If your
   databases include stored programs, use the --routines and
   --events options as well.

   In general, do the following when upgrading from MySQL 5.5 to
   5.6:

     * Read all the items in these sections to see whether any
       of them might affect your applications:

          + Section 2.11.1, "Upgrading MySQL," has general
            update information.

          + The items in the change lists provided later in this
            section enable you to identify upgrade issues that
            apply to your current MySQL installation. Some
            incompatibilities discussed there require your
            attention before upgrading. Others should be dealt
            with after upgrading.

          + The MySQL 5.6 Release Notes
            (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/relnotes/mysql/5.6/en/)
            describe significant new features you can use in 5.6
            or that differ from those found in earlier MySQL
            releases. Some of these changes may result in
            incompatibilities.
       Changes marked as either Known issue or Incompatible
       change are incompatibilities with earlier versions of
       MySQL, and may require your attention before you upgrade.
       Our aim is to avoid these changes, but occasionally they
       are necessary to correct problems that would be worse
       than an incompatibility between releases. If any upgrade
       issue applicable to your installation involves an
       incompatibility that requires special handling, follow
       the instructions given in the incompatibility
       description. Sometimes this involves dumping and
       reloading tables, or use of a statement such as CHECK
       TABLE or REPAIR TABLE.
       For dump and reload instructions, see Section 2.11.4,
       "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes." Any
       procedure that involves REPAIR TABLE with the USE_FRM
       option must be done before upgrading. Use of this
       statement with a version of MySQL different from the one
       used to create the table (that is, using it after
       upgrading) may damage the table. See Section 13.7.2.5,
       "REPAIR TABLE Syntax."

     * Before upgrading to a new version of MySQL, Section
       2.11.3, "Checking Whether Tables or Indexes Must Be
       Rebuilt," to see whether changes to table formats or to
       character sets or collations were made between your
       current version of MySQL and the version to which you are
       upgrading. If so and these changes result in an
       incompatibility between MySQL versions, you will need to
       upgrade the affected tables using the instructions in
       Section 2.11.4, "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or
       Indexes."

     * After upgrading to a new version of MySQL, run
       mysql_upgrade (see Section 4.4.7, "mysql_upgrade ---
       Check and Upgrade MySQL Tables"). This program checks
       your tables, and attempts to repair them if necessary. It
       also updates your grant tables to ensure that they have
       the current structure so that you can take advantage of
       any new capabilities. (Some releases of MySQL introduce
       changes to the structure of the grant tables to add new
       privileges or features.)
       mysql_upgrade does not upgrade the contents of the help
       tables. For upgrade instructions, see Section 5.1.10,
       "Server-Side Help."

     * If you run MySQL Server on Windows, see Section 2.3.8,
       "Upgrading MySQL on Windows."

     * If you use replication, see Section 17.4.3, "Upgrading a
       Replication Setup," for information on upgrading your
       replication setup.

   If your MySQL installation contains a large amount of data
   that might take a long time to convert after an in-place
   upgrade, you might find it useful to create a "dummy"
   database instance for assessing what conversions might be
   needed and the work involved to perform them. Make a copy of
   your MySQL instance that contains a full copy of the mysql
   database, plus all other databases without data. Run your
   upgrade procedure on this dummy instance to see what actions
   might be needed so that you can better evaluate the work
   involved when performing actual data conversion on your
   original database instance.

   Read all the items in the following sections to see whether
   any of them might affect your applications:

Configuration Changes


     * Beginning with MySQL 5.6.6, several MySQL Server
       parameters have defaults that differ from previous
       releases. The motivation for these changes is to provide
       better out-of-box performance and to reduce the need for
       the database administrator to change settings manually.
       These changes are subject to possible revision in future
       releases as we gain feedback.
       In some cases, a parameter has a different static default
       value. In other cases, the server autosizes a parameter
       at startup using a formula based on other related
       parameters or server host configuration, rather than
       using a static value. For example, the setting for
       back_log now is its previous default of 50, adjusted up
       by an amount proportional to the value of
       max_connections. The idea behind autosizing is that when
       the server has information available to make a decision
       about a parameter setting likely to be better than a
       fixed default, it will.
       The following table summarizes changes to defaults. Any
       of these can be overridden by specifying an explicit
       value at server startup.

   Parameter Old Default New Default
   back_log 50 Autosized using max_connections
   binlog_checksum NONE CRC32
   --binlog-row-event-max-size 1024 8192
   flush_time 1800 (on Windows) 0
   innodb_autoextend_increment 8 64
   innodb_buffer_pool_instances 1 8 (platform dependent)
   innodb_checksum_algorithm INNODB CRC32 (changed back to
   INNODB in MySQL 5.6.7)
   innodb_concurrency_tickets 500 5000
   innodb_file_per_table 0 1
   innodb_old_blocks_time 0 1000
   innodb_open_files 300 Autosized using innodb_file_per_table,
   table_open_cache
   innodb_stats_on_metadata ON OFF
   join_buffer_size 128KB 256KB
   max_allowed_packet 1MB 4MB
   max_connect_errors 10 100
   sync_master_info 0 10000
   sync_relay_log 0 10000
   sync_relay_log_info 0 10000
       With regard to compatibility with previous releases, the
       most important changes are:

          + innodb_file_per_table is enabled (previously
            disabled).

          + innodb_checksum_algorithm is CRC32 (previously
            INNODB and changed back to INNODB in MySQL 5.6.7).

          + binlog_checksum is CRC32 (previously NONE).
       Therefore, if you are upgrading an existing MySQL
       installation, have not already changed the values of
       these parameters from their previous defaults, and
       backward compatibility is a concern, you may want to
       explicitly set these parameters to their previous
       defaults. For example, put these lines in the server
       option file:
[mysqld]
innodb_file_per_table=0
innodb_checksum_algorithm=INNODB
binlog_checksum=NONE

       Those settings preserve compatibility as follows:

          + With the new default of innodb_file_per_table
            enabled, ALTER TABLE operations following an upgrade
            will move InnoDB tables that are in the system
            tablespace to individual .ibd files. Using
            innodb_file_per_table=0 will prevent this from
            happening.

          + Setting innodb_checksum_algorithm=INNODB permits
            binary downgrades after upgrading to this release.
            With a setting of CRC32, InnoDB would use
            checksumming that older MySQL versions cannot use.

          + With binlog_checksum=NONE, the server can be used as
            a replication master without causing failure of
            older slaves that do not understand binary log
            checksums.

     * As of MySQL 5.6.5, pre-4.1 passwords and the
       mysql_old_password authentication plugin are deprecated.
       Passwords stored in the older hash format used before
       MySQL 4.1 are less secure than passwords that use the
       native password hashing method and should be avoided. To
       prevent connections using accounts that have pre-4.1
       password hashes, the secure_auth system variable is now
       enabled by default. (To permit connections for accounts
       that have such password hashes, start the server with
       --secure_auth=0.)
       DBAs are advised to convert accounts that use the
       mysql_old_password authentication plugin to use
       mysql_native_password instead. For account upgrade
       instructions, see Section 6.3.8.3, "Migrating Away from
       Pre-4.1 Password Hashing and the mysql_old_password
       Plugin."
       Known issue: In some early development versions of MySQL
       5.6 (5.6.6 to 5.6.10), the server could create accounts
       with a mismatched password hash and authentication
       plugin. For example, if the default authentication plugin
       is mysql_native_password, this sequence of statements
       results in an account with a plugin of
       mysql_native_password but a pre-4.1 password hash (the
       format used by mysql_old_password):
SET old_passwords = 1;
CREATE USER 'jeffrey'@'localhost' IDENTIFIED BY 'mypass';

       The mismatch produces symptoms such as being unable to
       connect to the MySQL server and being unable to use SET
       PASSWORD with OLD_PASSWORD() or with old_passwords=1.
       As of MySQL 5.6.11, this mismatch no longer occurs.
       Instead, the server produces an error:
mysql> SET old_passwords = 1;
mysql> CREATE USER 'jeffrey'@'localhost' IDENTIFIED BY 'mypass';
ERROR 1827 (HY000): The password hash doesn't have the expected
format. Check if the correct password algorithm is being used with
the PASSWORD() function.

       To deal with an account affected by a mismatch, the DBA
       can modify either the plugin or Password column in the
       account's mysql.user table row to be consistent with the
       other column:

          + Set old_passwords to 0, then assign a new password
            to the account using SET PASSWORD and PASSWORD().
            This sets the Password column to have a 4.1 password
            hash, consistent with the mysql_native_password
            plugin. This is the preferred method of fixing the
            account.

          + Alternatively, the DBA can change the plugin to
            mysql_old_password to make the plugin match the
            password hash format, then flush the privileges.
            This is not recommended because the
            mysql_old_password plugin and pre-4.1 password
            hashing are deprecated and support for them will be
            removed in a future version of MySQL.

Server Changes


     * Incompatible change: It is possible for a column DEFAULT
       value to be valid for the sql_mode value at
       table-creation time but invalid for the sql_mode value
       when rows are inserted or updated. Example:
SET sql_mode = '';
CREATE TABLE t (d DATE DEFAULT 0);
SET sql_mode = 'NO_ZERO_DATE,STRICT_ALL_TABLES';
INSERT INTO t (d) VALUES(DEFAULT);

       In this case, 0 should be accepted for the CREATE TABLE
       but rejected for the INSERT. However, the server did not
       evaluate DEFAULT values used for inserts or updates
       against the current sql_mode. In the example, the INSERT
       succeeds and inserts '0000-00-00' into the DATE column.
       As of MySQL 5.6.13, the server applies the proper
       sql_mode checks to generate a warning or error at insert
       or update time.
       A resulting incompatibility for replication if you use
       statement-based logging (binlog_format=STATEMENT) is that
       if a slave is upgraded, a nonupgraded master will execute
       the preceding example without error, whereas the INSERT
       will fail on the slave and replication will stop.
       To deal with this, stop all new statements on the master
       and wait until the slaves catch up. Then upgrade the
       slaves followed by the master. Alternatively, if you
       cannot stop new statements, temporarily change to
       row-based logging on the master (binlog_format=ROW) and
       wait until all slaves have processed all binary logs
       produced up to the point of this change. Then upgrade the
       slaves followed by the master and change the master back
       to statement-based logging.

     * Incompatible change: MySQL 5.6.11 and later supports
       CREATE TABLE ... [SUB]PARTITION BY ALGORITHM=n [LINEAR]
       KEY (...), which can be used to create a table whose KEY
       partitioning is compatible with a MySQL 5.1 server (n=1).
       (Bug #14521864, Bug #66462) This syntax is not accepted
       by MySQL 5.6.10 and earlier, although it is supported in
       MySQL 5.5 beginning with MySQL 5.5.31. mysqldump in MySQL
       5.5.31 and later MySQL 5.5 releases includes the
       ALGORITHM option when dumping tables using this option,
       but surrounds it with conditional comments, like this:
CREATE TABLE t1 (a INT)
/*!50100 PARTITION BY KEY */ /*!50531 ALGORITHM = 1 */ /*!50100 ()
      PARTITIONS 3 */

       When importing a dump containing such CREATE TABLE
       statements into a MySQL 5.6.10 or earlier MySQL 5.6
       server, the versioned comment is not ignored, which
       causes a syntax error. Therefore, prior to importing such
       a dump file, you must either change the comments so that
       the MySQL 5.6 server ignores them (by removing the string
       !50531 or replacing it with !50611, wherever it occurs),
       or remove them.
       This is not an issue with dump files made using MySQL
       5.6.11 or later, where the ALGORITHM option is written
       using /*!50611 ... */.

     * Incompatible change: For TIME, DATETIME, and TIMESTAMP
       columns, the storage required for tables created before
       MySQL 5.6.4 differs from storage required for tables
       created in 5.6.4 and later. This is due to a change in
       5.6.4 that permits these temporal types to have a
       fractional part. After upgrading from MySQL 5.5 to MySQL
       5.6.4 or later, it is recommended that you also upgrade
       from MySQL 5.5 to MySQL 5.6 TIME, DATETIME, and TIMESTAMP
       types. ALTER TABLE currently allows the creation of
       tables containing temporal columns in both MySQL 5.5 and
       MySQL 5.6.4 (or later) binary format but this makes it
       more difficult to recreate tables in cases where .frm
       files are not available. Additionally, as of MySQL 5.6.4,
       the aforementioned temporal types are more space
       efficient. For more information about changes to temporal
       types in MySQL 5.6.4, see Section 11.7, "."
       As of MySQL 5.6.16, ALTER TABLE upgrades old temporal
       columns to 5.6 format for ADD COLUMN, CHANGE COLUMN,
       MODIFY COLUMN, ADD INDEX, and FORCE operations. Hence,
       the following statement upgrades a table containing
       columns in the old format:
ALTER TABLE tbl_name FORCE;

       This conversion cannot be done using the INPLACE
       algorithm because the table must be rebuilt, so
       specifying ALGORITHM=INPLACE in these cases results in an
       error. Specify ALGORITHM=COPY if necessary.
       When ALTER TABLE does produce a temporal-format
       conversion, it generates a message that can be displayed
       with SHOW WARNINGS: TIME/TIMESTAMP/DATETIME columns of
       old format have been upgraded to the new format.

     * Due to the temporal type changes described in the
       previous incompatible change item above, importing
       pre-MySQL 5.6.4 tables that contain DATETIME and
       TIMESTAMP types into MySQL 5.6.4 (or later) fails.
       Importing a MySQL 5.5 table with these temporal types
       into MySQL 5.6.4 (or later) is the mostly likely scenario
       for this problem to occur.
       The following procedures describe workarounds that use
       the original pre-MySQL 5.6.4 .frm file to recreate a
       table with a row structure that is compatible with 5.6.4
       (or later). The procedures involve changing the original
       pre-MySQL 5.6.4 .frm file to use the Memory storage
       engine instead of InnoDB, copying the .frm file to the
       data directory of the destination instance, and using
       ALTER TABLE to change the table's storage engine type
       back to InnoDB. Use the first procedure if your tables do
       not have foreign keys. Use the second procedure, which
       has additional steps, if your table includes foreign
       keys.
       If the table does not have foreign keys:

         1. Copy the table's original .frm file to the data
            directory on the server where you want to import the
            tablespace.

         2. Modify the table's .frm file to use the Memory
            storage engine instead of the InnoDB storage engine.
            This modification requires changing 7 bytes in the
            .frm file that define the table's storage engine
            type. Using a hexidecimal editing tool:
               o Change the byte at offset position 0003, which
                 is the legacy_db_type, from "0c" (for InnoDB)
                 to "06" (for Memory), as shown below:
00000000  fe 01 09 06 03 00 00 10  01 00 00 30 00 00 10 00

               o The remaining 6 bytes do not have a fixed
                 offset. Search the .frm file for "InnoDB" to
                 locate the line with the other 6 bytes. The
                 line appears as shown below:
00001010  ff 00 00 00 00 00 00 06  00 49 6e 6e 6f 44 42 00  |.........
InnoDB.|

               o Modify the bytes so that the line appears as
                 follows:
00001010  ff 00 00 00 00 00 00 06 00 4d 45 4d 4f 52 59 00


         3. Run ALTER TABLE ... ENGINE=INNODB to add the table
            definition to the InnoDB data dictionary. This
            creates the InnoDB table with the temporal data
            types in the new format. For the ALTER TABLE
            operation to complete successfully, the .frm file
            must correspond to the tablespace.

         4. Import the table using ALTER TABLE ... IMPORT
            TABLESPACE.
       If table has foreign keys:

         1. Recreate the tables with foreign keys using table
            definitions from SHOW CREATE TABLE output. The
            incorrect temporal column formats do not matter at
            this point.

         2. Dump all foreign key definitions to a text file by
            selecting the foreign key information from
            INFORMATION_SCHEMA.TABLE_CONSTRAINTS and
            INFORMATION_SCHEMA.KEY_COLUMN_USAGE.

         3. Drop all tables and complete the table import
            process described in steps 1 to 4 in the procedure
            described above for tables without foreign keys.

         4. After the import operation is complete, add the
            foreign keys from foreign key definitions that you
            saved to a text file.

     * Incompatible change: As of MySQL 5.6, the full-text
       stopword file is loaded and searched using latin1 if
       character_set_server is ucs2, utf16, utf16le, or utf32.
       If any table was created with FULLTEXT indexes while the
       server character set was ucs2, utf16, utf16le, or utf32,
       repair it using this statement:
REPAIR TABLE tbl_name QUICK;


     * Incompatible change: In MySQL 5.6.20, the patch for Bug
       #69477 limits the size of redo log BLOB writes to 10% of
       the redo log file size. As a result of this new limit,
       innodb_log_file_size should be set to a value greater
       than 10 times the largest BLOB data size found in the
       rows of your tables. No action is required if your
       innodb_log_file_size setting is already 10 times the
       largest BLOB data size or your tables contain no BLOB
       data.
       In MySQL 5.6.22, the redo log BLOB write limit is relaxed
       to 10% of the total redo log size (innodb_log_file_size *
       innodb_log_files_in_group). (Bug #19498877)

SQL Changes


     * Some keywords may be reserved in MySQL 5.6 that were not
       reserved in MySQL 5.5. See Section 9.3, "Reserved Words."

     * The YEAR(2) data type has certain issues that you should
       consider before choosing to use it. As of MySQL 5.6.6,
       YEAR(2) is deprecated. YEAR(2) columns in existing tables
       are treated as before, but YEAR(2) in new or altered
       tables are converted to YEAR(4). For more information,
       see Section 11.3.4, "YEAR(2) Limitations and Migrating to
       YEAR(4)."

     * As of MySQL 5.6.6, it is explicitly disallowed to assign
       the value DEFAULT to stored procedure or function
       parameters or stored program local variables (for example
       with a SET var_name = DEFAULT statement). This was not
       previously supported, or documented as permitted, but is
       flagged as an incompatible change in case existing code
       inadvertently used this construct. It remains permissible
       to assign DEFAULT to system variables, as before, but
       assigning DEFAULT to parameters or local variables now
       results in a syntax error.
       After an upgrade to MySQL 5.6.6 or later, existing stored
       programs that use this construct produce a syntax error
       when invoked. If a mysqldump file from 5.6.5 or earlier
       is loaded into 5.6.6 or later, the load operation fails
       and affected stored program definitions must be changed.

     * In MySQL, the TIMESTAMP data type differs in nonstandard
       ways from other data types:

          + TIMESTAMP columns not explicitly declared with the
            NULL attribute are assigned the NOT NULL attribute.
            (Columns of other data types, if not explicitly
            declared as NOT NULL, permit NULL values.) Setting
            such a column to NULL sets it to the current
            timestamp.

          + The first TIMESTAMP column in a table, if not
            declared with the NULL attribute or an explicit
            DEFAULT or ON UPDATE clause, is automatically
            assigned the DEFAULT CURRENT_TIMESTAMP and ON UPDATE
            CURRENT_TIMESTAMP attributes.

          + TIMESTAMP columns following the first one, if not
            declared with the NULL attribute or an explicit
            DEFAULT clause, are automatically assigned DEFAULT
            '0000-00-00 00:00:00' (the "zero" timestamp). For
            inserted rows that specify no explicit value for
            such a column, the column is assigned '0000-00-00
            00:00:00' and no warning occurs.
       Those nonstandard behaviors remain the default for
       TIMESTAMP but as of MySQL 5.6.6 are deprecated and this
       warning appears at startup:
[Warning] TIMESTAMP with implicit DEFAULT value is deprecated.
Please use --explicit_defaults_for_timestamp server option (see
documentation for more details).

       As indicated by the warning, to turn off the nonstandard
       behaviors, enable the new explicit_defaults_for_timestamp
       system variable at server startup. With this variable
       enabled, the server handles TIMESTAMP as follows instead:

          + TIMESTAMP columns not explicitly declared as NOT
            NULL permit NULL values. Setting such a column to
            NULL sets it to NULL, not the current timestamp.

          + No TIMESTAMP column is assigned the DEFAULT
            CURRENT_TIMESTAMP or ON UPDATE CURRENT_TIMESTAMP
            attributes automatically. Those attributes must be
            explicitly specified.

          + TIMESTAMP columns declared as NOT NULL and without
            an explicit DEFAULT clause are treated as having no
            default value. For inserted rows that specify no
            explicit value for such a column, the result depends
            on the SQL mode. If strict SQL mode is enabled, an
            error occurs. If strict SQL mode is not enabled, the
            column is assigned the implicit default of
            '0000-00-00 00:00:00' and a warning occurs. This is
            similar to how MySQL treats other temporal types
            such as DATETIME.
       To upgrade servers used for replication, upgrade the
       slaves first, then the master. Replication between the
       master and its slaves should work provided that all use
       the same value of explicit_defaults_for_timestamp:

         1. Bring down the slaves, upgrade them, configure them
            with the desired value of
            explicit_defaults_for_timestamp, and bring them back
            up.
            The slaves will recognize from the format of the
            binary logs received from the master that the master
            is older (predates the introduction of
            explicit_defaults_for_timestamp) and that operations
            on TIMESTAMP columns coming from the master use the
            old TIMESTAMP behavior.

         2. Bring down the master, upgrade it, and configure it
            with the same explicit_defaults_for_timestamp value
            used on the slaves, and bring it back up.

2.11.2 Downgrading MySQL

   This section describes what to do to downgrade to an older
   MySQL version, in the unlikely case that the previous version
   worked better than the new one.

   It is always a good idea to make a backup beforehand, in case
   a downgrade fails and leaves the instance in an unusable
   state.

   To downgrade between General Availability (GA) status
   versions within the same release series, typically you just
   install the new binaries on top of the old ones and do not
   make any changes to the databases.

   Downgrades between milestone releases (or from a GA release
   to a milestone release) within the same release series are
   not supported and you may encounter issues.

   The following items form a checklist of things to do whenever
   you perform a downgrade:

     * Read the upgrading section for the release series from
       which you are downgrading to be sure that it does not
       have any features you really need. See Section 2.11.1,
       "Upgrading MySQL."

     * If there is a downgrading section for that version, read
       that as well.

     * To see which new features were added between the version
       to which you are downgrading and your current version,
       see the Release Notes
       (http://dev.mysql.com/doc/relnotes/mysql/5.6/en/).

     * Check Section 2.11.3, "Checking Whether Tables or Indexes
       Must Be Rebuilt," to see whether changes to table formats
       or to character sets or collations were made between your
       current version of MySQL and the version to which you are
       downgrading. If so and these changes result in an
       incompatibility between MySQL versions, you will need to
       downgrade the affected tables using the instructions in
       Section 2.11.4, "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or
       Indexes."

   In most cases, you can move the MySQL format files and data
   files between different GA versions on the same architecture
   as long as you stay within versions for the same release
   series of MySQL.

   If you downgrade from one release series to another, there
   may be incompatibilities in table storage formats. In this
   case, use mysqldump to dump your tables before downgrading.
   After downgrading, reload the dump file using mysql or
   mysqlimport to re-create your tables. For examples, see
   Section 2.11.5, "Copying MySQL Databases to Another Machine."

   A typical symptom of a downward-incompatible table format
   change when you downgrade is that you cannot open tables. In
   that case, use the following procedure:

    1. Stop the older MySQL server that you are downgrading to.

    2. Restart the newer MySQL server you are downgrading from.

    3. Dump any tables that were inaccessible to the older
       server by using mysqldump to create a dump file.

    4. Stop the newer MySQL server and restart the older one.

    5. Reload the dump file into the older server. Your tables
       should be accessible.

   If system tables in the mysql database changed, downgrading
   might introduce some loss of functionality or require some
   adjustments. Here are some examples:

     * Trigger creation requires the TRIGGER privilege as of
       MySQL 5.1. In MySQL 5.0, there is no TRIGGER privilege
       and SUPER is required instead. If you downgrade from
       MySQL 5.1 to 5.0, you will need to give the SUPER
       privilege to those accounts that had the TRIGGER
       privilege in 5.1.

     * Triggers were added in MySQL 5.0, so if you downgrade
       from 5.0 to 4.1, you cannot use triggers at all.

     * The mysql.proc.comment column definition changed between
       MySQL 5.1 and 5.5. After a downgrade from 5.5 to 5.1,
       this table is seen as corrupt and in need of repair. To
       workaround this problem, execute mysql_upgrade from the
       version of MySQL to which you downgraded.

2.11.2.1 Downgrading to MySQL 5.5

   When downgrading to MySQL 5.5 from MySQL 5.6, keep in mind
   the following issues relating to behavior or features in
   MySQL 5.6 that differ in MySQL 5.5:

System Tables


     * The mysql.user table in MySQL 5.6 has a password_expired
       column. The mysql.user table in MySQL 5.5 does not. This
       means that an account with an expired password in MySQL
       5.6 will work normally in MySQL 5.5.

Data Types


     * For TIME, DATETIME, and TIMESTAMP columns, the storage
       required for tables created before MySQL 5.6.4 differs
       from storage required for tables created in 5.6.4 and
       later. This is due to a change in 5.6.4 that permits
       these temporal types to have a fractional part. To
       downgrade to a version older than 5.6.4, dump affected
       tables with mysqldump before downgrading, and reload the
       tables after downgrading.

InnoDB


     * InnoDB search indexes (with a type of FULLTEXT),
       introduced in MySQL 5.6.4, are not compatible with
       earlier versions of MySQL, including earlier releases in
       the 5.6 series. Drop such indexes before performing a
       downgrade.

     * InnoDB small page sizes specified by the innodb_page_size
       configuration option, introduced in MySQL 5.6.4, are not
       compatible with earlier versions of MySQL, including
       earlier releases in the 5.6 series. Dump all InnoDB
       tables in instances that use a smaller InnoDB page size,
       drop the tables, and re-create and reload them after the
       downgrade.

Replication


     * As of MySQL 5.6, the relay-log.info file contains a line
       count and a replication delay value, so the file format
       differs from that in older versions. See Section
       17.2.2.2, "Slave Status Logs." If you downgrade a slave
       server to a version older than MySQL 5.6, the older
       server will not read the file correctly. To address this,
       modify the file in a text editor to delete the initial
       line containing the number of lines.

     * Beginning with MySQL 5.6.6, the MySQL Server employs
       Version 2 binary log events when writing the binary log.
       Binary logs written using Version 2 log events cannot by
       read by earlier versions of MySQL Server. To generate a
       binary log that is written using Version 1 log events
       readable by older servers, start the MySQL 5.6.6 or later
       server using --log-bin-use-v1-row-events=1, which forces
       the server to employ Version 1 events when writing the
       binary log.

2.11.3 Checking Whether Tables or Indexes Must Be Rebuilt

   A binary upgrade or downgrade is one that installs one
   version of MySQL "in place" over an existing version, without
   dumping and reloading tables:

    1. Stop the server for the existing version if it is
       running.

    2. Install a different version of MySQL. This is an upgrade
       if the new version is higher than the original version, a
       downgrade if the version is lower.

    3. Start the server for the new version.

   In many cases, the tables from the previous version of MySQL
   can be used without problem by the new version. However,
   sometimes changes occur that require tables or table indexes
   to be rebuilt, as described in this section. If you have
   tables that are affected by any of the issues described here,
   rebuild the tables or indexes as necessary using the
   instructions given in Section 2.11.4, "Rebuilding or
   Repairing Tables or Indexes."

Table Incompatibilities

   After a binary upgrade to MySQL 5.1 from a MySQL 5.0
   installation that contains ARCHIVE tables, accessing those
   tables causes the server to crash, even if you have run
   mysql_upgrade or CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE. To work around
   this problem, use mysqldump to dump all ARCHIVE tables before
   upgrading, and reload them into MySQL 5.1 after upgrading.
   The same problem occurs for binary downgrades from MySQL 5.1
   to 5.0.

   The upgrade problem is fixed in MySQL 5.6.4: The server can
   open ARCHIVE tables created in MySQL 5.0. However, it remains
   the recommended upgrade procedure to dump 5.0 ARCHIVE tables
   before upgrading and reload them after upgrading.

Index Incompatibilities

   In MySQL 5.6.3, the length limit for index prefix keys is
   increased from 767 bytes to 3072 bytes, for InnoDB tables
   using ROW_FORMAT=DYNAMIC or ROW_FORMAT=COMPRESSED. See
   Section 14.6.7, "Limits on InnoDB Tables" for details. This
   change is also backported to MySQL 5.5.14. If you downgrade
   from one of these releases or higher, to an earlier release
   with a lower length limit, the index prefix keys could be
   truncated at 767 bytes or the downgrade could fail. This
   issue could only occur if the configuration option
   innodb_large_prefix was enabled on the server being
   downgraded.

   If you perform a binary upgrade without dumping and reloading
   tables, you cannot upgrade directly from MySQL 4.1 to 5.1 or
   higher. This occurs due to an incompatible change in the
   MyISAM table index format in MySQL 5.0. Upgrade from MySQL
   4.1 to 5.0 and repair all MyISAM tables. Then upgrade from
   MySQL 5.0 to 5.1 and check and repair your tables.

   Modifications to the handling of character sets or collations
   might change the character sort order, which causes the
   ordering of entries in any index that uses an affected
   character set or collation to be incorrect. Such changes
   result in several possible problems:

     * Comparison results that differ from previous results

     * Inability to find some index values due to misordered
       index entries

     * Misordered ORDER BY results

     * Tables that CHECK TABLE reports as being in need of
       repair

   The solution to these problems is to rebuild any indexes that
   use an affected character set or collation, either by
   dropping and re-creating the indexes, or by dumping and
   reloading the entire table. In some cases, it is possible to
   alter affected columns to use a different collation. For
   information about rebuilding indexes, see Section 2.11.4,
   "Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes."

   To check whether a table has indexes that must be rebuilt,
   consult the following list. It indicates which versions of
   MySQL introduced character set or collation changes that
   require indexes to be rebuilt. Each entry indicates the
   version in which the change occurred and the character sets
   or collations that the change affects. If the change is
   associated with a particular bug report, the bug number is
   given.

   The list applies both for binary upgrades and downgrades. For
   example, Bug #27877 was fixed in MySQL 5.1.24, so it applies
   to upgrades from versions older than 5.1.24 to 5.1.24 or
   newer, and to downgrades from 5.1.24 or newer to versions
   older than 5.1.24.

   In many cases, you can use CHECK TABLE ... FOR UPGRADE to
   identify tables for which index rebuilding is required. It
   will report this message:
Table upgrade required.
Please do "REPAIR TABLE `tbl_name`" or dump/reload to fix it!

   In these cases, you can also use mysqlcheck --check-upgrade
   or mysql_upgrade, which execute CHECK TABLE. However, the use
   of CHECK TABLE applies only after upgrades, not downgrades.
   Also, CHECK TABLE is not applicable to all storage engines.
   For details about which storage engines CHECK TABLE supports,
   see Section 13.7.2.2, "CHECK TABLE Syntax."

   These changes cause index rebuilding to be necessary:

     * MySQL 5.1.24 (Bug #27877)
       Affects indexes that use the utf8_general_ci or
       ucs2_general_ci collation for columns that contain ''
       LATIN SMALL LETTER SHARP S (German). The bug fix
       corrected an error in the original collations but
       introduced an incompatibility such that '' compares
       equal to characters with which it previously compared
       different.
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR
       UPGRADE as of MySQL 5.1.30 (see Bug #40053).
       A workaround for this issue is implemented as of MySQL
       5.1.62, 5.5.21, and 5.6.5. The workaround involves
       altering affected columns to use the
       utf8_general_mysql500_ci and ucs2_general_mysql500_ci
       collations, which preserve the original pre-5.1.24
       ordering of utf8_general_ci and ucs2_general_ci.

     * MySQL 5.0.48, 5.1.23 (Bug #27562)
       Affects indexes that use the ascii_general_ci collation
       for columns that contain any of these characters: '`'
       GRAVE ACCENT, '[' LEFT SQUARE BRACKET, '\' REVERSE
       SOLIDUS, ']' RIGHT SQUARE BRACKET, '~' TILDE
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR
       UPGRADE as of MySQL 5.1.29 (see Bug #39585).

     * MySQL 5.0.48, 5.1.21 (Bug #29461)
       Affects indexes for columns that use any of these
       character sets: eucjpms, euc_kr, gb2312, latin7, macce,
       ujis
       Affected tables can be detected by CHECK TABLE ... FOR
       UPGRADE as of MySQL 5.1.29 (see Bug #39585).

2.11.4 Rebuilding or Repairing Tables or Indexes

   This section describes how to rebuild a table, following
   changes to MySQL such as how data types or character sets are
   handled. For example, an error in a collation might have been
   corrected, requiring a table rebuild to update the indexes
   for character columns that use the collation. (For examples,
   see Section 2.11.3, "Checking Whether Tables or Indexes Must
   Be Rebuilt.") You might also need to repair or upgrade a
   table, as indicated by a table check operation such as that
   performed by CHECK TABLE, mysqlcheck, or mysql_upgrade.

   Methods for rebuilding a table include dumping and reloading
   it, or using ALTER TABLE or REPAIR TABLE. REPAIR TABLE only
   applies to MyISAM, ARCHIVE, and CSV tables.
   Note

   If you are rebuilding tables because a different version of
   MySQL will not handle them after a binary (in-place) upgrade
   or downgrade, you must use the dump-and-reload method. Dump
   the tables before upgrading or downgrading using your
   original version of MySQL. Then reload the tables after
   upgrading or downgrading.

   If you use the dump-and-reload method of rebuilding tables
   only for the purpose of rebuilding indexes, you can perform
   the dump either before or after upgrading or downgrading.
   Reloading still must be done afterward.

   To rebuild a table by dumping and reloading it, use mysqldump
   to create a dump file and mysql to reload the file:
shell> mysqldump db_name t1 > dump.sql
shell> mysql db_name < dump.sql

   To rebuild all the tables in a single database, specify the
   database name without any following table name:
shell> mysqldump db_name > dump.sql
shell> mysql db_name < dump.sql

   To rebuild all tables in all databases, use the
   --all-databases option:
shell> mysqldump --all-databases > dump.sql
shell> mysql < dump.sql

   To rebuild a table with ALTER TABLE, use a "null" alteration;
   that is, an ALTER TABLE statement that "changes" the table to
   use the storage engine that it already has. For example, if
   t1 is an InnoDB table, use this statement:
mysql> ALTER TABLE t1 ENGINE = InnoDB;

   If you are not sure which storage engine to specify in the
   ALTER TABLE statement, use SHOW CREATE TABLE to display the
   table definition.

   If you need to rebuild an InnoDB table because a CHECK TABLE
   operation indicates that a table upgrade is required, use
   mysqldump to create a dump file and mysql to reload the file,
   as described earlier. If the CHECK TABLE operation indicates
   that there is a corruption or causes InnoDB to fail, refer to
   Section 14.19.2, "Forcing InnoDB Recovery" for information
   about using the innodb_force_recovery option to restart
   InnoDB. To understand the type of problem that CHECK TABLE
   may be encountering, refer to the InnoDB notes in Section
   13.7.2.2, "CHECK TABLE Syntax."

   For MyISAM, ARCHIVE, or CSV tables, you can use REPAIR TABLE
   if the table checking operation indicates that there is a
   corruption or that an upgrade is required. For example, to
   repair a MyISAM table, use this statement:
mysql> REPAIR TABLE t1;

   mysqlcheck --repair provides command-line access to the
   REPAIR TABLE statement. This can be a more convenient means
   of repairing tables because you can use the --databases or
   --all-databases option to repair all tables in specific
   databases or all databases, respectively:
shell> mysqlcheck --repair --databases db_name ...
shell> mysqlcheck --repair --all-databases

   For incompatibilities introduced in MySQL 5.1.24 by the fix
   for Bug #27877 that corrected the utf8_general_ci and
   ucs2_general_ci collations, a workaround is implemented as of
   MySQL 5.1.62, 5.5.21, and 5.6.5. Upgrade to one of those
   versions, then convert each affected table using one of the
   following methods. In each case, the workaround altering
   affected columns to use the utf8_general_mysql500_ci and
   ucs2_general_mysql500_ci collations, which preserve the
   original pre-5.1.24 ordering of utf8_general_ci and
   ucs2_general_ci.

     * To convert an affected table after a binary upgrade that
       leaves the table files in place, alter the table to use
       the new collation. Suppose that the table t1 contains one
       or more problematic utf8 columns. To convert the table at
       the table level, use a statement like this:
ALTER TABLE t1
CONVERT TO CHARACTER SET utf8 COLLATE utf8_general_mysql500_ci;

       To apply the change on a column-specific basis, use a
       statement like this (be sure to repeat the column
       definition as originally specified except for the COLLATE
       clause):
ALTER TABLE t1
MODIFY c1 CHAR(N) CHARACTER SET utf8 COLLATE utf8_general_mysql500_ci;


     * To upgrade the table using a dump and reload procedure,
       dump the table using mysqldump, modify the CREATE TABLE
       statement in the dump file to use the new collation, and
       reload the table.

   After making the appropriate changes, CHECK TABLE should
   report no error.

2.11.5 Copying MySQL Databases to Another Machine

   In cases where you need to transfer databases between
   different architectures, you can use mysqldump to create a
   file containing SQL statements. You can then transfer the
   file to the other machine and feed it as input to the mysql
   client.
   Note

   You can copy the .frm, .MYI, and .MYD files for MyISAM tables
   between different architectures that support the same
   floating-point format. (MySQL takes care of any byte-swapping
   issues.) See Section 15.2, "The MyISAM Storage Engine."

   Use mysqldump --help to see what options are available.

   The easiest (although not the fastest) way to move a database
   between two machines is to run the following commands on the
   machine on which the database is located:
shell> mysqladmin -h 'other_hostname' create db_name
shell> mysqldump db_name | mysql -h 'other_hostname' db_name

   If you want to copy a database from a remote machine over a
   slow network, you can use these commands:
shell> mysqladmin create db_name
shell> mysqldump -h 'other_hostname' --compress db_name | mysql db_nam
e

   You can also store the dump in a file, transfer the file to
   the target machine, and then load the file into the database
   there. For example, you can dump a database to a compressed
   file on the source machine like this:
shell> mysqldump --quick db_name | gzip > db_name.gz

   Transfer the file containing the database contents to the
   target machine and run these commands there:
shell> mysqladmin create db_name
shell> gunzip < db_name.gz | mysql db_name

   You can also use mysqldump and mysqlimport to transfer the
   database. For large tables, this is much faster than simply
   using mysqldump. In the following commands, DUMPDIR
   represents the full path name of the directory you use to
   store the output from mysqldump.

   First, create the directory for the output files and dump the
   database:
shell> mkdir DUMPDIR
shell> mysqldump --tab=DUMPDIR db_name

   Then transfer the files in the DUMPDIR directory to some
   corresponding directory on the target machine and load the
   files into MySQL there:
shell> mysqladmin create db_name           # create database
shell> cat DUMPDIR/*.sql | mysql db_name   # create tables in database
shell> mysqlimport db_name DUMPDIR/*.txt   # load data into tables

   Do not forget to copy the mysql database because that is
   where the grant tables are stored. You might have to run
   commands as the MySQL root user on the new machine until you
   have the mysql database in place.

   After you import the mysql database on the new machine,
   execute mysqladmin flush-privileges so that the server
   reloads the grant table information.

2.12 Environment Variables

   This section lists all the environment variables that are
   used directly or indirectly by MySQL. Most of these can also
   be found in other places in this manual.

   Options on the command line take precedence over values
   specified in option files and environment variables, and
   values in option files take precedence over values in
   environment variables.

   In many cases, it is preferable to use an option file instead
   of environment variables to modify the behavior of MySQL. See
   Section 4.2.6, "Using Option Files."
   Variable Description
   CXX The name of your C++ compiler (for running CMake).
   CC The name of your C compiler (for running CMake).
   DBI_USER The default user name for Perl DBI.
   DBI_TRACE Trace options for Perl DBI.
   HOME The default path for the mysql history file is
   $HOME/.mysql_history.
   LD_RUN_PATH Used to specify the location of
   libmysqlclient.so.
   LIBMYSQL_ENABLE_CLEARTEXT_PLUGIN Enable mysql_clear_password
   authentication plugin; see Section 6.3.8.7, "The Cleartext
   Client-Side Authentication Plugin."
   LIBMYSQL_PLUGIN_DIR Directory in which to look for client
   plugins.
   LIBMYSQL_PLUGINS Client plugins to preload.
   MYSQL_DEBUG Debug trace options when debugging.
   MYSQL_GROUP_SUFFIX Option group suffix value (like specifying
   --defaults-group-suffix).
   MYSQL_HISTFILE The path to the mysql history file. If this
   variable is set, its value overrides the default for
   $HOME/.mysql_history.
   MYSQL_HISTIGNORE Patterns specifying statements not to log to
   $HOME/.mysql_history.
   MYSQL_HOME The path to the directory in which the
   server-specific my.cnf file resides.
   MYSQL_HOST The default host name used by the mysql
   command-line client.
   MYSQL_PS1 The command prompt to use in the mysql command-line
   client.
   MYSQL_PWD The default password when connecting to mysqld.
   Note that using this is insecure. See Section 6.1.2.1,
   "End-User Guidelines for Password Security."
   MYSQL_TCP_PORT The default TCP/IP port number.
   MYSQL_TEST_LOGIN_FILE The name of the .mylogin.cnf login
   file.
   MYSQL_UNIX_PORT The default Unix socket file name; used for
   connections to localhost.
   PATH Used by the shell to find MySQL programs.
   TMPDIR The directory where temporary files are created.
   TZ This should be set to your local time zone. See Section
   B.5.4.6, "Time Zone Problems."
   UMASK The user-file creation mode when creating files. See
   note following table.
   UMASK_DIR The user-directory creation mode when creating
   directories. See note following table.
   USER The default user name on Windows when connecting to
   mysqld.

   For information about the mysql history file, see Section
   4.5.1.3, "mysql Logging."

   MYSQL_TEST_LOGIN_FILE is the path name of the login file (the
   file created by mysql_config_editor). If not set, the default
   value is %APPDATA%\MySQL\.mylogin.cnf directory on Windows
   and $HOME/.mylogin.cnf on non-Windows systems. See Section
   4.6.6, "mysql_config_editor --- MySQL Configuration Utility."

   The UMASK and UMASK_DIR variables, despite their names, are
   used as modes, not masks:

     * If UMASK is set, mysqld uses ($UMASK | 0600) as the mode
       for file creation, so that newly created files have a
       mode in the range from 0600 to 0666 (all values octal).

     * If UMASK_DIR is set, mysqld uses ($UMASK_DIR | 0700) as
       the base mode for directory creation, which then is
       AND-ed with ~(~$UMASK & 0666), so that newly created
       directories have a mode in the range from 0700 to 0777
       (all values octal). The AND operation may remove read and
       write permissions from the directory mode, but not
       execute permissions.

   MySQL assumes that the value for UMASK or UMASK_DIR is in
   octal if it starts with a zero.

2.13 Perl Installation Notes

   The Perl DBI module provides a generic interface for database
   access. You can write a DBI script that works with many
   different database engines without change. To use DBI, you
   must install the DBI module, as well as a DataBase Driver
   (DBD) module for each type of database server you want to
   access. For MySQL, this driver is the DBD::mysql module.

   Perl, and the DBD::MySQL module for DBI must be installed if
   you want to run the MySQL benchmark scripts; see Section
   8.12.2, "The MySQL Benchmark Suite."
   Note

   Perl support is not included with MySQL distributions. You
   can obtain the necessary modules from http://search.cpan.org
   for Unix, or by using the ActiveState ppm program on Windows.
   The following sections describe how to do this.

   The DBI/DBD interface requires Perl 5.6.0, and 5.6.1 or later
   is preferred. DBI does not work if you have an older version
   of Perl. You should use DBD::mysql 4.009 or higher. Although
   earlier versions are available, they do not support the full
   functionality of MySQL 5.6.

2.13.1 Installing Perl on Unix

   MySQL Perl support requires that you have installed MySQL
   client programming support (libraries and header files). Most
   installation methods install the necessary files. If you
   install MySQL from RPM files on Linux, be sure to install the
   developer RPM as well. The client programs are in the client
   RPM, but client programming support is in the developer RPM.

   The files you need for Perl support can be obtained from the
   CPAN (Comprehensive Perl Archive Network) at
   http://search.cpan.org.

   The easiest way to install Perl modules on Unix is to use the
   CPAN module. For example:
shell> perl -MCPAN -e shell
cpan> install DBI
cpan> install DBD::mysql

   The DBD::mysql installation runs a number of tests. These
   tests attempt to connect to the local MySQL server using the
   default user name and password. (The default user name is
   your login name on Unix, and ODBC on Windows. The default
   password is "no password.") If you cannot connect to the
   server with those values (for example, if your account has a
   password), the tests fail. You can use force install
   DBD::mysql to ignore the failed tests.

   DBI requires the Data::Dumper module. It may be installed; if
   not, you should install it before installing DBI.

   It is also possible to download the module distributions in
   the form of compressed tar archives and build the modules
   manually. For example, to unpack and build a DBI
   distribution, use a procedure such as this:

    1. Unpack the distribution into the current directory:
shell> gunzip < DBI-VERSION.tar.gz | tar xvf -

       This command creates a directory named DBI-VERSION.

    2. Change location into the top-level directory of the
       unpacked distribution:
shell> cd DBI-VERSION


    3. Build the distribution and compile everything:
shell> perl Makefile.PL
shell> make
shell> make test
shell> make install

   The make test command is important because it verifies that
   the module is working. Note that when you run that command
   during the DBD::mysql installation to exercise the interface
   code, the MySQL server must be running or the test fails.

   It is a good idea to rebuild and reinstall the DBD::mysql
   distribution whenever you install a new release of MySQL.
   This ensures that the latest versions of the MySQL client
   libraries are installed correctly.

   If you do not have access rights to install Perl modules in
   the system directory or if you want to install local Perl
   modules, the following reference may be useful:
   http://learn.perl.org/faq/perlfaq8.html#How-do-I-keep-my-own-
   module-library-directory-

2.13.2 Installing ActiveState Perl on Windows

   On Windows, you should do the following to install the MySQL
   DBD module with ActiveState Perl:

    1. Get ActiveState Perl from
       http://www.activestate.com/Products/ActivePerl/ and
       install it.

    2. Open a console window.

    3. If necessary, set the HTTP_proxy variable. For example,
       you might try a setting like this:
C:\> set HTTP_proxy=my.proxy.com:3128


    4. Start the PPM program:
C:\> C:\perl\bin\ppm.pl


    5. If you have not previously done so, install DBI:
ppm> install DBI


    6. If this succeeds, run the following command:
ppm> install DBD-mysql

   This procedure should work with ActiveState Perl 5.6 or
   newer.

   If you cannot get the procedure to work, you should install
   the ODBC driver instead and connect to the MySQL server
   through ODBC:
use DBI;
$dbh= DBI->connect("DBI:ODBC:$dsn",$user,$password) ||
  die "Got error $DBI::errstr when connecting to $dsn\n";

2.13.3 Problems Using the Perl DBI/DBD Interface

   If Perl reports that it cannot find the ../mysql/mysql.so
   module, the problem is probably that Perl cannot locate the
   libmysqlclient.so shared library. You should be able to fix
   this problem by one of the following methods:

     * Copy libmysqlclient.so to the directory where your other
       shared libraries are located (probably /usr/lib or /lib).

     * Modify the -L options used to compile DBD::mysql to
       reflect the actual location of libmysqlclient.so.

     * On Linux, you can add the path name of the directory
       where libmysqlclient.so is located to the /etc/ld.so.conf
       file.

     * Add the path name of the directory where
       libmysqlclient.so is located to the LD_RUN_PATH
       environment variable. Some systems use LD_LIBRARY_PATH
       instead.

   You may also need to modify the -L options if there are other
   libraries that the linker fails to find. For example, if the
   linker cannot find libc because it is in /lib and the link
   command specifies -L/usr/lib, change the -L option to -L/lib
   or add -L/lib to the existing link command.

   If you get the following errors from DBD::mysql, you are
   probably using gcc (or using an old binary compiled with
   gcc):
/usr/bin/perl: can't resolve symbol '__moddi3'
/usr/bin/perl: can't resolve symbol '__divdi3'

   Add -L/usr/lib/gcc-lib/... -lgcc to the link command when the
   mysql.so library gets built (check the output from make for
   mysql.so when you compile the Perl client). The -L option
   should specify the path name of the directory where libgcc.a
   is located on your system.

   Another cause of this problem may be that Perl and MySQL are
   not both compiled with gcc. In this case, you can solve the
   mismatch by compiling both with gcc.
